<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89530-0038 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-30-89.f2.A1037</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 102 / Tuesday, May 30, 1989 /Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Occupational Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1910 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. H-370] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 1218-AB15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Occupational Exposure to Bloodborne Pathogens </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY:</T2> Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA),Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION:</T2> Proposed rule and notice of hearing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY:</T2> The Occupational Safety and Health Administration proposesto reduce occupational exposure to Hepatitis B Virus (HBV), Human ImmunodeficiencyVirus (HIV) and other bloodborne pathogens under section 6(b) of the OccupationalSafety and Health Act of 1970 (the Act), 29 U.S.C. 655. Based on a reviewof the available data, OSHA has made a preliminary determination that certainemployees face a significant health risk as the result of occupationalexposure to blood and other potentially infectious materials because theymay contain bloodborne pathogens, including hepatitis B virus which causesHepatitis B, a serious liver disease, and human immunodeficiency virus,which causes Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS). The Agency preliminarilyconcludes that this significant health risk can be minimized or eliminatedusing a combination of engineering and work practice controls, personalprotective clothing and equipment, training, medical follow-up of exposureincidents, vaccination (where applicable), and other provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES:</T2> Written comments on the proposed standard and Notices ofIntention to Appear at one of the informal rulemaking hearings must bepostmarked on or before August 14, 1989. Parties requesting more than 10 minutes for their presentation at the hearingsand parties submitting documentary evidence at the hearing must submitthe full text of their testimony and all documentary evidence no laterthan August 31, 1989 for the Washington, DC hearing and no later than September29, 1989 for the Chicago, IL and San Francisco, CA hearings. All informal public hearings will begin at 10:00 a.m. on the first dayof the hearing and at 9:00 a.m. on each succeeding day. Three informalpublic rulemaking hearings are scheduled to begin on the following dates:Washington, DC: September 12, 1989. Chicago, IL: October 17, 1989. San Francisco, CA: October 24, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES:</T2> Comments on the proposed standard are to be submittedto the Docket Officer, Docket No. H-370, Room N-2625, U.S. Department ofLabor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210, telephone (202)523-7894. Comments limited to 10 pages or less in length also may be transmittedby facsimile to (202) 523-5046 or (for FTS) to 8-523-5046, provided theoriginal and 4 copies of the comment are sent to the Docket Officer thereafter.Notices of Intention to Appear at the informal rulemaking hearings, testimony,and documentary evidence for the public hearings are to be sent to Mr.Tom Hall, OSHA Division of Consumer Affairs, Docket No. H-370, Room N-3647,U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC20210, telephone (202) 523-8615. All informal public hearings will beginat 10:00 a.m. on the first day of the hearing and at 9:00 a.m. on eachsucceeding day. The locations of the informal public hearings are as follows:<T3>Washington, DC: </T3>The Auditorium, Frances Perkins Department ofLabor Building, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210.<T3>Chicago, IL: </T3>Parlor A, Palmer House, 17 East Monroe Street, Chicago,IL 60603.San Francisco, CA: The Crystal Ballroom, San Franciscan Hotel, 1231 MarketStreet, San Francisco, CA 94103.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Mr. James F. Foster, OSHA, U.S.Department of Labor, Office of Public Affairs, Room N-3647, 200 ConstitutionAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Telephone (202) 523-8151.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="74">Table of Contents </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">I. Introduction </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Pertinent Legal Authority </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Events Leading to the Proposed Standard </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Health Effects </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Preliminary Quantitative Risk Assessment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VI. Significance of Risk </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VII. Preliminary Regulatory Impact and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VIII. Environmental Impact </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IX. Summary and Explanation of the Proposed Standard </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">X. Public Participation_Notice of Hearing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XI. Authority and Signature </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">XII. Standard</ITAG>References to the rulemaking record are in the text of the preamble. Referencesare given as ``Ex.'' followed by a number to designate the reference inthe docket. For example, ``Ex. 1'' means exhibit 1 in Docket H-370. Thisdocument is the Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking that was publishedin the<T4> Federal Register </T4>on November 27, 1987 (52 FR 45438). <ITAG tagnum="84">I. Introduction </ITAG>The preamble to the proposed standard on bloodborne pathogens discussesthe events leading to the proposal, health effects of exposure, degreeand significance of the risk, an analysis of the technological and economicfeasibility of the proposal's implementation, regulatory impact and regulatoryflexibility analysis, and the rationale behind the specific provisionsset forth in the proposed standard. Public comment on all matters discussed in this notice and all other relevantissues is requested for the purpose of assisting OSHA in the developmentof a new standard for occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens. Personsneed not resubmit information already submitted in response to the AdvanceNotice of Proposed Rulemaking entitled, ``Occupational Exposure to HepatitisB Virus and Human Immunodeficiency Virus'' at 52 FR 45438 (November 27,1987). This proposed standard represents OSHA's first regulation of occupationalexposure to biological hazards. The Agency recognizes the unique natureof both the healthcare industry and other operations covered by this proposedstandard. Adequate employee protection must be provided in a manner consistentwith a high standard of patient care. OSHA seeks comments and informationfrom interested parties on how this goal can be achieved.On February 6, 1989 the Department of Health and Human Services forwardedto the Department of Labor a document entitled ``Guidelines for Preventionof Transmission of Human Immunodeficiency Virus and Hepatitis B Virus toHealth-Care and Public Safety Workers'' (Exhibit 15) in compliance withthe requirements of the Health Omnibus Programs Extension of 1988, Pub.L. 100-607. OSHA has placed this document and a companion document, ``ACurriculum Guide for Public-Safety and Emergency-Response Workers_Preventionof Transmission of Human Immunodeficiency Virus and Hepatitis B Virus''(Exhibit 16) in the public docket for this rulemaking. The Agency invitescomments relative to using the information in this rulemaking. In particular,comments should be addressed to issues where these guidelines differ withthe proposed requirements of this standard (e.g. which body fluids requirethe use of precautions in emergency situations). On November 1, 1988 the President signed the ``Medical Waste Tracking Actof 1988'' into effect. The Act is an amendment to the Solid Waste DisposalAct and requires the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) to promulgateregulations on the management of medical waste by establishing a two-yeardemonstration program to track medical waste. As part of the tracking programEPA will be investigating, among other things, areas such as segregation,containerization, and labeling of medical waste. These facets of infectiouswaste management are also dealt with in the proposed OSHA standard foroccupational exposure to Bloodborne Pathogens. On March 24, 1989, the EnvironmentalProtection Agency (EPA) published ``Standards for the Tracking and Managementof Medical Waste; Interim Final Rule and Request for Comments'' in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> (FR 54 12326). In general, this EPA documentsets forth the criteria and procedures for State participation in the demonstrationprogram, EPA's definition of ``medical wastes'' for use under the Act,and the regulations and standards to be used in the demonstration program.OSHA has placed a copy of EPA's interim final rule in the record for considerationin development of the final Bloodborne Pathogens Standard (Ex. 6-497).OSHA requests comments on health effects, risk assessment, significanceof risk determination, technological and economic feasibility and provisionswhich should be included in a final bloodborne pathogens standard. Thefollowing list of questions is provided to assist persons in formulatingcomments, but it is not intended to be all inclusive or to indicate thatparticipants need to respond to all issues or follow this format. Specific issues of concern to OSHA are the following: 1. Are there any bloodborne pathogens, in addition to the ones discussedin section IV <T3>Health Effects,</T3> that present a risk to employees with occupationalexposure to blood? If so what are these pathogens, and what evidence isavailable that they present a potential or actual risk to employees? 2. Are there additional studies or case reports on HBV and HIV that shouldbe included in the health effects analysis? If so, what are they? Has OSHAadequately represented the results of available epidemiologic and casestudies? 3. For its significance of risk determination, OSHA considered clinicalhepatitis B, HBV carrier status, hospitalization, and death to be materialimpairment of health. Because of the possibility of infecting others (sexualpartners, newborns) and the possibility of becoming an HBV carrier, shouldOSHA consider HBV infection as a material impairment of health? 4. Has OSHA employed the correct methodology for determining the quantitativeand qualitative risks of exposure? Are alternative risk assessments available?Are there demographic factors which should be controlled for in estimatingthe background risk for HBV? 5. OSHA has chosen to protect employees from bloodborne pathogens by requiringthat they be protected from exposure to blood and other potentially infectiousmaterials. Is this the correct approach and is it the most protective approach?If not, what other approach should be employed? 6. The scope of the proposed standard would be based on occupational exposureto blood and other potentially infectious materials, whether or not theindividual is employed in the healthcare industry. Is this approach themost protective? Will another approach provide greater protection? Shouldthe scope of the standard be limited to one (or a few) industries? 7. In addition to law enforcement personnel, firefighters, and correctionspersonnel, are there any other occupations with potential for exposurethat are predominantly or entirely confined to the public (federal, stateor local) sector? If so, do they perform tasks or procedures that are uniqueand require special protective measures that are not addressed by thisstandard? If so, what are these protective measures? 8. What circumstances unique to law enforcement and correction officersplace these employees at risk of exposure to blood and other potentiallyinfectious materials? What, if any, additional requirements are neededto minimize or eliminate these exposures? What, if any additional trainingshould be required? What can be done to ensure that personal protectiveequipment is available when and where it is needed? 9. What circumstances unique to firefighters, emergency medical techniciansand paramedics place these employees at risk for exposure to blood andother potentially infectious materials? What, if any, additional requirementsare needed to minimize or eliminate these exposures? What, if any, additionaltraining should be required? What can be done to ensure that personal protectiveclothing and equipment is available when and where it is needed? 10. There is evidence that HIV may be transmitted through human breastmilk. Are employees at risk of infection due to exposure to human breastmilk? If so, what tasks or procedures do they perform that place them atrisk? What special protective measures, if any, should be required forthese employees? 11. Throughout the proposal, OSHA uses the terms ``contaminated'' and ``decontaminated''.Are these terms clearly understood? Should OSHA define these terms? Ifso, what are the appropriate definitions? Should laundry be considered``contaminated'' only when blood or other potentially infectious materialsare visible on the laundry? If not, what should indicate ``contaminated''laundry? 12. The proprosed standard includes a number of requirements includingan infection control plan, engineering and work practice controls, personalprotective clothing and equipment, training, signs and labels, provisionof HBV vaccination, and medical follow-up for exposure incidents. Are theserequirements appropriate? Do they provide adequate protection? Should otherprovisions be added? 13. The Agency has traditionally preferred engineering and work practicecontrols over the use of personal protective equipment. Do employees, innearly every case, need to use a combination of methods that include personalprotective equipment, or are there tasks or worksites where exposures canbe adequately minimized or eliminated by adherence to engineering or workpractice controls alone? How could OSHA best structure the methods of controlrequirements to reflect actual working conditions? 14. The available evidence indicates that an exposure incident that involvesa percutaneous exposure, resulting from an injury with a needle or othersharp object, carries the highest risk of HIV or HBV infection. Many ofthese injuries result from the need to disassemble the device after use,poorly designed equipment, or other factors that relate to the basic designof the equipment. How can OSHA encourage the development of safer instrumentsand equipment to further reduce the likelihood of percutaneous exposure?15. The proposed standard does not require the use of respirators. Do aerosolspresent a risk for transmission of bloodborne pathogens? Are there instanceswhen these bloodborne pathogens may be transmitted in respirable particlesgenerated during medical procedures such as laser surgery or the use ofmedical or surgical instruments such as a bone saw? Are there other instanceswhere respirable particles containing (or potentially containing) bloodbornepathogens may present a risk to employees? 16. Commenters have indicated that some procedures with potential for exposureare performed in locations where handwashing facilities are not availableor not located near the work area (e.g., crime scenes or mobile blood collectionsites). Is there an acceptable substitute for handwashing that can be usedunder these circumstances? Does it provide protection that is equivalentto handwashing? 17. In paragraphs (d)(3)(vii) (B), (D), and (E) OSHA has proposed that<T3>fluid-resistant</T3> clothing be worn if there is a potential for splashingor spraying of blood or other potentially infectious materials while <T3>fluid-proof</T3> clothing must be worn if there is a potential forclothing becoming soaked with blood or other potentially infectious materials.Is the distinction between <T3>fluid-resistant</T3> and <T3>fluid-proof</T3> clear? Should these terms be defined? Are the requirementsfor two types of protective clothing based on anticipated exposure appropriate?If not, what other approaches will assure employee protection? 18. Should OSHA specify that all non-intact skin be bandaged or otherwisecovered before performing tasks or procedures with a potential for occupationalexposure? 19. The proposed standard allows the use of utility gloves for housekeepingand laundry workers. Is the decontamination and reuse of these gloves appropriate?Should OSHA require that these gloves be puncture-resistant? 20. Are the requirements for HIV and HBV research laboratories adequateand appropriate? What additional requirements should be included? Is thedefinition for ``research laboratories'' clear? Does the definition clearlydifferentiate between research laboratories and clinical (diagnostic) laboratories?21. Are the requirements for HIV and HBV production facilities adequateand appropriate? What additional requirements should be included? Is thedefinition for ``production facilities'' clear? Does the definition adequatelydifferentiate between research laboratories and production facilities?22. Some research laboratories use blood and blood components but do notpropagate bloodborne pathogens. Are the requirements for clinical laboratoriesadequate for these research laboratories? If not, what additional provisionsshould be required?23. The proposal requires that the HBV vaccine be offered to employeesexposed an average of one or more times per month. Should the administrationof the HBV vaccine be contingent on the frequency of exposure? Is thisfrequency appropriate? If this approach is not appropriate, what justificationcan be provided for an alternative approach? 24. The proposed standard requires that the HBV vaccine be made available90 days after the effective date of the standard. Are there sufficientquantities of the HBV vaccine to vaccinate all eligible employees? Assumingthat sufficient quantities of vaccine are available, will there be a problemwith the distribution of the vaccine? If so, should there be a phase-inperiod? 25. In paragraph (f) Hepatitis B vaccine and post-exposure follow-up, theemployer is required to administer the vaccine and provide effective post-exposureprophylaxis according to ``standard recommendations for medical practice.''Does this approach give sufficient guidance to the employer on what mustbe done? For example, should the Agency be more specific about the meaningof ``* * * accepted safe effective * * * prophylaxis * * *?'' Should theserecommendations be those of the U.S. Public Health Service? 26. Employees may be reluctant to report exposure incidents if they fearthat coworkers or others may gain access to their test results. OSHA hasattempted to reduce barriers to the reporting of exposure incidents byrequiring that employee medical records, including test results, be keptconfidential except as required by law. Has OSHA adequately addressed theissue of confidentiality? If not, what additional measures should be required?27. The biohazard signs required in paragraph (g)(1)(i) do not requirethe use of the word ``Danger.'' Is it necessary to require the use of ``Danger''or other additional warning words in order to warn individuals who maynot understand the meaning of ``Biohazard?'' 28. OSHA requires that infectious wastes be labelled or ``red bagged.''If infectious waste is decontaminated prior to disposal, should OSHA allowthe label to be removed from the container? 29. OSHA requires that exposed employees be trained. Should OSHA specifyminimum qualifications required for the individual who conducts the trainingprogram? 30. The standard would require that all employees participate in the trainingprogram when they are hired and annually thereafter. Certain individuals,for example, infection control practitioners or some virologists, wouldbe expected to be thoroughly familiar with some of the material in thetraining program. Is it appropriate to substitute some measure of competencyin lieu of training for these individuals? If so, what criteria would beappropriate? 31. In all previous OSHA health standards, the Agency has required theemployer to bear the cost for all provisions of the standard. This proposedstandard would also require the employer to pay for all the provisionsof the standard. OSHA seeks comments on this issue. 32. In order to perform an economic feasibility analysis, it is helpfulto have a financial and economic profile of the industries affected bythe standard. The following information is requested to aid in that effort.Data should be provided for the last five years. Data already submittedto OSHA or Jack Faucett Associates (JFA) need not be resubmitted. a. What were total annual revenues for your facility and/or industry sector?b. What were the total annual investments categorized as replacement, expansion,modernization, and environmental health and safety? c. What were the retained earnings, after tax income, total assets, stockholders'equity, net worth, depreciation charges, and debt-equity ratios? d. What were the total annual employment levels and labor turnover forthe affected industries for the last 5 years? 33. How would an OSHA standard for occupational exposure to bloodbornepathogens affect competition in the healthcare industry?34. OSHA and JFA have performed detailed feasibility analyses for all industrysectors. Comments are requested with regard to any other industry segmentson additional impacts which should be considered prior to issuing a finalstandard. 35. Comments are requested on OSHA's Preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis(PRIA), the report prepared by Jack Faucett Associates, the feasibilityof the proposed standard and alternatives. 36. The following information is requested for small businesses in additionto the information OSHA has gathered. a. What kinds of small businesses or organizations would be affected byregulating exposures to blood and other potentially infectious materials?How many such businesses are there? b. Which if any, federal rules may duplicate, overlap, or conflict withan OSHA regulation concerning exposure to blood and other potentially infectiousmaterials? c. Will difficulties be encountered by small entities when attempting tocomply with the standard? What requirements, if any, should be deletedor simplified for small entities, while still achieving comparable protectionfor the health of employees of small entities? d. What timetable would be appropriate to allow small entities sufficienttime to comply? 37. OSHA's PRIA contains estimates of the current level of compliance forvarious provisions. Are these estimates accurate? If not, by what meansand to what extent are employers currently providing protection to theiremployees? 38. The National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321et seq.) requires that each Federal agency consider the environmental impactof major actions significantly affecting the quality of the human environment.Any person having information, data, or comments pertaining to possibleenvironmental impacts is invited to submit them along with supporting documentationto OSHA. Such impacts might include a positive or negative environmentaleffect that could result should a standard be adopted; as well as any irreversiblecommitments of natural resources. Also, estimates of the effect on thelevel of hazardous pathogens in the environment by the proposed OSHA standardand alternatives are requested. 39. As discussed in Section IX_Summary and Explanation of the ProposedStandard and Section X_Public Participation, OSHA plans to devote severaldays of the public hearing to a discussion of Hepatitis B vaccination.OSHA seeks written comments concerning the elements of a HBV vaccinationprogram that will result in a high degree of compliance of eligible employees.40. OSHA believes a hepatitis B vaccination program where employers bearthe cost of the vaccine, make the vaccine available to employees at a reasonabletime and place, and provide information about the benefits of the vaccineis the most appropriate way to assure that a large percentage of eligibleemployees are vaccinated. The Agency seeks comment on whether this voluntaryapproach is the correct approach. In the past, the Agency has not mandated medical examinations or othermedical procedures. For example, the final standards for benzene, asbestos,cotton dust, and formaldehyde require the employer to ``provide'' or ``makeavailable'' medical procedures (29 CFR 1910.1028; 1910.1001; 1910.1043;and 1910.1048, respectively). In the preamble to the Lead Standard (43FR 54450), OSHA specifically rejected mandating worker participation inmedical surveillance. The Agency noted that medical surveillance was asensitive area and that: ``Attempting to compel workers to subject themselvesto detailed medical examinations presents the possibility of clashes withlegitimate privacy and religious concerns. Health in general is an intenselypersonal matter. * * *'' In lead, medical surveillance involved effectson male and female reproduction, while in this proposed standard a majorconcern is that a vaccination is an invasive procedure. Here, as in thelead standard, OSHA prefers to encourage rather than try to force by governmentalcoercion, employee cooperation in the vaccination program. The HBV vaccination provision is a significant element in this rule withregard to saving lives from hepatitis B infection. Complete vaccinationof the healthcare workers at significant risk would substantially reducehepatitis B associated illness and death. In addition, once immunized,workers are protected from infection both on the job and off even shouldother precautions fail. Finally, the vaccine is safe and effective. OSHA seeks comment on whether the HBV vaccination should be mandated forsome or all exposed employees and on what legal, ethical, medical, or otherissues would be raised by such a requirement.Paperwork Reduction In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501et. seq.), and the regulations issued pursuant thereto (5 CFR Part 1320),OSHA certifies that it has submitted the information collection requirementscontained in this proposed standard to the Office of Management and Budget(OMB) for review under Section 3504(h) of that Act. Paragraph (c) InfectionControl, paragraph (g)(2) Training, and paragraph (h) Recordkeeping arethe provisions that make the major contribution to the information collectionrequirements in the proposed standard. Comments on these information collectionrequirements may be submitted by interested parties to the Office of Informationand Regulatory Affairs of OMB, Attention: Desk Officer for the OccupationalSafety and Health Administration, New Executive Office Building, Washington,DC 20503. OSHA requests that copies of such comments also be submittedto the OSHA rulemaking docket, at the following address: Docket Officer,Docket No. H-370, Room N 2625, U.S. Department of Labor, 200 ConstitutionAve., NW., Washington, DC 20210. Public Reporting Burden Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto range from 4 to 16 hours for the Infection Control Plan and an averageof 7 hours per facility for the remaining information requirements. Sendcomments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collectionof information, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to theOSHA rulemaking docket, at the address previously set forth; and to theOffice of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Office of Management andBudget. Federalism This proposed standard has been reviewed in accordance with Executive Order12612, 52 FR 41685 (October 30, 1987), regarding Federalism. This Orderrequires that agencies, to the extent possible, refrain from limiting statepolicy options, consult with States prior to taking any actions that wouldrestrict State policy options, and take such actions only when there isclear constitutional authority and the presence of a problem of nationalscope. The Order provides for preemption of State law only if there isa clear Congressional intent for the agency to do so. Any such preemptionis to be limited to the extent possible. Section 18 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act (OSH Act), expressesCongress' clear intent to preempt State laws with respect to which FederalOSHA has promulgated occupational safety or health standards. Under theOSH Act a State can avoid preemption only if it submits, and obtains Federalapproval of, a plan for the development of such standards and their enforcement.Occupational safety and health standards developed by such Plan-Statesmust, among other things, be at least as effective as the Federal standardsin providing safe and healthful employment and places of employment. Bloodborne pathogens are present wherever blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials are found. Since these potentially infectious materials are presentin workplaces in every state of the Union, the occupational hazard of bloodbornepathogens is a national problem. The Federally proposed bloodborne pathogen standard is drafted so thatemployees in every State would be protected by general, performance-orientedstandards. To the extent that there are any State or regional peculiarities,States with occupational safety and health plans approved under Section18 of the OSH Act would be able to develop their own State standards todeal with any special problems. Moreover, the performance nature of thisproposed standard, of and by itself, allows for flexibility by States andemployers to provide as much safety as possible using varying methods consonantwith conditions in each State. In short, there is a clear national problem related to occupational safetyand health for employees exposed to bloodborne pathogens. Those Stateswhich have elected to participate under Section 18 of the OSH Act wouldnot be preempted by this proposed regulation and would be able to dealwith special, local conditions within the framework provided by this performance-orientedstandard while ensuring that their standards are at least as effectiveas the Federal standard. State comments are invited on this proposal andwill be fully considered prior to promulgation of a final rule. State Plans The 23 States and 2 territories with their own OSHA-approved occupationalsafety and health plans must adopt a comparable standard within 6 monthsafter the publication of a final standard for occupational exposure tobloodborne pathogens or amend their existing standard if it is not ``atleast as effective'' as the final Federal standard. OSHA anticipates thatthis proposed standard will have a substantial impact on state and localemployees. The states and territories with occupational safety and healthstate plans are: Alaska, Arizona, California, Connecticut, Hawaii, Indiana,Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland, Michigan, Minnesota, Nevada, New Mexico, NewYork, North Carolina, Oregon, Puerto Rico, South Carolina, Tennessee, Utah,Vermont, Virginia, the Virgin Islands, Washington, and Wyoming. (In Connecticutand New York, the plan covers only State and local government employees.)<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Pertinent Legal Authority </ITAG>The primary purpose of the Occupational Safety and Health Act (29 U.S.C.651 <T3>et seq</T3>.) (the Act) is to assure, so far as possible, safe andhealthful working conditions for every American worker over the periodof his or her working lifetime. One means prescribed by the Congress toachieve this goal is the mandate given to, and concomitant authority vestedin, the Secretary of Labor to set mandatory safety and health standards.The Congress specifically directed that:<ITAG tagnum="21">The Secretary, in promulgating standards dealing with toxic materialsor harmful physical agents under this subsection, shall set the standardwhich most adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis ofthe best available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairmentof health or functional capacity even if such employee has regular exposureto the hazard dealt with by such standard for the period of his workinglife. Development of standards under this subsection shall be based uponresearch, demonstrations, experiments, and such other information as maybe appropriate. In addition to the attainment of the highest degree ofhealth and safety protection for the employee, other considerations shallbe the latest available scientific data in the field, the feasibility ofthe standards, and experience gained under this and other health and safetylaws. Whenever practical, the standard promulgated shall be expressed interms of objective criteria and of the performance desired. [Section 6(b)(5)].</ITAG>Where appropriate, standards are required to include provisions for labelsor other appropriate forms of warning to apprise employees of hazards,suitable protective equipment, exposure control procedures, monitoringand measuring of employee exposure, employee access to the results of monitoring,and training and education. Standards may also prescribe recordkeepingrequirements where necessary or appropriate for enforcement of the Actor for the development of information regarding occupational accidentsand illnesses [Section 8(c)]. In vacating OSHA's 1978 revision to its benzene standard, the Supreme Courtrequired in <T3>Industrial Union Department, AFL-CIO</T3> v. <T3>American Petroleum Institute</T3>, 448 U.S. 601, 64 L. Ed. 2d 1010,100 S. Ct. 2844 (1980), that before the issuance of a new or revised standardpursuant to section 6(b)(5) of the Act, OSHA must make two threshold findings:that a place of employment is unsafe in that significant risks are present;and that the risks can be reduced or eliminated by a change in practices(448 U.S. at 642). The Court also stated ``that the Act does limit the Secretary's power torequiring the elimination of significant risks'' (448 U.S. at 644, n. 49).The Court indicated, however, that the significant risk determination is``not a mathematical straitjacket,'' and that ``OSHA is not required tosupport its finding that a significant risk exists with anything approachingscientific certainty.'' The Court ruled that ``a reviewing court [is] togive OSHA some leeway where its findings must be made on the frontiersof scientific knowledge [and that] . . . the Agency is free to use conservativeassumptions in interpreting the data with respect to carcinogens, riskingerror on the side of overprotection rather than underprotection'' (448U.S. at 655, 656). The Court also stated that ``while the Agency must supportits finding that a certain level of risk exists with substantial evidence,we recognize that its determination that a particular level of risk is`significant' will be based largely on policy considerations,'' (448 U.S.at 655, 656, n. 62). After OSHA has determined that a significant risk exists and that suchrisk can be reduced or eliminated by the regulatory action, it must setthe standard ``which most adequately assures, to the extent feasible, onthe basis of the best available evidence, that no employees will suffermaterial impairment of health'' [Section 6(b)(5)]. The Supreme Court hasinterpreted this section to mean that OSHA must enact the most protectivestandard possible to eliminate a significant risk of material health impairment,subject to the constraints of technological and economic feasibility <T3>American Textile Manufacture's Institute, Inc</T3>. v.<T3> Donovan</T3>, 452 U.S. 490 (1981). The Court held that ``cost-benefitanalysis is not required by the statute because feasibility analysis is.''(452 U.S. at 509). The Court stated that the Agency could use cost-effectivenessanalysis and choose the least costly of two equally effective standards.(452 U.S. 531, n. 32). Authority for this action is also found in section 8(c)(3) of the Act.In general, this section empowers the Secretary to require employers tomake, keep, and preserve records regarding activities related to the Act.In particular, section 8(c)(3) gives the Secretary authority to requireemployers to ``maintain accurate records of employee exposures to potentiallytoxic materials or harmful physical agents which are required to be monitoredor measured under section 6.'' The Secretary's authority to issue this proposed standard is further supportedby the general rulemaking authority granted in section 8(g)(2) of the Act.This section empowers the Secretary ``to prescribe such rules and regulationsas [she] may deem necessary to carry out [her] responsibilities under theAct''_in this case as part of a section 6(b) standard. The Secretary'sresponsibilities under the Act are defined largely by its enumerated purposes,which include:<ITAG tagnum="21">Encouraging employers and employees in their efforts to reduce thenumber of occupational safety and health hazards at their places of employment,and to stimulate employers and employees to institute new and to perfectexisting programs for providing safe and healthful working conditions [29U.S.C. 651(b)(1)]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Authorizing the Secretary of Labor to set mandatory occupational safetyand health standards applicable to businesses affecting interstate commerce[29 U.S.C. 651(b)(4)]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Building upon advances already made through employer and employeeinitiative for providing safe and healthful working conditions [29 U.S.C.651(b)(a)]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Providing for appropriate reporting procedures with respect to occupationalsafety and health which procedures will help achieve the objectives ofthis Act and accurately describe the nature of the occupational safetyand health program [29 U.S.C. 651(b)(12)]; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Exploring ways to discover latent diseases, establishing causal connectionsbetween diseases and work in environmental conditions [29 U.S.C. 651(b)(6)];</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Encouraging joint labor-management efforts to reduce injuries anddisease arising out of employment [29 U.S.C. 651(b)(13)]; and developinginnovative methods, techniques, and approaches for dealing with occupationalsafety and health problems [29 U.S.C. 651(b)(5)].</ITAG>The Agency's preliminary judgment is that the bloodborne pathogens standardis reasonably related to these statutory goals, and that the evidence satisfiesthe statutory requirements, and that the standard will reduce a significantrisk of hepatitis B and other adverse health effects, including but notlimited to AIDS and non-A/non-B hepatitis. Thus, the Secretary preliminarilyfinds that the proposed standard is necessary and appropriate to carryout her responsibilities under the Act. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Events Leading to the Proposed Standard </ITAG>Hepatitis B virus (HBV) has long been recognized as a pathogen capableof causing serious illness and death. Because the virus is transmittedthrough blood and certain body fluids, persons who handle these as partof their jobs have been at increased risk of contracting HBV. The humanimmunodeficiency virus (HIV), the virus that causes AIDS, has only beenrecognized in the last decade. Because the transmission of HIV is considerablyless efficient than HBV, the risk of HIV infection to employees who musthandle blood and other potentially infectious materials is less than forHBV infection (i.e., HIV results in fewer seroconversions following exposureincidents.) The consequences of HIV infection are grave, however, becauseHIV causes the fatal disease AIDS.Although OSHA has no standard that was designed specifically to reduceoccupational exposure to these viruses, the Agency has a number of existingregulations that apply to this hazard. For example, 29 CFR 1910.132 requiresemployers to provide personal protective equipment and 29 CFR 1910.145(f)requires accident prevention tags to warn of biological hazards. In addition,section 5(a)(1) the General Duty Clause of the Act requires that each employer:<ITAG tagnum="20">furnish to each of his employees employment and a place of employmentwhich are free from recognized hazards that are causing or are likely tocause death or serious physical harm to his employees.</ITAG>In 1983, OSHA issued a set of voluntary guidelines designed to reduce therisk of occupational exposure to hepatitis B virus (Ex. 4-25). The voluntaryguidelines, which were sent to employers in the healthcare industry, includeda description of the disease, recommended work practices, and recommendationsfor use of immune globulins and the hepatitis B vaccine. On September 19, 1986, the American Federation of State, County and MunicipalEmployees (AFSCME) petitioned OSHA to take action to reduce the risk toemployees from exposure to certain infectious agents (Ex. 2A). They requestedthat OSHA issue an emergency temporary standard (ETS) under section 6(c)of the Act. The petitioners also requested that OSHA immediately initiatea section 6(b) rulemaking that would require employers to provide the HBVvaccine at no cost to employees at risk for HBV infection and would requireemployers to follow work practice guidelines such as those issued by theCenters for Disease Control. AFSCME also requested that OSHA amend theHazard Communication Standard (48 FR 53280) to require a training programfor employees exposed to infectious diseases, require counseling for pregnantemployees about diseases that have reproductive effects, and mandate postingof isolation precautions in patient areas and in contaminated areas. On September 22, 1986, the Service Employees International Union, the NationalUnion of Hospital and Healthcare Employees, and RWDSU Local 1199_Drug,Hospital and Healthcare union petitioned the Agency to promulgate a standardto protect healthcare employees from the hazard posed by occupational exposureto hepatitis B virus (Ex. 3). They requested that, as a minimum, the standardshould contain all of the provisions in OSHA's 1983 guidelines with specialemphasis on making workers aware of the benefits of vaccination. In addition,they asked OSHA to immediately issue a directive stating that employersmust provide the HBV vaccine free of charge to all high risk healthcareworkers. Having determined that the available data did not meet the criteria foran ETS as set forth in section 6(c) of the Act, Assistant Secretary JohnA. Pendergrass denied the petitions by letter dated October 22, 1987. OSHAfurther determined that the appropriate course of action was to publishan Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANPR) to initiate rulemakingunder section 6(b) of the Act and to collect further information. Concurrentlywith the collection of this information, the Agency committed to enforcingexisting regulations and section 5(a)(1) of the Act in healthcare settingsand to undertaking an educational program in cooperation with the Departmentof Health and Human Services. On October 30, 1987, the Departments of Labor and Health and Human Servicespublished a Joint Advisory Notice entitled, ``Protection Against OccupationalExposure to Hepatitis B Virus (HBV) and Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV)''(52 FR 4181). In the cover letter to employers, Secretaries Brock and Bowenurged the ``* * * widest possible adherence to the appropriate precautionsas exemplified by the CDC guidelines and the Joint Advisory Notice.'' Theletter, notice and a pamphlet written by OSHA for healthcare workers weremailed to more than 600,000 employers, employee representatives and tradeand professional associations.On November 27, 1987, OSHA published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> an ANPR announcing the initiation of the rulemakingprocess (52 FR 45438). The Agency requested information relevant to reducingoccupational exposure to HBV and HIV under section 6(b) of the OSH Act.The public was asked to comment on the scope, the modes of controllingexposure, personal protective equipment, vaccination programs, managementof exposure incidents, medical surveillance, training and education, genericstandards, advances in hazard control, effectiveness of alternative approachesand the environmental effects. A sixty day period was set for comments,and these comments were to be submitted to the OSHA docket by January 26,1988, as noted in a correction published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> December 11, 1987 (52 FR 47097). OSHA received an overwhelming response to the ANPR. Over 350 comments werefiled by interested parties including employers, unions, health professionals,trade representatives, professional associations, manufacturers, and federal,state and local government agencies, among others. The comments have beenanalyzed and the data were used in preparing this proposal. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Health Effects </ITAG>A. Introduction Certain pathogenic microorganisms can be found in the blood of infectedindividuals. For the purposes of this standard, OSHA is referring to thesemicrooganisms as ``bloodborne pathogens'' and to the diseases that theycause as ``bloodborne diseases.'' These bloodborne pathogens may be transmittedfrom the infected individual to other individuals when blood or certainother body fluids are exchanged, for example, when blood-contaminated needlesare shared by intravenous drug users. Because it is the exposure to theblood or body fluid that carries the risk of infection, individuals whoseoccupational duties place them at risk of blood exposure are also at riskof becoming infected with these bloodborne pathogens, developing the diseaseand, in some cases, dying. Infected employees may also transmit the pathogensto others. A complete discussion of two of the most significant bloodborne pathogens,hepatitis B virus and human immunodeficiency virus, follows. This includesa discussion of each of the viruses, the disease each causes, modes oftransmission, and documented risk of infection resulting from occupationalexposure. In addition, a discussion of other bloodborne diseases, includingnon-A, non-B hepatitis, delta hepatitis, syphilis, and malaria, are included.There is also a discussion of cytomegalovirus with a review of the literatureconcerning transmission of the virus and risks to pregnant women. B. Hepatitis Viruses <ITAG tagnum="81">Introduction </ITAG>Hepatitis means ``inflammation of the liver,'' and can be caused by a numberof agents including drugs, toxins, autoimmune disease, and infectious agentsincluding viruses. The most common causes of hepatitis are viruses. Thereare four types of viral hepatitis which are important in the U.S. (Ex.6-449, Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-199). Hepatitis A, formerly called ``infectious''hepatitis, is spread by fecal contamination and is not generally consideredto be a significant risk to healthcare workers, although episodes of transmissionto healthcare workers in hospitals have been reported (Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-472;Ex. 6-449, Ex. 6-456). Hepatitis B, formerly called ``serum'' hepatitis,is the major risk to healthcare workers and is extensively discussed inthis document. Delta hepatitis affects persons already infected with HBVand can increase the severity of acute and chronic liver disease in theseindividuals (Ex. 6-470). Non-A, non-B hepatitis is the name given to agroup of diseases caused by viral agents. The ``post transfusion'' typeof non-A, non-B hepatitis is caused by a bloodborne virus that is efficientlytransmitted by blood transfusion and by needle sharing among IV drugs users(Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-449). There are occasional reports of transmission tohealthcare workers (Ex. 6-39, Ex. 6-455). Although it is not thought tobe a major occupational hazard to health workers, serological tests forthis disease are not currently available, and the actual risk of transmissionto health workers is unknown.Hepatitis B virus (HBV) infection is the major infectious occupationalhazard to healthcare workers. The Hepatitis Branch of the Centers for DiseaseControl (CDC) estimates that there are approximately 18,000 infectionsin healthcare workers each year in the United States. Approximately 12,000of these infections occur in employees who have occupational exposure toblood, causing 2500-3000 cases of clinical acute hepatitis and 500-600hospitalizations and over 200 deaths. Approximately 1000 health care workersannually become HBV carriers, at risk of long-term sequellae includingdisabling chronic liver disease, cirrhosis and liver cancer. Death mayresult from both acute and chronic hepatitis. Infected healthcare workerscan spread the infection to family members or rarely, to their patients.[For a detailed discussion, see Section V, Preliminary Quantitative RiskAssessment.] The use of Hepatitis B (HB) vaccine and appropriate environmentalcontrols will prevent almost all of these occupational infections. Effortsto reduce blood exposure and minimize puncture injuries in the healthcaresetting will reduce the risk of transmission of all bloodborne hepatitisviruses. Biology Hepatitis B is caused by the hepatitis B virus (HBV), formerly called theDane particle, that attacks and replicates in liver cells (Ex. 6-430, Ex.6-449). The virus has an inner core and an outer shell structure. The innercore contains DNA, enzymes, and various proteins, the most important ofwhich is called the hepatitis B core antigen (HBcAg). The outer shell iscomposed of a lipoprotein called hepatitis B surface antigen (HBsAg), formerlycalled the Australia Antigen. The HBsAg is produced in great excess byliver cells replicating the virus, and is found, along with complete virus,in the form of small spheres and larger tubular particles in the bloodof infected persons. The small spherical forms of HBsAg are important becausethe plasma derived hepatitis B vaccines are composed of a highly purifiedpreparation of these particles. There is a readily available laboratorytest for HBsAg, and its presence in blood indicates that an individualis currently infected with the HBV, and is potentially infectious to others.Disease Outcomes Infection with the hepatitis B virus in a susceptible person can producetwo types of outcomes: self-limited acute hepatitis B and chronic HBV infection(Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-449). Similarly, the human body can mount two types ofresponse to HBV infection. The most frequent response seen in healthy adultsis development of self-limited acute hepatitis and the production of anantibody against HBsAg, called anti-HBs. The production of this antibodycoincides with the destruction of liver cells containing the virus, eliminationof the virus from the body, and signifies lifetime immunity against reinfection.Persons having this response also develop an antibody against the coreprotein, call anti-HBc, and usually maintain both anti-HBc and anti-HBsin their blood for life. Unfortunately, the destruction of liver cells in an attempt to rid thebody of this infection often leads to clinically apparent acute hepatitisB. About one third of infected individuals have no symptoms when infectedwith the virus, one third have a relatively mild clinical course of a flu-likeillness which is usually not diagnosed as hepatitis, and one third havea much more severe clinical course with jaundice (yellowing of the eyesand skin), dark urine, extreme fatigue, anorexia, nausea, abdominal pain,and sometimes joint pain, rash, and fever. These symptoms require hospitalizationin about 20% of jaundiced cases, and often cause several weeks to monthsof work loss even in those cases that do not require hospitalization. Fulminanthepatitis, which is about 85% fatal with even the most advanced medicalcare, develops in about 1-2% of reported acute hepatitis B cases, and anestimated 1 per 1000 HBV infections (Ex. 6-217). The second type of response_development of chronic HBV infection_has moresevere consequences (Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-449). About 6% to 10% of newly-infectedadults cannot clear the virus from their liver cells and become chronicHBV carriers. These individuals continue to produce HBsAg for many years,usually for life. They do not develop anti-HBs, but do produce anti-HBcantibody. HBV carriers are at high risk of developing chronic persistenthepatitis, chronic active hepatitis, cirrhosis of the liver, and primaryliver cancer. About 25% of carriers develop chronic persistent hepatitis,a relatively mild, non-progressive form of chronic liver disease, and 25%develop chronic active hepatitis. The latter is a progressive, debilitatingdisease that often leads to cirrhosis of the liver after 5-10 years (Ex.5-5, Ex. 6-448). Patients with end-stage cirrhosis may develop ascites(fluid accumulation in the abdomen), esophageal bleeding from distendedveins (causing patients to vomit large volumes of blood), coma, and death.Chronic HBV infection has been estimated to cause 10% of the 25,000-30,000deaths that occur due to cirrhosis in the U.S. each year (Ex.6-199). The HBV in chronic carriers can integrate into the DNA of the host livercell. This integration may lead to malignant transformation of the livercell, and development of primary hepatocellular carcinoma (PHC) (Ex. 6-419,Ex. 6-443). PHC is almost uniformly fatal if diagnosed after symptoms appear.Patients with PHC usually die within four to six months after diagnosis.PHC usually develops in HBV carriers after a latency period of 20 to 60years. In parts of the world where HBV infection is a common childhoodinfection, PHC is one of the leading causes of cancer death. In Taiwan,for example, Beasley and colleagues have found that 5 per 1000 adult maleHBV carriers develop PHC each year, and estimate that approximately 25%of all HBV carriers, and 40% of male HBV carriers, will die from eitherPHC or cirrhosis (Ex. 6-419). The relative risk of developing PHC in anHBV carrier compared to a non-carrier in his studies is 100. Studies inthe United States and in Great Britain, where HBV infection usually occursin adulthood, have shown 13 to 40 fold increased risk of developing PHCamong HBV carriers (Ex. 6-460, Ex. 6-444). This may be compared to therelative risk of lung cancer in smokers vs non-smokers of 10-20. Studiesin many other populations worldwide have confirmed this extremely highrelative risk. The causal link between HBV carriage and PHC is not only based on epidemiologicstudies, but is confirmed by both animal and molecular biological studies(Ex. 6-449, Ex. 6-443). Other animal species can become infected with HBV-likeviruses (which belong to the same virus family_Hepadna viruses), and woodchucks,Pekin ducks, ground squirrels, and other species that become infected maydevelop a carrier state. These carrier animals develop primary liver cancersat very high rates. Molecular biological studies have shown that PHC tumorcells contain integrated HBV DNA in virtually all human and animal casesof PHC (Ex. 6-443). There is likely a higher risk of developing PHC if infection occurs fromperinatal (mother to child) transmission, or from infection during childhoodthan from infection in adulthood. Although persons who develop HBV carriageduring adulthood are at increased risk of developing PHC, the exact riskof developing PHC following adult infection has not been established. Therisk observed in blood donors in the United States is probably an underestimate,as PHC is most likely in persons with chronic liver disease or cirrhosiswho are excluded from such studies. In addition, many carriers will dieof other causes before they develop PHC because of the long latency ofthis cancer. Nevertheless, it has been estimated that, in the U.S., about25%-33% of all PCH cases, or 750-1000 PHC cases annually, result from HBVinfection.<ITAG tagnum="81">Modes of Transmission </ITAG><T3>Workplace</T3>. HBV is spread via several routes: parenteral (by directinoculation through the skin), mucous membranes (blood contamination ofthe eye or mouth), sexual, and perinatal (from infected mother to newborninfant) (Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-449). The most efficient mode of transmissionis direct inoculation of infectious blood, such as might occur during bloodtransfusion, needle sharing by IV drug users, or needlestick or other sharpinstrument injury in health care workers. One milliliter of HBsAg positiveblood may contain 100 million infectious doses of virus; thus, exposureto extremely small inocula of HBV-positive blood may transmit infection.In different studies, 7% to 30% of health care workers sustaining needlestickpuncture injuries from HBsAg positive patients become infected (Ex. 4-27,Ex. 4-28). Since 1972, all units of blood collected for transfusion inthe U.S. have been screened for HBsAg, greatly decreasing the incidenceof transfusion related HBV infection. Blood and blood-derived body fluids (serous exudates and fluids from internalbody cavities) contain the highest quantities of virus and are the mostlikely vehicles for HBV transmission (Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-449). Certain otherbody fluids such as saliva and semen contain infectious virus but at 1000-foldlower concentration (Ex. 6-445). Other body fluids such as urine or fecescontain only small quantities of virus unless they are visibly contaminatedwith blood. Direct inoculation of infectious blood may occur in less apparent ways.Preexisting lesions on hands from injuries incurred at the workplace orat home or from dermatitis may provide a route of entry for the virus (Ex.6-427). In addition, transfer of contaminated blood via inanimate objectsor environmental surfaces has been shown to cause infection in the healthcareworkplace (Ex. 6-464, Ex. 6-433, Ex. 6-461). In general, fewer than 20%of infected healthcare workers report discrete needlestick injuries froma known infected patient (Ex. 6-427). The importance of this route of transmissionin these less apparent ways should not be underestimated. Although glovingwill not stop direct puncture injuries, it could prevent the virus fromcontacting preexisting lesions. Infectious sera placed in both the eye and mouth of experimental animalshas induced HBV infection (Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-449). Splashes of blood orserum into the individual's eye or mouth in clinical settings or in thelaboratory must be regarded as potentially serious exposures. While therehas been concern about the potential infectivity of aerosols generatedby dental, medical, and laboratory equipment, and although HBsAg may befound in large particles of ``spatter'' that travel short distances, OSHAis not aware of any data that link HBV transmission with the productionof aerosols. <T3>Secondary transmission in other settings.</T3> Sexual transmissionof HBV infection is an efficient mode of viral spread as HBsAg has beenfound in both semen and vaginal secretions (Ex. 6-430, Ex. 6-445). Depositionof virus onto mucous membranes and trauma to tissue causing small lesionsmay both play roles in transmission. Approximately 30% of spouses or regularsexual partners of acutely infected HB patients become infected. Spousesof chronic carriers, who have a much longer duration of infectivity, escapeinfection less frequently. Preventing secondary transmission of HBV infectionto the spouse or sexual partners of infected healthcare workers is an additionalbenefit derived from and reason for controlling this disease (Ex. 6-425).Non-sexual family contacts of HBV carriers are also at risk of infection.Although the relative importance of various transmission modes has notbeen determined in families, in various studies about 40-60% of householdcontacts of carriers identified by blood donation had markers of HBV infection(Ex. 6-420, Ex. 6-430). Daily exposure to the carrier for many years presentsoccasions for sharing razors or toothbrushes, exposure to blood and otherevents that could result in infection. Adopted carrier children have beenshown to transmit infection to other family contacts. Perinatal infection with the HBV is an efficient mode of transmission withparticularly severe consequences. Highly infectious HBV carriers and personswith acute hepatitis B have an antigen present in their blood called thehepatitis B ``e'' antigen (HBeAg), in addition to the previously discussedHBsAg. Mothers positive for both HBeAg and HBsAg will infect 70% to 90%of their newborns, most of whom will become chronic HBV carriers (Ex. 6-199,Ex. 6-419). These carriers have a 25% chance of dying from cirrhosis orPHC. They also remain infectious to others and can perpetuate the cycleof perinatal transmission. Fortunately, treatment of newborns at birthwith Hepatitis B immune globulin (HBIG) and HB vaccine is 85% to 95% effectivein preventing these infants from becoming carriers (Ex. 6-419, Ex. 6-199).To be able to treat these infants at birth, their mothers must be recognizedas carriers before delivery. The Immunization Practices Advisory Committeeof the CDC has recommended that all pregnant women in the U.S. be screenedfor HBsAg during an early prenatal visit (Ex. 6-424). Because pregnanthealthcare workers may, if infected, transmit HBV to their newborn infants,prevention of HBV infection is critical in women who work in occupationswhere they are at risk for exposure. <ITAG tagnum="81">Epidemiology </ITAG>HBV infection does not occur uniformly in the U.S. population. The infectionis more prevalent in certain ethnic and racial groups, and is especiallyprevalent in certain ``high risk'' groups defined by occupation and lifestyle(Exs. 6-430, 6-449, 6-199). The prevalence of HBV antibodies in the generalpopulation, reflecting the percentage of the population ever infected,is 3% to 4% for whites and 13% to 14% for blacks (Ex. 6-390). Foreign bornAsians have a prevalence of antibody of greater than 50%. The HBsAg prevalence,reflecting the percentage of the population who are HBV carriers, is 0.2%for whites, 0.7% for blacks, and up to 13% for foreign born Asians. Thehigh prevalence in Asians is a reflection of the fact that most HBV infectionsin Asia occur in childhood. The ACIP has listed a number of groups who are at substantial risk forHBV infection and should receive the HBV vaccine (Ex. 6-199). Healthcareworkers and staff of institutions for the mentally retarded are includedon this list. <ITAG tagnum="81">Transmission To Healthcare Workers </ITAG>Although outbreaks of clinical hepatitis had been reported for many years(Ex. 6-438, Ex. 6-459), it was not until the 1970's that the risk to healthcareworkers from HBV infection was well defined. The first studies noted thatdentists were more likely than attorneys to have had clinical hepatitis(Ex. 6-441). When HBsAg and antibody testing became available, it was possibleto show that the type of hepatitis that occurred in health workers washepatitis B, that dentists and physicians were 4 to 10 times more likelyto have serologic markers indicating previous HBV infection than firsttime blood donors (Ex. 4-15, Ex. 6-68), and that the prevalence of markersincreased significantly with years in practice (Ex. 6-440, Ex. 6-65, Ex.4-13, Ex. 4-16, Ex. 4-12).During the next decade, dozens of studies were published measuring theprevalence of HBV markers in various healthcare occupational groups, andin various healthcare settings (Ex. 6-427, Ex. 6-88, Ex. 6-72, Ex. 6-54,Ex. 6-53, Ex. 6-440, Ex. 6-40, Ex. 4-14). The prevalence of markers wasstudied in hospitals of all sizes and types, in various sized communities,serving all types of populations. Studies were also done on a wide varietyof individual occupational groups at meetings and through special studies.The most useful studies showed that risk of HBV infection in hospital personnelwas increased several-fold over that in blood donors (Ex. 6-440), thatrisk was closely related to frequency of contact with blood and not relatedto contact with patients per se (Ex. 6-65; Ex. 4-13; Ex. 4-16), and thatrisk was directly related to duration in the occupation (Ex. 4-15, Ex.4-12, Ex. 4-16). Certain studies attempted to quantitate the frequencyof blood and needle exposure in various categories of healthcare workers,and relate this to risk of infection (Ex. 4-16). The following general observations can be made from these studies:<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) These studies revealed that workers exposed to blood on the jobhad a prevalence of HBV markers several times that of non-exposed workersand the general population. The prevalence of markers increased with yearson the job. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The prevalence of HBV markers was related to the degree of bloodexposure or frequency of needle exposure, and not to patient contact perse. Persons working in operating rooms, emergency rooms labs, and dialysisunits had a higher marker prevalence than persons working on medical orpediatric wards, who in turn had a higher prevalence than clerical workers,social workers, and administrators. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Groups shown to be at high risk include (but are not limited to):medical technologists, operating room staff, phlebotomists and intravenoustherapy nurses, surgeons and pathologists, oncology and dialysis unit staff,emergency room staff, nursing personnel, staff physicians, dental professionals,laboratory and blood bank technicians, emergency medical technicians, andmorticians (Ex. 6-199).</ITAG>Most infected healthcare workers are unaware that they have been exposedto the HBV. Approximately 1% (or more) of hospitalized patients are HBVcarriers; most HBV carrier patients seen in the healthcare setting arenot symptomatic, are unaware that they are carriers, and their medicalcharts do not contain this information (Ex. 6-427). Health care workersmay take extraordinary precautions when dealing with a known carrier, butare often unaware that they may treat five carriers for each one they recognize.This is a key point in understanding the rationale for the concept of ``universalprecautions,'' and for use of HB vaccine in workers with exposure to blood.Although the risk of encountering HBV carriers may vary in the hospitalsetting, being highest in inner city referral hospitals dealing with highrisk groups such as drug abusers and homosexual men, risk will be presentin any work setting where human blood is encountered. The risk of HBV carriagein the general population is uniform (does not markedly vary with regionof this country) (Ex. 6-390), and high risk groups such as Southeast Asianrefugees, mentally retarded individuals, and occult drug abusers may befound in rural as well as urban settings. Percutaneous exposure to blood through needlesticks and cuts with othersharp instruments are visible and efficient modes of transmission, butreported injuries do not account for the majority of infections in healthcareworkers (Ex. 6-65, Ex. 6-427). This fact often goes unrecognized by workman'scompensation boards, which sometimes deny coverage to infected workersunless they had reported a discrete needlestick or similar injury froma HBsAg positive patient. Some workers doing traumatic procedures get cuts,needlesticks or large blood exposures so frequently that they do not botherto report them; other workers become infected when the blood of an unsuspectedHBV carrier gets into a small preexisting skin lesion or is rubbed intothe eye. Prevention of these occupational infections is the goal of thisproposed standard. <ITAG tagnum="81">Transmission from HCWs to Patients </ITAG>Transmission of HBV from healthcare workers to patients is an uncommonbut extremely serious consequence of healthcare worker infection. Fewerthan twenty episodes of this type of transmission have been reported, althoughinstances involving only a few patients may go unrecognized or unreported(Ex. 6-103, F. 6-446, Ex. 6-476, Ex. 4-471 Ex. 6-144). Most instances haveinvolved oral surgeons, dentists, gynecologists, or surgeons, occupationswhere significant blood exposure, trauma, and use of sharp instrumentsoccur routinely. Some episodes have involved transmission to between 20and 55 patients, with deaths and secondary transmission to family membersof patients occurring (Ex. 6-103, Ex. 6-144). Most healthcare workers who have transmitted to patients have several factorsin common (Ex. 6-476, Ex. 6-471):<ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The dentists and surgeons were chronic HBV carriers, had hightiters of virus in their blood (HBeAg positive), and were unaware thatthey were infected. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Transmission occurred most frequently during the most traumaticprocedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The dental personnel who transmitted did not routinely wear gloves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The dentists and surgeons often had a personal medical problem(such as exudative dermatitis on the hands), or used techniques that madetransmission more likely. Several of the gynecologists used their indexfingers to feel for the tip of the suture needle when they were performingdeep abdominal surgery.</ITAG>It is important to differentiate between HBV carrier personnel who haveand have not transmitted to patients (Ex. 6-476, Ex. 6-471, Ex. 6-418).Among HBV carrier healthcare workers, few ever transmit HBV to patientcontacts; when patients who have been treated by known HBV carriers havebeen followed prospectively, HBV transmission has not been observed (Ex.6-418, Fv 6-432). The CDC has stated that HBV carrier healthcare workersmay work in any occupation as long as they understand the modes of transmissionof hepatitis B and take the measures necessary to prevent transmission(Ex. 6-471, Ex. 6-162, Ex. 6-70). These measures are the same measuresall healthcare workers performing the same tasks should follow. <ITAG tagnum="81">Transmission Via Environment </ITAG>Transmission of HBV infection from exposure to contaminated environmentalsurfaces has been documented to be a major mode of HBV spread in certainsettings, particularly hemodialysis units (Ex. 6-56, Ex. 6-446, Ex. 6-480,Ex. 6-461). The virus can survive for at least one week dried at room temperatureon environmental surfaces, and medical procedures as well as disinfectionand sterilization techniques must be adequate to prevent the spread ofthis virus (Ex. 6-422, Ex. 6-458). HBV contaminated blood from the surfaceof dialysis machines and carried on the hands of medical personnel to patientshas been postulated as the mechanism of transmission in dialysis units.Unsterilized or improperly sterilized acupuncture needles have been implicatedas the cause of large outbreaks of HBV infection (Ex. 6-439). Potentialproblems of environmental contamination in the dental operatory have beendiscussed in the CDC guidelines for dental operations (Ex. 6-490).HBV is thought to be far less resistant to sterilization and disinfectionprocedures than microbial endospores or mycobacteria used as referencecriteria (Ex. 6-421). Any sterilization or disinfection procedure or productapproved by the Environmental Protection Agency as a sterilizing agentor high level disinfectant will kill the virus if used as directed. Dilutesolutions of sodium hypochlorite (household bleach) are particularly effectiveand inexpensive, although they may be corrosive or damaging to certainmaterials. Certain low-level ``germicides'' such as quaternary ammoniumcompounds are not considered to be effective against the virus (Ex. 6-422).Unfortunately, soaking medical and dental instruments in these solutionsis a common and potentially dangerous procedure, since health workers mayhandle the sharp instruments soaked in these solutions with a false senseof security. Methods Of Control <T3>Hepatitis B Vaccine.</T3> In 1982 a safe, immunogenic and effectiveHB vaccine was licensed in the U.S. and was recommended for use in healthcareworkers with blood or needle exposure in the workplace (Ex. 6-199). A secondvaccine, produced in yeast by recombinant technology was licensed in 1987,and additional vaccine licenses are expected in the near future (Ex. 6-200).In 1988, CDC estimated that 1.4 million persons have received these vaccinein the U.S., and an estimated 85% of them have been healthcare workers.It is estimated that 30% to 40% of high-risk healthcare workers have beenvaccinated in this country (Ex. 6-200). HB vaccination is the most importantpart of any HBV control program. Gloving and other protective devices cannotprevent puncture injuries from needles and other sharp instruments. Onlyvirtually complete immunization of workers at risk of HBV infection willprovide acceptable control of this occupational hazard. Early efforts to immunize healthcare workers were hindered by fear thatthe plasma derived vaccine might be unsafe. The AIDS epidemic was justbeing recognized, and there was concern that the plasma derived HB vaccinemight contain the infectious agent causing AIDS. Concerns about the safetyof the plasma derived vaccine have been adequately studied and addressed(Ex. 6-199). The procedures used to manufacture the vaccine were shownto inactivate HIV virus and representatives of all known viral groups.The vaccine was shown not to contain HIV DNA, and those receiving vaccinedo not develop anti-HIV antibodies. Finally, intensive surveillance ofreported AIDS cases revealed that all of those cases who had received vaccinewere also members of known AIDS high risk groups, such as homosexuallyactive men or IV drug users. The yeast-derived vaccines contain no humanplasma and there is no possibility that they could be infectious for HIV(Ex. 6-200). The currently licensed HB vaccines are given in three doses over a sixmonth period. These vaccines induce protective antibody levels in 85% to97% of healthy adults. Protection against both the illness and the developmentof the carrier state lasts at least seven years (the duration of follow-upstudies), although antibody in many individuals will decay below detectablelevels within seven years after immunization. (Ex. 6-200, Ex. 6-435). Ifthese individuals are exposed to HBV, they develop a rapid (anamnestic)antibody response and do not become ill or develop the HBV carrier state.The ACIP has not currently recommended that a booster dose of HB vaccinebe given after the initial series but may do so in the future if significantbreakthrough infections occur in vaccinated individuals. Persons planning HB vaccine programs may consider the need for prevaccinationand post-vaccination testing for antibody (Ex. 6-200, Ex. 6-199). Prevaccinationtesting for antibody to identify previously infected individuals who donot need vaccine is a requirement of the proposed standard. This prescreeningis often cost-effective, depending on the likelihood of prior HBV infectionand the costs of testing and vaccination. An algorithm to assist with thisdetermination has been published by the ACIP (6-199). Discussions on theissues surrounding the option of post-vaccination testing have also beenpublished; and at this time post-vaccination testing is not considerednecessary unless poor response to vaccine is anticipated. Post-Exposure Prophylaxis Percutaneous and mucous membrane exposures to blood occur and will continueto occur in the healthcare setting (Ex. 6-431, 6-468). HBV infection isthe major infectious risk that occurs from these exposures, and needlesticksfrom HBsAg positive individuals will infect 7% to 30% of susceptible healthcareworkers (Ex. 6-27, Ex. 4-28). Fortunately, effective post-exposure prophylaxisexists for HBV exposures if appropriate protocols are followed. HepatitisB Immune Globulin given in two injections one month apart is about 75%effective in preventing clinical hepatitis B if it can be given withinseven days of an HBsAg positive needlestick. The addition of HB vaccinemay substantially increase the post-exposure efficacy over that of HBIGalone and will also provide long term protection (Ex. 6-199). HB vaccineis recommended for any previously unvaccinated healthcare worker who hasa needlestick or other percutaneous accident with a sharp instrument. <T3>Non-A, non-B Hepatitis</T3>. Non-A, non-B hepatitis in the United Statesis caused by more than one viral agent, and remains a diagnosis of exclusion(Ex. 6-437, Ex. 6-429, Ex. 6-449). Despite intensive research over thelast decade, little progress was made in identifying the causative agents,and no serologic (blood) test is available to detect or study this infectiondirectly. Nevertheless, in the past year, a candidate virus has been detected,and intensive work to verify this as the major non-A, non-B virus and todevelop serologic tests is underway. Availability of direct tests willhelp in clearly defining the importance of bloodborne transmission of thisvirus in the workplace (Ex. 6-502, Ex. 6-503). Non-A, non-B viruses cause between 15-35% of acute hepatitis cases in theUnited States, primarily in adults (Ex. 6-47, Ex. 6-39). The principalmode of transmission in the United States is bloodborne; major risk groupsare IV drug users and transfusion recipients, who account for 40% of cases.Over 90% of post-transfusion hepatitis is due to the non-A, non-B virus(es),and an estimated 3-8% of healthy blood donors appear to chronically carrythis virus (Ex. 6-429, Ex. 6-449). Non-A, non-B hepatitis viruses causenot only acute hepatitis, but also chronic hepatitis; 40-60% of infectionslead to development of chronic hepatitis, with potential for progressionto cirrhosis and for infectivity to others for the duration of life (Ex.6-429, Ex. 6-449). The amount of virus present in the blood of acutelyor chronically infected persons is modest, usually andless; 1000 infectiousdoses per milliliter, although occasionally up to 1000 times higher (Ex.6-423). Thus, relative infectivity of blood is 100 to 100,000 fold lowerthan with hepatitis B virus. Relative infectivity of other body fluidsis not known. The predominant mode of non-A, non-B transmission in the U.S. is, likethat of HBV, bloodborne, and some evidence indicates that non-A, non-Bhepatitis also presents an occupational risk to healthcare workers. About5-9% of non-A, non-B cases occur in persons who work in healthcare professions,and in one study such persons were at significantly elevated risk of infection(Ex. 6-39, Ex. 6-47; Ex. 6-217). In addition, at least one episode of transmissionof non-A, non-B hepatitis from an acutely infected patient to a nurse byneedlestick has been reported (Ex. 6-455). Furthermore, non-A, non-B hepatitistransmission from infected patients to other patients and to staff hasbeen reported from hemodialysis units; several outbreaks have been observedin this setting, and an incidence of 1.8% of non-A, non-B hepatitis amonghemodialysis patients nationwide was observed in 1983 (Ex. 6-462, Ex. 6-386).While pathways of transmission in this setting have not been rigorouslydocumented, bloodborne transmission by environmental contamination, similarto that of HBV, can be presumed to occur. Given the facts that non-A, non-B hepatitis in the United States is largelydue to a bloodborne virus, that between 3-8% of healthy persons likelyare virus carriers, and that up to 50% of infections may progress to chronicliver disease, non-A, non-B hepatitis must be considered a potentiallyimportant risk in the workplace. The evidence of lower concentration ofvirus in blood of infected persons, and paucity of data clearly demonstratingthis as an occupational illness of healthcare workers suggest it is likelyto be less important than HBV; nevertheless, availability of specific testsin the next few years may better address the magnitude of risk.Because the primary mode of transmission is bloodborne, and a large asymptomaticcarrier reservoir exists, precautions to prevent non-A, non-B hepatitistransmission in the workplace are identical for those of other bloodborneviruses such as HBV (Ex. 6-461, Ex. 6-74, Ex. 6-426). Several studies haveevaluated the efficacy of immunoglobulin (IG) prophylaxis following parenteralexposure, but results have been equivocal (Ex. 6-447, Ex. 6-436). Nevertheless,the CDC considers it reasonable to give IG as treatment to a healthcareworker after percutaneous exposure to blood from a known non-A, non-B infectedpatient (Ex. 6-199). C. Human Immunodeficiency Virus <ITAG tagnum="81">Introduction </ITAG>In June of 1981, the first cases were reported in the United States ofwhat was to become known as Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) (Ex.6-382). Investigators described a new clinical entity characterized by<T3>Pneumocystis carinii</T3> pneumonia (PCP) and Kaposi's sarcoma (KS)that had developed in young, homosexual men without a known underlyingdisease or a history of immunosuppressive therapy (Ex. 6-359, Ex. 6-380).By early 1982, 159 AIDS cases had been identified in 15 states, the Districtof Columbia and 2 foreign countries. All but 1 of these were men, over92% of whom were homosexual or bisexual (Ex. 6-359). By the end of 1982,cases of AIDS were reported among children (Ex. 6-380), intravenous (IV)drug users (Ex. 6-380), blood transfusion recipients (Ex. 6-380), hemophiliapatients treated with clotting factor concentrates (Ex. 6-380), and Haitians(Ex. 6-349). In 1983 the disease was also documented among female sexualpartners of male IV drug users in the U.S. and among Africans (Ex. 6-349).By the close of 1985, all 50 states, the District of Columbia and threeU.S. territories had reported AIDS cases (Ex. 6-359). During 1983 and 1984, French and American scientists independently isolateda human virus associated with AIDS. Dr. Luc Montagnier and co-workers,of the Institut Pasteur in Paris, called it lymphadenopahty associatedvirus (LAV). Dr. Robert Gallo and co-workers at the National Cancer Instituteidentified this virus as human T-cell lymphotropic virus type III (HTLV-1)(Ex. 6-380). Eventually human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) becamethe universally accepted term for the virus (Ex. 6-383). (In this document,unless specifically noted, HIV refers to HIV-1.) The Centers for Disease Control estimates that in the United States, between1 million and 1.5 million persons are infected with HIV-1 (Ex. 6-356).As of February, 1989, 88,096 cases of AIDS had been reported to the CDC,at least 50,670 (57.5%) of whom had died (Ex. 6-478). Although the rateof spread of HIV-1 in the future is unknown, scientists with the U.S. PublicHealth Service (Ex. 6-356) have estimated that in the United States alone,a cumulative total of more than 365,000 cases of AIDS will have been reportedby 1992 with 80,000 new cases diagnosed during that year. It is projectedthat there will be 66,000 deaths that year and 263,000 cumulative deaths.It is expected that a total of 172,000 AIDS patients will require medicalcare in 1992. Of perhaps greater importance for healthcare workers is the 1 million-1.5million persons who are infected with HIV, often unknowingly so, and whorequire medical treatment for unrelated conditions. For example, in a studyexamining 203 anonymous serum samples from a group of critically ill orseverely injured patients treated at the Johns Hopkins University HospitalDepartment of Emergency Medicine (serving many indigent patients in anurban area), Baker and co-workers (Ex. 6-111) found HIV antibody in 3%as detected by both enzyme-linked immunoassay (EIA) and Western blot. Ina subgroup of this population, trauma victims between the ages of 25 and34, 16% were seropositive for HIV. These individuals were bleeding andtheir treatment involved multiple invasive procedures. In a more recentstudy at an inner city emergency department, Kelen and co-workers testedblood samples from 2,302 consecutive adult patients for the presence ofHIV antibodies. One hundred and nineteen patients (5.2%) were seropositivefor HIV, 92 (4%) of whom had ``unrecognized HIV infection'' (Ex. 6-370).There are published reports of 25 healthcare workers who apparently wereinfected with HIV through occupational exposure to blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials. Some infections are likely to go unrecognized forseveral years until the HIV-infected individual develops AIDS. The numberof documented HIV seroconversions among healthcare workers is low at present.However, if effective preventive procedures are not instituted, it is likelyto increase as the number of infected individuals requiring healthcareincreases. The increasing number of individuals with AIDS, the large number of unidentifiedHIV infections, and the reports of occupational infection all indicatethat healthcare workers are at risk for occupationally acquired HIV infection.<ITAG tagnum="81">The Virus </ITAG>HIV is a member of a group of viruses known as human retroviruses. Itsgenetic material is ribonucleic acid (RNA) rather than deoxyribonucleicacid (DNA), the genetic material found in most living organisms. The virusparticle is comprised of a core containing the RNA and viral enzymes surroundedby an envelope consisting of lipids and proteins (Ex. 6-380, pp. 131-154).Because they lack the cellular machinery necessary to reproduce, all virusesmust reproduce intracellularly, that is, within the host cell. HIV replicatesin human macrophages and T4 lymphocytes, two types of human cells thatare vital components of the immune system. T4 lymphocytes and a few othercell types have protein molecules on their surfaces called CD4 antigensor receptors. HIV particles bind with the CD4 receptor sites of the hosts'cells and then release their viral RNA. The RNA is then transcribed byviral enzymes into double-stranded DNA that is incorporated into the DNAof the host cell. The viral DNA then serves as a template to produce morevirus particles. The transcription of RNA to DNA is the reverse of whatoccurs in most organisms and thus HIV is called a retrovirus. The processoccurs with the aid of the viral enzyme reverse transcriptase, which isconsidered to be a marker for retrovirus production (Ex. 6-384; Ex. 6-175;Ex. 6-380, pp. 186-249). HIV gradually depletes the number of cells which are essential for hostimmune function, rendering the infected individual increasingly susceptibleto opportunistic infections (Ex. 6-360; Ex. 6-380, pp. 131-154). Circulating macrophages are also considered a reservoir as well as anothertarget for HIV infection. Since some macrophages can circulate freely throughoutthe body, they may actually transport HIV to the brain which may lead toneurologic complications (Ex. 6-384). <ITAG tagnum="81">Serologic Testing </ITAG>Infection with HIV may be identified through testing the blood for thepresence of HIV antibodies. Tests were first licensed for use in the UnitedStates in 1985 (Ex. 6-380, pp. 1-17) and have been used routinely to screendonated blood, blood components and blood products, and by physicians andclinics to diagnose HIV infection in patients. The military also uses theantibody tests to screen recruit applicants and active duty personnel forHIV infection (Ex. 6-380, pp. 1-17). Although the antibodies do not appearto defend or protect the host against HIV, they serve as markers of viralinfection. Most people infected with HIV have detectable antibodies within6 months of infection, with the majority generating detectable antibodiesbetween 6 and 12 weeks (Ex. 6-204). There have been a few reports of seroconversionas late as 14 months after infection (Ex. 6-183).The enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA or EIA) technique used todetect HIV antibodies is sensitive, economical and easy to perform. However,as with all laboratory determinations, this test can produce a false positiveresult, that is, the test gives a positive result when HIV antibody isnot present. Therefore, current recommendations include repeating the ELISAtest if the first test was positive. If the second test is also positive,a more specific test, usually employing the Western blot technique, isused to validate the ELISA results. A positive ELISA test and a positiveWestern blot result indicate the presence of HIV antibodies and HIV infection(Ex. 6-345). Although many new tests are still in the experimental stages, one thatis being developed uses the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) technique.This test detects integrated viral DNA rather than antibody and it mayhave the potential to detect the HIV infection earlier than currently availableantibody tests (Ex. 6-329). Transmission HIV has been isolated from human blood, semen, breast milk, vaginal secretions,saliva, tears, urine, cerebrospinal fluid, and amniotic fluid; however,epidemiologic evidence implicates only blood, semen, vaginal secretionsand breast milk in the transmission of the virus (Ex. 6-317). Documented modes of HIV transmission include: engaging in sexual intercoursewith an HIV-infected person; using needles contaminated with the virus;having parenteral, mucous membrane or non-intact skin contact with HIV-infectedblood, blood components or blood products (Ex. 6-349); receiving transplantsof HIV-infected organs and tissues including bone (Ex. 6-327, Ex. 6-310),or transfusions of HIV-infected blood (Ex. 6-349); and perinatal transmission(from mother to child around the time of birth) (Ex. 6-349). HIV is not transmitted by casual contact. Studies evaluating nearly 500household contacts of individuals diagnosed with AIDS reveal no cases ofHIV infection of household members who had no other risk factors for thevirus (including no sexual contact with or exposure to blood from the infectedperson) (Ex. 6-349). Friedland and Klein (Ex. 6-349) examined householdmembers who lived with a person with AIDS for at least 3 months and withinan 18-month period prior to the onset of symptoms in the infected person(during which time infection was presumably present.) Other household membershad been unaware of the infected individual's HIV status, and had not takenprecautions during this time period. This study produced no evidence thatHIV was transmitted by shaking hands or talking, by sharing food, eatingutensils, plates, drinking glasses or towels, by sharing the same houseor household facilities or by ``personal interactions expected of familymembers'' including hugging and kissing on the cheek or lips. Other studieshave shown that HIV is not transmitted by mosquitoes or other animals (Ex.6-328). The vast majority of people with AIDS in the United States can be placedin known transmission categories and the proportion of infected personsassociated with each group has remained relatively stable since reportingbegan in this country in 1981. For adults and adolescents, the transmissioncategories are shown in Table 1.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s25,10 </C><T4>Table</T4> 1 \1\._ <T4>AIDS Transmission Categories </T4><H1>Transmission Group </H1><H1>Percent of cumulative total AIDS cases</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Homosexual/bisexual men <D>62% </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Intravenous drug users <D>20% </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Homosexual/bisexual men who are also IV drug users <D>7% </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">\2\ Heterosexual persons <D>4% </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Transfusion recipients <D>3% </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Persons with hemophilia/coagulation disorders <D>1% </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">\3\ Undetermined <D>3% </D><F>\1\ AIDS Weekly Surveillance Report U.S., November 14, 1988 (Ex. 6-379).</F><F>\2\ Includes persons who have had heterosexual contact with a personwith AIDS or at risk for AIDS or who have no other identified risks butwere born in countries in which heterosexual transmission is believed toplay a major role although the precise means of transmission have not beenfully defined. </F><F>\3\ Includes persons for whom risk information is incomplete due todeath, refusal to be interviewed or loss to follow-up, patients still underinvestigation, men reported only to have had heterosexual contact witha prostitute, interviewed patients for whom no specific risk was identifiedand one healthcare worker who seroconverted to HIV and developed AIDS aftera documented needlestick exposure to blood.</F></ITAG></ITAG> In the U.S., more than 1,000 cases of AIDS have been reported in children(Ex. 6-364). Most (78%) of the cases are children born to mothers infectedwith the virus (Ex. 6-364, Ex. 6-349). These mothers transmit the virusto their children prenatally, during birth or during infancy through breast-feedingalthough the latter is rare (Ex. 6-349). Other cases in children are inhemophiliacs (6%) and transfusion recipients (13%) (Ex. 6-349). Although the efficiency for most routes of HIV transmission is unknown,some routes of transmission are clearly more efficient than others. Therisk of infection from receipt of transfused blood from an HIV-infecteddonor is approximately 90% (Ex. 6-371). The risk of perinatal transmissionfrom an HIV infected mother is estimated to be 30-50% or higher (Ex. 6-384,Ex. 6-349). Besides the particular route of transmission, other variablescontributing to transmissibility may include susceptibility of the host,the virulence of the particular ``HIV isolate'' or strain, the stage ofinfection of the source, and the dose of virus and the size of inoculumtransmitted (Ex. 6-348, Ex. 6-349). This last factor, the actual amountof virus, may be very important in the likelihood of transmission sinceit appears there is a greater probability of infection from HIV contaminatedblood transfusions (890 infections per 1,000 persons transfused with contaminatedblood) than from accidental needlesticks with needles that have been contaminatedwith HIV (3-5 infections per 1,000 persons injured with contaminated needles)(Ex. 6-384; Ex. 6-349; Ex. 6-371).<ITAG tagnum="81">Human Immunodeficiency Virus Type-2 </ITAG>A case of AIDS in a person from Africa, caused by another human retrovirus,human immunodeficiency virus type 2 (HIV-2), was diagnosed and reportedin the United States in December, 1987 (Ex. 6-308). HIV-2 appears to besimilar to HIV-1 in modes of transmission and natural history but has notyet been studied in as much detail. Although HIV-2 is unquestionably pathogenic,there is still much to be learned regarding its epidemiology, pathogenesisand efficiency of transmission. Although only one case of HIV-2 has beenreported in the United States, the infection is endemic in West Africa,where it was first linked with AIDS in 1986. There have also been casesof HIV-2 infection reported among West Africans living in Europe. Serologic tests licensed for detecting HIV-1 can detect only 42-92% ofHIV-2 infections, but HIV-2 surveillance is being conducted in the UnitedStates to monitor the frequency of occurrence using specific tests notyet available commercially (Ex. 6-308). <ITAG tagnum="81">Clinical Manifestations of Disease </ITAG>HIV adversely affects the immune system, rendering the infected individualvulnerable to a wide range of clinical disorders. These conditions, someof which tend to recur, can be aggressive, rapidly progressive, difficultto treat, and less responsive to traditional modes of treatment. They usuallylead to the death of the HIV-infected patient (Ex. 6-361). The CDC hasdivided the disease progression into several stages, depending on the typeof signs or symptoms of infection. The order of groups appears to followa basic pattern or chronology of disease regardless of mode of transmission(Ex. 6-270). <T3>Group I: </T3>Within a month after exposure, an individual may experienceacute retroviral syndrome, the first clinical evidence of HIV infection.This is a mononucleosis-like syndrome with signs and symptoms that caninclude fever, lymphadenopathy, myalgias, arthralgias, diarrhea, fatigue,and rash. Acute retroviral syndrome is usually self-limiting and followedor accompanied by the development of antibodies (Ex. 6-270). <T3>Group II: </T3>Although most persons infected with HIV develop antibodiesto the virus within 6-12 weeks after exposure, most of these individualsare asymptomatic for months to years following infection. However, theycan transmit the virus to others throughout this time (Ex. 6-270). <T3>Group III: </T3>Although no other signs or symptoms are experienced,some HIV-infected patients will develop a persistent, generalized lymphadenopathy(PGL) that lasts more than 3 months (Ex. 6-270). <T3>Group IV: </T3>The clinical manifestations of patients in this groupmay vary extensively. Some of these HIV-infected patients may experience``constitutional disease,'' also known as HIV ``wasting syndrome,'' whichmay be characterized by severe, involuntary weight loss, chronic diarrhea,constant or intermittent weakness, and fever for 30 days or longer (Ex.6-270). This syndrome in and of itself may result in death. Epidemiologic information indicates that most persons who are infectedwith HIV will eventually develop AIDS (Ex. 6-384). AIDS can result in severeopportunistic infections that an individual with a normal immune systemwould only rarely experience, as well as a wide range of neurologic andoncogenic or neoplastic processes (Ex. 6-270). Individuals with AIDS maydevelop HIV encephalopathy, dementia, myelopathy or peripheral neuropathy.This may occur when HIV infects mononuclear cells present in the cerebrospinalfluid surrounding the brain and spinal cord or infects these cells withinthe brain or spinal cord. Persons with dementia experience varying degreesof cognitive disability or impairment of intellectual function and motordisability or dysfunction. Effects ranging from apathy and depression tomemory loss and severe dementia may interfere with a person's occupationas well as activities of daily living and can ultimately be fatal (Ex.6-380, pp. 548-578; Ex. 6-270). In addition, the virus is capable of affectingthe peripheral nervous system causing severe pain and weakness or numbnessin the limbs (peripheral neuropathy) (Ex. 6-270). According to CDC's case definition (Ex. 6-157), there are specific diseasesthat are considered indicators of AIDS if laboratory tests for HIV werenot performed or gave inconclusive results and no other known causes ofimmunodeficiency are present. Among these are parasitic diseases such as<T3>Pneumocystis carinii </T3>pneumonia, the most common opportunisticinfection and cause of death in AIDS patients; fungal diseases such ascandidiasis of the esophagus, trachea, bronchi or lungs; viral diseasessuch as cytomegalovirus disease of an organ other than the liver, spleenor lymph nodes; cancer/neoplastic diseases such as Kaposi's sarcoma affectingpersons under 60 years of age; and bacterial infections such as <T3>Mycobacterium avium </T3>complex (Ex. 6-157; Ex. 6-361). In addition to the diseases listed above there are diseases caused by organismssuch as disseminated or extra-pulmonary <T3>Mycobacterium tuberculosis </T3>(TB) which may be considered indicativeof AIDS if substantiated by reactive HIV-antibody tests (Ex. 6-157).<ITAG tagnum="21">Unlike adults, children under 13 years of age can be classified ashaving AIDS if they experience lymphoid interstitial pneumonia or pulmonarylymphoid hyperplasia (LIP-PLH complex). Children who are seropositive forHIV can be classified as having AIDS if they experience recurring seriousbacterial infections such as septicemia, pneumonia, meningitis, bone orjoint infection, or abscess of an internal organ or body cavity causedby <T3>Haemophilus, Streptococcus </T3>or other pyogenic bacteria (Ex. 6-157).</ITAG>AIDS is primarily managed by treating clinical disease symptoms, but conventionaltherapy cannot reverse the immunodeficiency (Ex. 6-361). Currently, researchersare testing experimental drugs and conducting a number of treatment protocolson patients at various stages of infection or disease. At this time, onlyone antiviral drug, Zidovudine or Retrovir TM, (formerly known as azidothymidineor AZT) has been approved by the FDA for some patients, specifically thosewho have experienced <T3>Pneumocystis carinii </T3>pneumonia (PCP), or are symptomatic for AIDS-relatedillness and have less than 200 T4 cells/ml (Ex. 6-479). Although some patientshave had to discontinue the drug due to severe side effects, clinical trialshave shown the drug to prolong the life of AIDS patients (Ex. 6-383, pp.153-165). There is no vaccine to prevent HIV infection (Ex. 6-384).<ITAG tagnum="81">Occupational Exposure And HIV Infections </ITAG>Occupational transmission of HIV has been documented in healthcare workers.Twenty-five cases of HIV infection associated with occupational exposureare summarized below. These cases represent a spectrum of healthcare personnelincluding, among others, nurses, laboratory workers and a dentist. In 16of these cases exposure to the blood of HIV infected individuals occurredby needlestick. Two infections were believed to have resulted from cutswith sharp, HIV-contaminated objects. In 7 cases, exposure occurred viamucous membrane or non-intact skin. Two workers were exposed to highlyconcentrated volumes of HIV; l by a cut with a sharp, HIV-contaminatedobject and l through skin exposure. For the 25 cases, HIV status was determined by HIV-antibody testing. Baselineserologic data indicating a non-reactive HIV-antibody status post-exposurewas available for at least 18 of the individuals, all of whom were laterdetermined to have seroconverted to an HIV-antibody-positive status. All25 denied other known risk factors for HIV infection, but in cases wherethe baseline serologic data were unknown, other modes of transmission cannotbe ruled out. Nevertheless, all cases were investigated for risk factorsand none were identified. In addition to these cases, as of September 1988there were at least 44 healthcare workers with AIDS for whom no risk factorshave been identified after thorough investigation (Ex. 6-378), providingfurther, though not as strong, evidence of occupational transmission .<ITAG tagnum="81">Case Reports </ITAG><T3>Case 1:</T3> A hospital healthcare worker sustained an accidental self-inflictedinjection of ``several milliliters of blood while obtaining blood in avacuum collection tube from an AIDS patient'' (Ex. 6-365). The healthcareworker subsequently seroconverted to an HIV-antibody-positive status andhas since developed AIDS. Having determined there were no other HIV riskfactors for this individual, investigators concluded the worker acquiredthe infection occupationally. <T3>Case 2:</T3> In November 1985, a previously healthy, 33 year old UnitedStates Navy hospital corpsman punctured his fingertip while disposing ofa phlebotomy needle used to draw blood from a patient who was later diagnosedwith <T3>Pneumocystis carinii</T3> pneumonia and serologically tested HIV-positive(Ex. 6-337). Upon learning of this diagnosis two weeks after the incident,the corpsman submitted to HIV serology testing on a monthly basis and wasHIV-negative for 3 months. Five months after the incident, he experienceda characteristic acute retroviral syndrome, which was self-limiting. Sixmonths after the incident he tested HIV-positive. He reported a negativehistory of other risk factors for HIV, and his wife was seronegative. <T3>Case 3:</T3> Weiss and co-workers (Ex. 6-187) reported that a laboratoryworker, who worked with concentrated HIV-1, tested seropositive for thevirus (See EPIDEMIOLOGIC STUDIES). Clinical evaluation revealed no signsor symptoms of HIV-related illness. As part of routine laboratory duties,this individual was involved in several possible exposure circumstancessuch as decontaminating equipment, cleaning up spills or touching potentiallycontaminated surfaces with gloved hands. Virus-positive culture fluid hadoccasionally leaked from equipment and contaminated centrifuge rotors.Although reportedly using Biosafety level 3 precautions, the subject wasnot fully knowledgeable with and did not strictly follow these practicesall of the time. The subject did not recall any direct skin exposure but did report havinghad a nonspecific dermatitis on the arm, although the ``affected area wasalways covered by a cloth laboratory gown.'' The individual also reportedincidents where he had pinholes or tears in his gloves and had to changethem immediately. Strains of HIV-1 isolated from different individuals generally differ significantly,but the HIV-1 isolated from this subject was indistinguishable from 1 ofthe 2 predominant HIV genotypes this individual worked with in the laboratory.Although no specific exposure incident had been identified, the investigatorsconcluded that the subject acquired the HIV infection in the laboratory,most likely through undetected skin contact with the concentrated virus.<T3>Case 4:</T3> A female phlebotomist reported that blood splattered onher face and in her mouth when the top of a 10-ml vacuum blood collectiontube flew off while she was collecting a patient's blood (which subsequentlytested HIV-positive) (Ex. 6-109). The HCW was wearing gloves and glassesand reported that no blood got in her eyes. She reported no open woundsbut did have facial acne. She washed off the blood immediately after exposure.Her blood tested HIV-negative one day post-exposure and 8 weeks later.However, when donating blood 9 months after exposure, she was HIV-antibodypositive. She denied having other known risk factors for HIV. <T3>Case 5:</T3> A female medical technologist was exposed to a blood spillthat covered most of her hands and forearms while she was manipulatingan apheresis machine (Ex. 6-109), a machine that separates blood components,retains some, and returns the remainder to the donor. Although she wasnot wearing gloves, she did not report any open wounds on her hands orany mucous membrane exposure. However, she did have dermatitis on her earand may have touched that ear. Eight weeks after the incident she experiencedsymptoms of acute retroviral syndrome. She was HIV-negative 5 days postexposure; however, 3 months after exposure she was HIV-antibody positive.She denied having other known risk factors for AIDS. Her husband also deniedany risk factors for AIDS and tested HIV seronegative. <T3>Case 6:</T3> Neisson-Vernant and co-workers (Ex. 6-93) reported thata ``24-year-old female student nurse pricked the fleshy part of her indexfinger with a needle used to draw blood from an AIDS patient.'' She didnot recall injecting blood. Two months later signs and symptoms of acuteretroviral illness appeared, including fever and a macular eruption lasting3 days. Although she tested HIV-negative 1 month after the incident, shetested positive 6 months after exposure. She denied all other risk factorsfor HIV and her husband tested HIV negative 6 and 9 months after her exposure.<T3>Case 7:</T3> Michelet and co-workers (Ex. 6-369) reported a case ofoccupationally acquired HIV infection in a female nurse in France. Havingdrawn a blood sample in a vacuum tube from an individual with AIDS, shestuck her finger with the large-bore needle of the adapter, but reportedlydid not inject any blood. Immediately after the incident, she placed herfinger in 0.5% sodium hypochlorite solution in accordance with the hospital'sguidelines. Twenty-three days after exposure, she developed signs and symptomsof acute retroviral syndrome, including abdominal cramps, nausea, vomiting,and diarrhea. She later experienced anorexia, fatigue and facial palsy.Clinical evaluation found generalized lymphadenopathy. Although she testedHIV-antibody negative 13 days after the incident she was HIV-antibody positive71 days post-exposure. Investigators failed to identify any risk factorfor HIV for the nurse or her husband, who tested HIV-antibody negative62 days after his wife's exposure incident. <T3>Case 8:</T3> An NIH clinical laboratory worker sustained a cut thatpenetrated through a glove and the skin when a vial of HIV-infected bloodbroke in the worker's hand (Ex. 6-348). Although initially testing negative,the individual subsequently tested positive and investigators have linkedthe infection with the accident. <T3>Case 9:</T3> Oksenhendler and co-workers (Ex. 6-18) reported that afemale nurse in France stuck her finger superficially while recapping aneedle contaminated by bloody pleural fluid from a patient positive forboth HBsAg and HIV. Immediately post-exposure she received the HBV vaccineand specific immunoglobulins. She experienced acute retroviral syndromeincluding fever, fatigue and vomiting 25 days after the incident. Fifty-threedays after exposure, she developed an acute ``anicteric'' hepatitis (possiblyrelated to the primary HIV infection.) Although she tested HIV-negativeafter the exposure (days l and 13), she tested HIV-positive on day 68.She and her husband denied other known risk factors for HIV and her husbandtested seronegative for HIV 110 days after the incident.<T3>Case 10:</T3> A nurse from England received a needlestick injury toa finger while resheathing a hypodermic needle on a syringe containingan AIDS patient's blood from an arterial line (Ex. 4-41). A small amountof blood may have been injected as well. Signs and symptoms of acute retroviralsyndrome presented 13 days after exposure with a rash developing 17 daysafter the incident. Although she tested HIV-negative 27 days post injury, she was determinedto be HIV-positive on day 49. She denied other known risk factors for HIV.<T3>Cases 11, 12 and 13:</T3> Marcus and co-workers (Ex. 6-372) reported3 cases of healthcare workers who seroconverted to an HIV-antibody-positivestatus. One healthcare worker sustained a deep needlestick injury inflictedby a co-worker with a 21-gauge needle while attempting to resuscitate anAIDS patient. The healthcare worker was HIV-antibody and antigen negativethe day after the exposure. Four weeks after the incident the worker experiencedfever, ``shaking chills,'' night sweats, lymphadenopathy, and malaise whichlasted about 4 days. One hundred twenty-one days after the exposure theworker tested HIV-seropositive. The healthcare worker denied other knownrisk factors for HIV and a recent sex partner tested HIV-seronegative.A second healthcare worker accidentally stuck herself on two occasionswith needles that had been used on HIV-infected patients. The first exposureoccurred while recapping a needle that had been used on a patient withAIDS. Ten days later the worker stuck herself with a needle that had beenused to draw blood from a symptomatic HIV-infected individual. ``Afterremoving the tube of blood from the plastic needle holder, the healthcareworker placed the needle holder upright on its base, such that the needlewas pointed vertically into the air. The healthcare worker then turnedaway and subsequently injured herself on the exposed needle.'' The workertested positive for HIV-antibody and antigen 21 after the first exposure(11 days after the second.) She developed an acute viral illness four weeksafter the first incident, characterized by shaking chills, dehydration,nausea, malaise, bilateral lymphadenopathy and a weight loss of more than10 pounds. During this illness she was HIV-antibody negative; however,lymphocyte cultures were positive for HIV-antigen and reverse transcriptase,an enzyme which serves as a marker for HIV. The healthcare worker testedHIV-antibody positive on day 121 after the first exposure (111 days afterthe second exposure.) Four months after the exposure incidents, the worker'sspouse tested HIV-antibody negative (See EPIDEMIOLOGIC STUDIES). A third case, a healthcare worker, received a deep intramuscular needlestickinjury with a large bore needle and syringe unit visibly contaminated withblood from an AIDS patient (Ex. 4-39, Ex. 6-367). Fourteen days after theincident, acute retroviral syndrome developed. Although HIV-antibody negative9 days post-exposure, the healthcare worker was determined HIV-antibodypositive on day 184. The worker and the worker's spouse denied any otherrisk factors for AIDS and the spouse tested HIV-antibody negative 239 daysafter the incident (See EPIDEMIOLOGIC STUDIES). <T3>Case 14:</T3> Marcus and co-workers (Ex. 6-372) and McCray and co-workers(Ex. 4-39) reported a case where a female nurse received a puncture woundfrom a colonic biopsy needle (visibly contaminated with blood and feces)used in an AIDS patient. She tested HIV-positive approximately 10 monthsafter exposure although there were no serologic baseline data before orimmediately after the incident. She denied other risk factors for AIDS;however, her sexual partner also tested HIV-positive and heterosexual transmissiontherefore cannot be ruled out. <T3>Case 15:</T3> Gerberding and co-workers (Ex. 6-375) reported a caseof a healthcare worker who acquired HIV infection after sustaining a deepneedlestick injury with an HIV-contaminated needle (See EPIDEMIOLOGIC STUDIES).<T3>Case 16:</T3> Ramsey and co-workers (Ex. 6-373), conducted a prospectiveevaluation of 44 healthcare workers exposed to HIV and reported that onehealthcare worker seroconverted to an HIV-antibody positive status aftersustaining a needlestick from an HIV-contaminated needle. The worker hadbeen followed for at least 90 days after the exposure incident and hadnot reported any signs or symptoms of acute-retroviral illness. <T3>Case 17:</T3> Gioannini and co-workers (Ex. 6-334) reported that a37-year-old intensive care nurse in Italy ``had her hands, eyes and mouthheavily splashed'' with blood from an HIV-infected hemophiliac. Beginning11 days post-exposure, the nurse developed signs and symptoms of acuteretroviral illness including fever, fatigue, chills, arthralgias, cervicaland axillary lymphadenopathy and arthritis. She was hospitalized 18 daysafter the incident due to the severity of her symptoms plus progressiveincreases of aminotransferase levels. During her 55 day hospital stay theworker developed an acute, anicteric nonA-nonB hepatitis, which may havebeen associated with HIV infection. HIV antigen was detected in her bloodon day 21 and by day 43 she had seroconverted to an HIV-antibody-positivestatus. <T3>Case 18:</T3> A 32-year-old mother tested HIV-positive subsequent toproviding extensive healthcare to her male child with a ``congenital intestinalabnormality'' (Ex. 4-37). Having received multiple blood transfusions (oneof which was from an HIV-positive source) the child was tested and determinedHIV-positive at 24 months of age. Although the mother did not report anyneedlestick or other parenteral exposure to the child's blood, she recalledhaving had frequent hand contact with the child's blood and body fluids.She did not wear gloves and did not wash her hands immediately after exposure.She did not report having open wounds or exudative dermatitis on her hands.One month after the child tested HIV-positive, the mother was determinedto be seronegative for HIV. However, 4 months later she was determinedto be HIV-antibody-positive. She reported a negative history for otherrisk factors for HIV for herself and the child. The child's father wasseronegative for HIV. Investigators concluded the mother most probablyacquired the infection by providing her infected child healthcare thatinvolved extensive exposure to blood and body fluids without using infectioncontrol practices. <T3>Case 19:</T3> A laboratory worker apparently became infected in a laboratoryaccident (Ex. 6-187, Ex. 6-368, Ex. 6-312). He handled large volumes ofHIV in a high containment laboratory under contract with NIH, performedtechniques to concentrate the virus as part of a commercial process andreportedly followed biosafety guidelines. He was tested and found to beHIV-seropositive. The lab worker was not informed of his HIV status until16 weeks after he tested HIV-positive. At that time, he recalled havingcut his finger with a blunt stainless steel needle while cleaning a pieceof contaminated equipment. He had tested HIV-negative 4 to 6 months priorto the laboratory incident but tested HIV-positive 6 to 9 months post exposure.Biosafety officials were of the opinion that the accident probably causedthe infection. The laboratory worker has not participated in any studiesthat could determine whether he is infected with a laboratory strain ofHIV.<T3>Case 20:</T3> Klein and co-workers (Ex. 6-366) reported a male dentistwho had tested HIV-seropositive (See EPIDEMIOLOGIC STUDIES.). He deniedhaving other risk factors for the virus. Although he did not recall treatinga patient with AIDS, he had treated patients at high risk for HIV infection.He reported having frequent open lesions or ``obvious breaks in the skin''on his hands; however, he only intermittently used personal protectiveequipment. His wife, although refusing to be tested for HIV, denied otherHIV-risk factors. There was no report of baseline or convalescent serologyand exposure to HIV-positive blood cannot be documented (See EPIDEMIOLOGICSTUDIES). <T3>Case 21:</T3> A healthcare worker applied pressure to an HIV-infectedpatient's arterial catheter insertion site to stop bleeding (Ex. 6-109).During the procedure, she may have had a small amount of blood on her indexfinger for 20 minutes before washing her hand. She did not wear glovesduring this procedure and although she reported no open wounds, her handswere chapped. Twenty days after exposure, she developed symptoms of acuteretroviral syndrome lasting 3 weeks. Blood she had donated 8 months priorto the exposure was HIV-negative. However, blood donated 16 weeks afterthe incident was HIV-positive. She denied having other known risk factorsfor HIV. No baseline data or serologic testing results were obtained immediatelyfollowing exposure for this case. <T3>Case 22:</T3> A female healthcare worker received accidental needlestickinjuries when drawing blood from AIDS patients in two incidents separatedin time by 4 months (Ex. 6-258). She had her first blood test for HIV 8months after the second exposure and was found HIV-positive. Although previouslyhealthy, she developed a persistent mild lymphadenopathy 3 months afterthe second incident and intermittent diarrhea which started 5 months afterthat incident. She denied other HIV risk factors. Her long-term sex partneralso denied any HIV risk factors, and he repeatedly tested HIV-antibody-negativeover an 8-month period following the healthcare worker's positive testresult. HIV was obtained from the man's peripheral lymphocytes within 13months after the second incident but could not be obtained several monthslater. Heterosexual transmission could not be ruled out for the healthcareworker but seems less likely than parenteral transmission in this case.<T3>Case 23:</T3> A male laboratory worker, was found to be HIV-positivewhen first tested (Ex. 6-258). The worker recalled having received 2 parenteralexposures to blood from persons of unknown HIV status. He sustained anaccidental needlestick and a cut on the hand while processing blood 8 and16 months respectively prior to being tested. Although asymptomatic whentested, he has experienced transient cervical lymphadenopathy. He deniedall known risk factors for HIV, but heterosexual transmission could notbe ruled out in this case as no serologic data were available immediatelyafter the exposures. <T3>Case 24:</T3> Grint and co-workers (Ex. 6-333) reported that a 44-year-oldwoman from England, although not a healthcare worker, developed AIDS afterproviding healthcare services for a Ghanaian man with a postmortem diagnosisof AIDS. She recalled having small cuts on her hands, an exacerbation ofchronic eczema, and frequent skin contact with body secretions and excretions.There was no report of baseline or convalescent serology. <T3>Case 25:</T3> Ponce de Leon and co-workers (Ex. 6-326) reported thata 39-year-old male laboratory technician in Mexico acquired AIDS occupationallyand died as a consequence of this disease. From 1971 to 1986 he workedas a laboratory technician in a company that processed blood and bloodproducts and where infection control procedures were not ``customary.''He reported experiencing many accidental punctures and blood contact withhis ``teguments and mucosa''. The worker also recalled a laboratory accident``in late 1985 in which a deep cut in his right hand was grossly contaminatedwith plasma.'' Early in 1986 he experienced an acute illness characterizedby fever and lymphadenopathy lasting several days. In 1987 the worker experienceda seven-month illness characterized by persistent diarrhea, weight loss,persistent oral thrush, intermittent fever, generalized lymphadenopathy,anisocoria and signs of meningitis. He eventually was hospitalized on December11, 1987 two weeks after dizziness, mental confusion and vomiting enused.Tests revealed the presence of the opportunistic infection cryptococcosis.The worker tested HIV-antibody-positive and was diagnosed as having AIDS.The patient died on December 18, 1987. He had denied other risk factorsfor HIV and his wife was seronegative for HIV-antibody. <ITAG tagnum="81">Epidemiologic Studies </ITAG>A number of prospective studies and surveys have been conducted to determineoccupational risks for HIV infection. Marcus and co-workers (Ex. 6-372) reported that the Centers for DiseaseControl has been conducting a national prospective study beginning in 1983,to assess initially the risk of Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome andlater, with the advent of HIV-antibody testing, the risk of Human ImmunodeficiencyVirus among healthcare workers exposed to the blood or body fluids of personswith HIV infection. In 1986, data were reported on the first 451 healthcareworkers who had entered the study and had been tested for HIV antibody.Initially the eligibility criteria for entering the study included havingbeen exposed to the blood or body fluids of a patient with AIDS or AIDS-relatedillness by a needlestick, a cut with a sharp object or contamination ofan open wound or mucous membrane. However, as of October, 1987, the availableinformation implicated exposure to HIV-contaminated blood as the most likelymode of transmission and therefore, subjects were enrolled only if theyhad had parenteral, mucous membrane or non-intact skin exposure to the<T3>blood </T3>of an <T3>HIV-infected </T3>individual. As of July 31, 1988, a cohort of 1201 healthcare workers with exposureto HIV-contaminated blood was being followed. Of these, 751 (63%) werenurses, 164 (14%) were physicians or medical students, 134 (11%) were techniciansor laboratory workers, 90 (7%) were phlebotomists, 36 (3%) were respiratoryworkers and 26 (2%) were housekeeping or maintenance staff. Upon enrollmentthe subjects provided investigators with epidemiologic data including demographicinformation, medical history, details of the exposure circumstances, infectioncontrol precautions used and post-exposure treatment. Nine hundred sixty-two(80%) of the subjects had sustained needlestick injuries, 103 (8%) hadbeen cut with a sharp object, 79 (7%) had contaminated an open wound and57 (5%) had had a mucous membrane exposure. Seven hundred seventy-nine(65%) of the exposed healthcare workers were exposed in a patient room,on a ward or in an outpatient clinic; 161 (14%) in an intensive care unit;87 (7%) in an operating room; 84 (7%) in a laboratory; 62 (5%) in an emergencyroom; and 28 (2%) in a morgue.Each subject was asked to complete a confidential questionnaire to identifynonoccupational risk factors for HIV infection. One thousand eighty-sevenhealthcare workers (91% of the cohort) completed the questionnaires. Ofthese, 6 men stated they were homosexual or bisexual, four reported usingintravenous drugs since 1978 and 6 stated they had had sexual contact witha person known to be at risk for HIV infection. Their test results andevaluations were retained in the study, but none of them seroconverted.The 1,201 subjects underwent physical examinations and blood samples weredrawn and tested for the presence of HIV-antibodies. An EIA technique wasemployed and, if reactive, a Western blot technique was performed. Acuteblood specimens collected within 30 days after exposure were obtained andtested from 622 subjects. Originally the subjects were followed up at 6-monthintervals for a period of 3 years to detect signs of clinical AIDS. WhenHIV-antibody testing became available during 1985 and 1986, exposed healthcareworkers were followed up at 6 weeks, 3 months, 6 months, and 12 monthsafter the exposure incident to determine if seroconversion had occurred.Seroconversions were defined as healthcare workers who were seronegativefor HIV antibody within 30 days after occupational exposure and seropositive90 days or more after the exposure incident. Nine hundred sixty-three subjects had been followed for at least 6 months,860 (89%) of whom had sustained either a needlestick injury or a cut witha sharp instrument. Of these, four were seropositive yielding a seroprevalencerate of 4/860=0.47%. One of the four was first tested for HIV-antibody10 months after sustaining a needlestick exposure to blood of an HIV-infectedpatient (see CASE 14). As there was no available acute blood specimen collectedwithin 30 days after exposure this case cannot by definition be considereda seroconversion. The remaining 3 HIV-seropositive subjects (see CASES11, 12, and 13) had HIV-seronegative acute blood specimens and were thusconsidered seroconversions, yielding a seroconversion rate of 3/860=0.35%.Weiss and co-workers (Ex. 6-187), conducted a prospective study to assessthe risk of Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV-1) in laboratory workers.Invitations to participate in the study were issued to workers with possibleexposure risk in 15 laboratory facilities from 6 states. Of the 265 subjects studied, 225 had laboratory exposure (including 99who worked with concentrated HIV and 126 who worked with blood containingHIV, non-infectious viral proteins, or cloned viral DNA), 30 worked withAIDS patients in support of the laboratory and 10 were clerical staff workingin the laboratory environment. Of the 225 laboratory workers, 10 reportedone or more episodes of parenteral exposure to HIV, including needlesticksor cuts, and 35 reported one or more episodes of skin contact with HIV.Participants completed a questionnaire focusing on workplace exposure tohuman retroviruses, biosafety precautions used at the facility and by thesubject, accidents occurring in the laboratory or other areas and the riskfactors of drug use, sexual activity, transfusion and country of origin.Eight (3%) of the 265 reported high risk factors for the virus. Of the225 workers, ten reported parenteral virus exposure, and 35 reported 1or more skin contacts. Thirteen workers reported that they did not weargloves at all times when working with HIV-infective material. Blood samplesfrom all subjects were analyzed for HIV antibodies by enzyme-linked immunosorbentassay and confirmed by tests such as immunoblots and radioimmune assays.One individual who worked with concentrated HIV-1 was seropositive forthe virus upon entering the study (See CASE REPORTS, CASE 3). However,HIV isolated from the subject's blood was shown to be genetically identicalto a strain of HIV used in the laboratory, thus strongly implicating occupationalexposure as the source of infection. The authors concluded that the mostplausible source of exposure was contact of the worker's gloved hand withculture supernatant fluid containing concentrated virus, followed by inapparentexposure to skin. No HIV seroconversions were identified in the other studyparticipants during the period of prospective follow-up. The authors calculatedthat the rate of HIV infection was 0.48 per 100 person-years for laboratorypersonnel working with concentrated virus. Gerberding and co-workers conducted a prospective cohort study to assessthe risk of transmitting the human immunodeficiency virus to healthcareworkers intensively and frequently exposed to the more than 1600 patientswith AIDS and AIDS-related conditions at San Francisco General Hospital(Ex. 6-375, Ex. 6-353). After inviting the hospital healthcare workers to participate in the study,investigators recruited a cohort of 623 subjects between 1984 and 1988.At the time of enrollment blood samples were drawn from each subject andtested within six months for HIV antibody. Upon entering the study, eachsubject was asked to complete a confidential, self-administered questionnairedesigned to elicit information regarding demographic characteristics; employmenthistory; medical history; type, frequency, duration and intensity of exposuresto HIV-infected patients or laboratory specimens from such patients; adescription of infection-control procedures; and non-occupational riskfactors for AIDS. Subjects who described non-occupational risk factorsfor AIDS on the questionnaire were excluded from this study, leaving 468for prospective follow up. Forty-four percent were physicians (57 of whomwere surgeons), 30% were nurses and 11% were laboratory techs. Of these,11% worked solely in AIDS units or research labs and 26% worked in theoperating room, emergency room or intensive care unit. Two hundred twelveof the subjects reported having had accidental exposure (with some havinghad multiple exposures) to HIV-infected blood by needlestick or by splashesto mucous membranes or nonintact skin. Of the one hundred eighty subjectswho received follow-up HIV antibody testing at least 6 months after exposure,Gerberding and co-workers reported that only one, a healthcare worker whohad sustained a deep needlestick injury with an HIV-contaminated needle,seroconverted to the virus (See CASE REPORTS, CASE 15) yielding a seroconversionrate of 1/180=0.47%. Klein and co-workers (Ex. 6-366), conducted a study to assess the occupationalrisk of HIV among individuals working in the dental profession. Dentalprofessionals in the boroughs of Manhattan and the Bronx in New York Cityreceived a mailing requesting their participation in the study. Otherswere also recruited during dental meetings in the New York City metropolitanarea (between October 1985 and May 1987), and during the annual meetingof the American Dental Association in Miami Beach (October 1986). Written consent was given and questionnaires were completed by a cohortof 1,360 dental professionals. The questionnaires addressed the issuesof demographics (including type, duration and location of practice), behavioror other risk factors related to AIDS, ``precautions used when treatingpatients, type and estimated numbers of patients treated, estimated numberof accidental parenteral inoculations,'' and HBV vaccination status. Bloodsamples were then obtained and analyzed for HIV antibodies by EIA and,if reactive, confirmed by Western blot assay. The blood samples of thosesubjects who had not received the HBV vaccine were analyzed for HBV antibodiesas well. Twenty-five participants who reported no or ``uncertain'' contact withpatients and 13 subjects for whom blood samples were not obtained wereexcluded from the study. For 13 participants who reported other risk factorsfor HIV, including 10 homosexual or bisexual men, 2 heterosexual intravenousdrug users and 1 homosexual or bisexual IV drug user, blood samples wereanalyzed separately. The remaining cohort of 1,309 subjects consisted of 1,132 dentists, 131dental hygienists and 46 dental assistants. Most of the dentists were maleand 5% were oral surgeons. Nearly all of the dental hygienists and assistantswere female. About half of the participants practiced in cities where largenumbers of AIDS cases have been reported. Although the vast majority of subjects reportedly worked either with AIDSpatients (15%) or with patients at high risk for AIDS (72%), only 31% ofthe dentists and 8% of dental assistants reported always wearing gloveswhen performing dental treatment. Most of them did use gloves intermittently.Seventy three percent of the hygienists reported always wearing gloveswhile working with patients. Most of the dentists and dental hygienistsused masks, eye protection and disposable gowns intermittently, althoughthe majority of dental assistants never used these infection control procedures.Nearly all subjects who used precautions reported they had increased theiruse of precautions since 1983 due to concern about AIDS. Approximately 94% of the subjects reported sustaining accidental ``parenteralinoculations with sharp instruments,'' ranging from one to as many as 7,500within a 5-year period. Serologic test results revealed that at least 21%of the subjects who had not receive the HBV vaccine had been infected withHBV; however, only 1 subject, a male dentist, was seropositive for HIV(See CASE REPORTS, CASE 20.)Klein and co-workers concluded that there is a risk of dental professionalsacquiring HIV occupationally. Because the study represents a point prevalencesurvey, the HIV seroconversion rate among dental personnel cannot be estimatedfrom it. Henderson and co-workers are conducting a prospective study that beganSeptember, 1983, to assess the risk of nosocomial transmission of HIV tohealthcare workers (Ex. 6-377, Ex. 6-352). Investigators invited healthcareworkers with varying degrees of occupational exposure to more than 1,000HIV-infected patients seen at the Clinical Center at the National Institutesof Health (NIH) to participate in the study. As of October 1988, the cohortbeing followed consists of healthcare workers, including clinical and researchlaboratory personnel as well as healthcare workers providing direct patientcare. Blood was obtained from each subject at the time of enrollment andevery 6 months thereafter. The samples were tested for the presence ofHIV antibody by ELISA and if reactive, were then confirmed by Western blot.Questionnaires designed to obtain demographic information, job description,type and frequency of procedures performed on HIV-infected patients, typeand frequency of patient blood or body fluid exposure, and type and frequencyof exposure to patient specimens were given to each subject at the timeof enrollment and every 6 months thereafter. Questions regarding non-occupationalrisk factors were not included. Two categories of exposure were defined:``physical contact with either a patient or specimen container in routinework''; and ``adverse'' exposure, either parenterally (by a needle, scalpelor other sharp object contaminated with blood or body fluids from HIV-infectedpatients) or by splash to the mouth, nasal or conjunctival membranes (byblood, urine, saliva, sputum or feces from an HIV-infected patient). Threehundred fifty-nine of the subjects in the cohort reported percutaneousor mucous membrane exposure to blood or body fluids from HIV-infected patientsand were evaluated separately, given more comprehensive initial and follow-upquestionnaires, and were requested to provide serologic baseline samplesas close as possible to the time of exposure as well as yearly samplesthereafter. All adverse exposures were followed for at least 6 months (rangingfrom 6 to 63 months.) For 6 subjects, blood samples were positive for HIV antibody at the timeof entry into the study. None of the 6 had reported an adverse exposureto blood or body fluids. However, upon reevaluation, all 6 described havingat least one other risk factor for AIDS. As there were no baseline serologicdata for these subjects, it could not be determined when seroconversionoccurred. Henderson and co-workers have not published reports of any seroconversions.Kuhl and co-workers at UCLA School of Medicine conducted a prospectivestudy to assess the occupational risk of HIV to healthcare personnel caringfor AIDS patients (Ex. 6-355). Investigators enrolled a cohort of 292 femalehealthcare workers consisting of physicians, nurses, nursing aids, andlaboratory technicians. Upon entering the study, each subject was askedto complete a self-administered, confidential questionnaire designed toelicit information regarding the individual's demographic characteristics,sexual history, job description, medical history concerning immune systemfunction, and frequency and intensity of exposure to biological specimensof AIDS patients. Blood was obtained from each subject and tested for thepresence of HIV antibody by EIA. If the original and at least one of tworepeat EIA tests were reactive, the subject was considered HIV-seropositive.``Reactive or nonreactive samples that were near the cutoff value wereconfirmed by Western blot analysis.'' All members of the cohort testedHIV-seronegative. Two hundred forty-six (84%) of the subjects were followed up 9-12 monthsafter enrollment. Of these, 102 reported at least 50 AIDS ``specimen contacts''during the previous 3 years and were classified as the ``high exposuregroup''; 111 subjects reported no exposure to AIDS patients or specimensfrom such patients during the previous 3 years and were classified as the``no exposure group.'' The 43 remaining subjects reported 1-49 AIDS specimenscontacts and were classified as the ``low exposure group.'' The subjectsreported exposure to various body fluids including blood and blood products,urine, respiratory secretions, upper gastrointestinal secretions, pleuralfluid, cerebrospinal fluid and semen. Ten of the high exposure subjectsreported needlestick exposures and 15 reported mucous membrane exposures.Each completed an updated questionnaire and had serologic testing for HIVantibody. None of these subjects have seroconverted to an HIV-antibody-positivestatus.<ITAG tagnum="81">Healthcare Workers With AIDS </ITAG>Further evidence of occupational transmission is provided by reports ofhealthcare workers who have AIDS, but have no identifiable risk for infection(Ex. 6-378). As of September 19, 1988, there were 169 workers in this group.Information is not complete for 28 of these due to death or refusal tobe interviewed. Investigations are in progress for 97 and case investigationshave been completed for the remaining 44 persons. Among the latter thereare 8 physicians, including 4 surgeons; 1 dentist; 6 nurses; 9 nursingassistants; 8 housekeeping or maintenance workers; 4 clinical laboratorytechnicians; 2 therapists; 1 mortician; 1 paramedic and 4 others who didnot have contact with patients. Eighteen of these healthcare workers recalledhaving needlestick or other parenteral exposure to blood or ``body fluids''from patients in the 10 years preceding their diagnosis of AIDS. However,none of the patients were known to be infected with HIV at the time ofexposure. While data on these cases are less complete compared to the 25case reports discussed above, it is reasonable to assume that at leastsome of them resulted from occupational exposure.D. Other Bloodborne Pathogens Several additional infectious diseases are characterized by a phase inwhich the causative agent may circulate in blood for a prolonged periodof time. With the exception of syphilis and malaria, which are both treatablewith chemotherapeutic agents, these diseases are rare in the United Statesand would therefore be unlikely to pose a measurable risk to healthcareworkers. <ITAG tagnum="81">Syphilis </ITAG>Syphilis, a sexually transmitted infectious disease, is increasingly prevalentin the United States; 35,147 cases were reported in civilians in 1987 (Ex.6-465). Marked increases occurred in 1987. The 25% increase over the 1986rate was the largest single-year increase since 1960 (Ex. 6-453). Moreoverthe incidence of 14.6 cases per 100,000 persons in 1987, equal to thatof 1982, is the highest rate since 1950 (Ex. 6-453). Syphilis is causedby infection with <T3>Treponema pallidum, </T3>a spirochete. The natural history of syphilis is characterized by an incubation periodof 10 to 90 days during which the patient is seronegative and asymptomatic(Ex. 6-495). Subsequent to this incubation period, a primary stage occurs,usually characterized by the appearance of a single lesion, or chancre,and normally accompanied by reactivity in serologic tests. Untreated, theprimary lesion heals in weeks. Within weeks to months, a variable systemicillness, the secondary stage, characterized by rash, fever and widespreadhematogenous and lymphatic dissemination of spirochetes occurs. All infectedpersons have reactive serologic tests in this stage (Ex. 6-495). Furthermore,the highest levels of spirochetemia (spirochetes present in blood) arereached during this period. Over two-thirds of patients probably have aprolonged period of latency when they are asymptomatic: the rest, aftera variable period of latency, progress to a tertiary stage with high morbidityand mortality including involvement of skin, bones, central nervous andcardiovascular system (Ex. 6-495). During latency and tertiary syphilis, spirochetemia is markedly reduced,as is infectivity. However during the course of untreated syphilis, spirochetesmay be intermittently found in the bloodstream, and syphilis can probablybe transmitted through the course of the illness, though not as readilyas during the primary and secondary stages (Ex. 6-495). Although syphilisis primarily transmitted sexually and <T3>in utero, </T3>a few cases of transmission by needlestick, by tattooinginstruments, and by blood transfusion have been documented (Ex. 6-453,Ex. 6-496). A reported transmission has occurred by needlestick exposureto the blood of a patient with secondary syphilis, resulting in a chancreon the hand (Ex. 6-453). Preventive treatment of an exposed healthcareworker with an antibiotic during the incubation period would be expectedto prevent seroconversion and the potential for permanent reactivity ontreponemal testing, as well as preventing the manifestations of infection.<ITAG tagnum="81">Malaria </ITAG>Malaria is a potentially fatal mosquito-borne parasitic infection of theblood cells characterized by paroxysms of fever, chills, and anemia; 944cases were reported in the United States in 1987 (Ex. 6-465). Malaria isan important health risk to immigrants from numerous malaria-endemic areasof the world and to Americans who travel to such areas. Moreover, transmissionby mosquito vector has been documented in some areas of the United States.Malaria is characterized by a prolonged erythrocytic phase during whichthe causative agent, one of several species of the <T3>Plasmodium </T3>genus, will be present in the blood. In many nations,malaria is among the most common transfusion-related infectious diseases.In temperate countries, it is only occasionally reported (Ex. 498). Malariahas also been transmitted by needlestick injury; in one incident, malariawas transmitted to a child who received a unit of blood and to the recipient'sphysician, who stuck himself with a needle (Ex. 467). <ITAG tagnum="81">Babesiosis </ITAG>Babesiosis is a tick-borne, parasitic disease similar to malaria whichis caused by the intraerythrocytic parasite <T3>Babesia microti. </T3>It is endemic in certain islands off the northeasterncoast of the United States. Transmission by transfusion of fresh bloodfrom asymptomatic donors has been reported (Ex. 454). <ITAG tagnum="81">Brucellosis </ITAG>Brucellosis is a febrile illness caused by members of the genus <T3>Brucella. </T3>It is typically associated with occupational exposureto livestock or with ingestion of unpasteurized dairy products; 129 caseswere reported in 1987 (Ex. 6-465). It is characterized by fever and weakness,sweats and arthralgias. Transmission by blood transfusion has been reported;in one incident, brucellosis and syphilis were transmitted in the sameunit of blood to one recipient (Ex. 6-496). <ITAG tagnum="81">Leptospirosis </ITAG>Leptospirosis, a prolonged illness characterized by fever, rash, and occasionallyjaundice, is caused by strains of <T3>Leptospira interrogans,</T3> a spirochete. The septicemic phase, duringwhich leptospira are present in the bloodstream of patients, usually resolveswithin 1-2 weeks. It is typically acquired by contact with urine of infectedanimals, including cattle, swine, dogs, and rats; 43 cases were reportedin 1987 (Ex. 6-465). No cases of nosocomial transmission by blood havebeen reported. <ITAG tagnum="81">Arboviral Infections </ITAG>Arboviral infections generally do not lead to high or sustained levelsof viremia in humans, therefore, there is little potential for person-to-persontransmission of these infections through blood products or needlestickexposure. The exception is Colorado tick fever (CTF) caused by a tick-bornevirus which infects red blood cells. Within 3-14 days following tick exposures,the patient experiences fever, chills, headache, muscle and back aches.Several hundred cases are reported annually and transmission by blood transfusionhas been documented (Ex. 6-416). <ITAG tagnum="81">Relapsing Fever </ITAG>Relapsing fever is a rare disease, caused by pathogenic <T3>Borreliae,</T3> transmitted by lice or ticks and characterized by recurringfebrile episodes separated by periods of relative well-being. In the UnitedStates, a few cases of tick-borne relapsing fever are reported in localizedgeographic areas (Western United States). Though very rare, occupationaltransmission as a result of patient care practices has been reported. Infectionshave been attributed to blood from the vein of a patient squirting intothe nose of a technician and, in another incident, splashing into anotherHCW's eye from a placental specimen (Ex. 6-488). <ITAG tagnum="81">Creutzfeldt-Jakob Disease </ITAG>Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease, a rare disease with worldwide distribution,is a degenerative disease of the brain caused by a virus. It is believedto be transmitted by ingestion of or inoculation with infectious material,primarily neural tissue. No cases of nosocomial transmission by blood havebeen reported, although rare instances of transmission have occurred secondaryto homologous dura mater implants, receipt of human growth hormone, andinsertion of unsterilized stereotactic electrodes which had been insertedinto the brains of Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease patients and then used onothers (Ex. 6-492).<ITAG tagnum="81">Human T-lymphotropic Virus Type I</ITAG>Human T-lymphotropic virus type I (HTLV-I), the first human retrovirusto be identified, is endemic in southern Japan, the Caribbean, and in someparts of Africa, but it is also found in the United States, mainly in intravenousdrug users (Ex. 6-493). The virus can be transmitted by transfusion ofcellular components of blood (whole blood, red blood cells, platelets)(Ex. 6-499). HTLV-I has been associated with a hematologic malignancy knowna adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma and with a degenerative neurologic diseaseknown as tropical spastic paraparesis or HTLV-I-associated myeopathy. Thereis some evidence that the neurologic disease may be associated in somecases with blood transfusion (Ex. 6-494). No cases of occupational acquisitionof HTLV-I infection have been reported.<ITAG tagnum="81">Viral Hemorrhagic Fever</ITAG>The term viral hemorrhagic fever refers to a severe, often fatal illnesscaused by several viruses not indigenous to the United States, but veryrarely introduced by travelers coming from abroad. These illnesses arecharacterized by fever, sore throat, cough, chest pain, vomiting, and insevere cases, hemorrhage, encephalopathy and death. Although a number offebrile viral infections may produce hemorrhage, only the agents of Lassa,Marburg, Ebola, and Crimean-Congo hemorrhagic fevers are known to havecaused significant outbreaks of disease with person-to-person transmission,including nosocomial transmission (Ex. 6-417). Blood and other body fluidsof patients with these illnesses are considered infectious. Any patientsuspected of illness due to one of these agents should be reported immediatelyto the local and state health departments and to the Centers for DiseaseControl.The bacterial and parasitic diseases listed above are treatable with antibacterialor antimalarial drugs. No specific therapy is available for the viral diseases,with the exception of Lassa fever. Precautions designed to minimize themore important bloodborne viral diseases, namely HIV, hepatitis B, andnon A non B hepatitis, would be effective in minimizing occupational transmissionof all the above agents in the clinical setting.E. Cytomegalovirus Infection and Disease<ITAG tagnum="81">Risk From Exposure to Blood</ITAG>In contrast to some other viral agents, there have been no documented reportsof cytomegalovirus (CMV) transmission by needlestick or other occupationalexposure to blood. While infection can be transmitted via blood transfusion,the risk per unit of blood is low and infection is more likely to occurafter multiple transfusions. Even in patients with active CMV infection,the titer of virus found in blood samples is extremely low.<ITAG tagnum="81">Risk From Exposure to Patients Excreting CMV in Their Secretions</ITAG>The medical community has become increasingly aware of cytomegalovirusand cytomegalic inclusion disease of newborns. This awareness has promptedthe publication of guidelines for the prevention and control of CMV infectionand disease, particularly in settings where women of childbearing age maybe affected (Ex. 6-396, Ex. 6-483).CMV is an ubiquitous, non-seasonal virus that infects most persons at sometime during their lives (Ex. 6-397, Ex. 6-450). The virus persists in latentform after a primary infection and reactivation may occur years later,particularly under conditions of immunosuppression. Transmission of CMVfrom person to person probably occurs most commonly as a result of contactwith salivary secretions, but urine may also play a role. Although thevirus is not highly contagious, spread of CMV in households and day carecenters is well documented. Acquisition appears to require close or intimatecontact with persons who are excreting CMV in their urine, saliva, seminalfluid or cervical secretions. Sexual spread also occurs as could be expectedwith seminal and cervical excretion of virus. The frequency with whichsexual contact may cause transmission of CMV is not clear, but sexual transmissionappears to be a major source of infection among some adult populations(i.e., homosexual men and patients attending a sexually transmitted diseaseclinic) (Ex. 6-398). Infants and children acquire CMV infection eitherfrom other infected children or from their mother <T3>in utero</T3>, at birth, or during the perinatal period (Ex. 6-396,Ex. 6-397). CMV can also be transmitted via blood transfusions, breastmilk, and transplanted organs (Ex. 6-399, Ex. 6-400). Infection in normalchildren and adults is usually asymptomatic, although, in immunocompromisedhosts, CMV may be an opportunistic pathogen, causing serious illness withhigh morbidity and mortality. CMV infection is the most common of all theintrauterine infections, occurring in an estimated 0.4% to 2.3% of alllive births (Ex. 6-397). It can have a variable outcome and may resultfrom either primary infection acquired during gestation or from a recurrent(reactivation or reinfection) maternal infection in a seropositive woman(Ex. 6-401). It is currently believed that most but not all symptomaticcongenital CMV infections result from primary infection (Ex. 6-402).In the United States, 10%-65% of women (the percentage is higher in thewhite race and those of upper socioeconomic status) entering their childbearingyears are seronegative and susceptible to primary CMV infection (Ex. 6-401).The rate of primary infection as measured by seroconversion during pregnancyis estimated to be between 1% and 2% (Ex. 6-402, 6-482); however, only40%-50% of pregnant women who develop primary CMV infection will transmitthat infection to their fetuses. Of these infected infants, one study hasshown that 5%-10% will be symptomatic at birth (Ex. 6-402). The most severelyaffected are those with cytomegalic inclusion disease (CID) manifestedby hepatosplenomegaly, jaundice, petechial rash, chorioretinitis, cerebralcalcifications, and microcephaly. These children with CID are one of themajor long-term public health problems associated with CMV. Of congenitallyinfected infants, 90% to 95% are asymptomatic at birth: 10% of these willdevelop manifestations of infection later in childhood, usually as hearingloss which is sometimes progressive, or poor intellectual performances(Ex. 6-403, Ex. 6-404). Congenital or perinatal acquired infections arechronic in nature with viral excretion persisting for months or years (Ex.6-450). It is unknown why some offspring are severely affected, while othersremain asymptomatic.Since CMV infection is endemic in the community and infection in childhoodis common and usually asymptomatic, day-care centers, nurseries, hospitals,developmental centers, schools, and other group settings usually containa number of children who are excreting CMV in urine or saliva. The prevalenceof excretion of CMV in urine or saliva in day-care centers in one studyhas been reported as 59% of healthy children between 1 and 5 years of ageand was highest, 83%, in the second year of life (Ex. 6-450). In anotherstudy, the prevalence was 22% (Ex. 6-481). Adults who have young childrenin the home, particularly children who attend day-care centers, are unknowinglyexposed and frequently become infected with CMV (Ex. 6-406, Ex. 6-407).The risk of spread of CMV infection to patient-care personnel who practicegood personal hygiene appears to be no higher than that of their peerswho are not engaged in patient care. In the largest study to date, Balfourand Balfour (Ex. 6-117) enrolled 943 subjects including renal transplantnurses, neonatal intensive care nurses, student nurses, and blood donorcontrols. The rate of seroconversion during the study, based on observing519 seronegative subjects for a median period of two years, was 1.84% anddid not differ significantly among the study groups. Another study by Demmleret al. (Ex. 6-159) investigated possible nosocomial transmission of CMVby detailed serologic and virus isolation procedures in two different hospitalareas for a two year period. One was a busy, crowded pediatric chroniccare unit with high (16%) prevalence of CMV among its patients and anotherwas a neonatal unit with low (0.7%) prevalence of CMV. None of the 58 seronegativepersonnel in the chronic care unit became infected and only 2 of 37 nursesin the neonatal unit seroconverted. The source of one infection was provedto be familial, and an occupational source in the second was unlikely becausethis nurse did not care for either of the two congenitally infected infantsin the unit. Similar to the Balfour study (Ex. 6-117) the annual seroconversionrates among nurses from various areas of the hospital did not correlatewith the average CMV prevalence of the patients housed within those areas.Three smaller epidemiologic studies suggested that pediatric nurses ornursing students may have acquired CMV in the workplace (Ex. 6-409, Ex.6-410, Ex. 6-411) while five additional studies concluded that patient-to-stafftransmission was not a risk (Ex. 6-412, Ex. 6-413, Ex. 6-451, Ex. 6-452,Ex. 6-414).Yearly seroconversion rates in hospital personnel have varied from 0% to12%. However, when controls are included, these rates have not been significantlydifferent from those of age-matched adults of similar socioeconomic backgroundin the same community who did not care for CMV-infected patients. The studyof Friedman et al (Ex. 6-411) appears to be the only exception. A significantdifference was found only when a subset of pediatric personnel was comparedwith the rest of the study population. The overall seroconversion ratefor all patient-contact employees was not significantly different fromnoncontact personnel. Differences in patient care practices or infectioncontrol policies could also explain some of the conflicting results betweenhospitals. Intimate exposure to infected infants could be responsible fortransmission to staff in some instances. Heneberg et al (Ex. 6-410) inNorway found a high rate of seroconversion among student nurses on theirfirst two-month pediatric rotation. They noted that ``it is common to seepersonnel kiss drooling infants while feeding them.'' Rates of infectionfell when more attention was given to hygiene. Therefore, the risk of infectionin hospital workers who care for pediatric patients and who practice goodpersonal hygiene is probably no greater than that of women in the generalcommunity. Screening programs to identify children or adults such as renaltransplant recipients who are asymptomatic excretors of CMV are currentlyimpractical and costly. The intermittent nature of CMV shedding, the daysrequired for testing and the high cost of the tests create problems forsuch screening programs. Since a significant percentage of such patientsmay be present in any institutional setting, care for any infants and childrenshould include routine hygienic measures such as thoroughly washing handsafter each contact with urine, respiratory tract, or other potentiallyinfectious secretions and careful handling and disposal of diapers andother articles known to be contaminated with urine or other secretions(Ex. 6-396), (Ex. 6-483), (Ex. 6-442), (Ex. 6-74). The most practical meansby which pregnant women or women planning pregnancy can prevent acquiringCMV is rigorous, good personal hygiene while working in these settingsand at home throughout their pregnancy (Ex. 6-394).The petitioners specifically requested that the Agency address the riskof occupational exposure to cytomegalovirus from patients with AIDS. Inorder to respond to the request of the petitioners, we have included theabove discussion in the proposed standard. As discussed above, CMV is mostoften transmitted by saliva and urine and not by blood. The infection controlprocedures that would be employed to control the spread of pathogens transmittedby urine and saliva (except dental operations) are not required by thisproposed standard and are not the focus of this rulemaking. The Agencyseeks comments on this matter.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Preliminary Quantitative Risk Assessment</ITAG>(A) IntroductionThe United States Supreme Court, in the ``benzene'' decision, (<T3>Industrial Union Department, AFL-CIO </T3>v. <T3>American Petroleum Institute, </T3>448 U.S. 607 (1980)) has ruled thatthe OSH Act requires that, prior to the issuance of a new standard, a determinationmust be made, based on substantial evidence in the record considered asa whole, that there is a significant risk of health impairment under existingexposure conditions and that issuance of a new standard will significantlyreduce or eliminate that risk. The Court stated that ``before he can promulgateany permanent health or safety standard, the Secretary is required to makea threshold finding that a place of employment is unsafe in the sense thatsignificant risks are present and can be eliminated or lessened by a changein practices'' (448 U.S. 642). The Court also stated ``that the Act doeslimit the Secretary's power to require the elimination of significant risks''(448 U.S. 644).The Court in the Cotton Dust case, (<T3>American Textile Manufacturers Institute </T3>v. <T3>Donovan, </T3>452 U.S. 490 (1981)), rejected the use of cost-benefitanalysis in setting OSHA standards, it reaffirmed its previous positionin ``benzene'' that a risk assessment is not only appropriate, but alsorequired to identify significant health risk in workers and to determineif a proposed standard will achieve a reduction in that risk. Althoughthe Court did not require OSHA to perform a quantitative risk assessmentin every case, the Court implied, and OSHA as a matter of policy agrees,that assessments should be put into quantitative terms to the extent possible.Quantifying the risk associated with exposure to bloodborne diseases suchas HBV or HIV is different than quantifying the risk associated with exposureto toxic chemicals, the risks that OSHA has typically quantified. For mostof these chemicals, response is associated with cumulative dose, and workersrisk chronic health effects from long term exposure to airborne concentrationsof the chemical. The response associated with exposure to bloodborne pathogensdoes not depend on cumulative dose acquired through years of exposure.With each exposure, either infection occurs or it does not occur. Whilerepeated exposure increases the risk of infection, each exposure is associatedwith a unique risk which depends upon the virulence of the pathogen, thesize of the delivered dose, the route of exposure, etc., and not upon anyprior exposure. Thus, in the case of bloodborne diseases, it is necessaryto reduce the risk of exposure. The use of a vaccine or other prophylactictreatment against a particular viral agent will further reduce the risk.HBV is the only bloodborne pathogen for which there are sufficient datato quantify the risk of infection from occupational exposure to blood andother potentially infectious materials for an entire population of workers.A number of epidemiological studies demonstrate an increased prevalenceof HB markers in the blood of health care workers with frequent blood exposure,and a brief review of some of these studies is presented below, followedby OSHA's estimates of risk. Finally, OSHA presents a qualitative riskassessment for infection from occupational exposure to HIV.(B) Review of the Epidemiology of HBV Infection in Health Care WorkersNumerous epidemiological studies have measured the prevalence of HBV infectionamong health care workers. These studies determined what proportion ofhealth care workers had ever been infected with HBV and measured prevalenceas the proportion of workers with any serological marker of past or presentHBV infection. Most of the studies relied upon the voluntary cooperationof the study population, so there is some chance for bias to be introducedinto any estimate of HBV prevalence. Health care workers who know theyare infected with HBV at the time of study or who know they are HBV carriersmay decline to participate in a study which they may feel could jeopardizetheir careers. This would lead to an underestimate of the prevalence ofHBV infection among health care workers.Jovanovich et al did not rely upon voluntary participation in their studyof HBV prevalence among workers at a 1000-bed community hospital in Detroit(Ex. 4-14). The authors reported a high prevalence of HBV among employeesin worksites where blood and other potentially infectious materials arefrequently present. All new employees were screened for HBV markers atthe time of hire, and the blood tests were repeated every six months thereafterfor all employees designated as being at high risk for HBV infection. Inthe hemodialysis unit, these tests were repeated monthly. This design allowedinvestigators to determine not only the HBV prevalence but also the conversionrate to HBV seropositivity per 100 employee-years.Jovanovich et al reported the highest prevalence of HBV among the emergencyroom staff (27.9%), followed by the operating room staff (25.2%), the hemodialysisunit staff (17.2%), the dental staff (15.4%), and the staff of the intensivecare unit (12.7%). The authors did not state what proportions of the studysubjects were in specific occupations (e.g. physicians, nurses, etc.).The emergency room staff experienced the highest rate of conversion toHBV seropositivity with a conversion rate of 11.7 per 100 employee-years.Like Jovanovich et al, Dienstag and Ryan found the highest prevalence ofserological markers for HBV among the emergency room staff, (specificallynurses), in a study of workers at an 1100 bed urban teaching hospital inBoston (Ex. 4-13). This study relied upon voluntary participation, andof 830 staff at the hospital, 624 or 75% agreed to participate. Among workerswith frequent blood contact, the prevalence of HBV serological markerswas 21.2% versus 8.6% for workers with occasional, rare, or no blood contact(pandless;.001). The highest rates of seropositivity were found among emergencyroom nurses, pathology staff, blood bank staff, laboratory technicians,intravenous teams, and surgical house officers. The prevalence of HBV serologicalmarkers was 30% among emergency room nurses and was in excess of 15% ineach of the other groups. Workers with less frequent blood contact hadHBV serological markers at rates between 5% and 10%. Four of thirty-twoadministrators, (16%), were found to have serological markers of HBV infection,but the authors stated that the high observed prevalence among this groupmay have been related to the inclusion of two persons known to be membersof a high risk group. All of these groups were compared to a populationof 462 volunteer blood donors, which had a 5% prevalence of HBV.Neither frequency of patient contact nor socioeconomic status (SES) asmeasured by years of education were found to be associated with the prevalenceof HBV serological markers. SES is often associated with prevalence ofHBV infection but not among this cohort. Indeed, as demonstrated in TableA, among workers with a comparable level of education, frequency of bloodcontact was statistically significantly associated with HBV prevalence.Prevalence increased with age for all employees regardless of degree ofblood contact, but prevalence was observed to increase with years in occupationonly for workers with frequent blood contact.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,i1,s25,r20,3,2(6,5,4.5</C><T4>Table A._Correlation Between Frequency of Blood Contact and HBV Prevalencein Hospital Workers With Uniform Socioeconomic Status Measured by Yearsof Education </T4>a<H1>Personnel</H1><H1>Exposure to blood</H1><H1>N</H1><H1>Number with HBV markers (percent)</H1><H1>Odds ratio</H1><H1>Chi-square (p-value)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Physicians b<D>Frequent</D><D>81</D><D>17 (21)</D><D>3.11</D><D>6.02</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Infrequent</D><D>89</D><D>7 (8)</D><D/><D>(pandless;.02)</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nurses c<D>Frequent</D><D>104</D><D>22 (21)</D><D>2.80</D><D>7.16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Infrequent</D><D>126</D><D>11 (9)</D><D/><D>(pandless;.01)</D><F/>a Data from Table 2 of Dienstag and Ryan (Ex. 4-13). <F/>b Median level of education for the physicians was 20 years. <F/>c Median level of education for the nurses was 17 years.</ITAG>Pattison et al. reported similar findings of the relationship between frequencyof blood contact and the prevalence of HBV in an earlier study conductedbetween 1972 and 1974 at a 495 bed urban hospital in Arizona (Ex. 6-65).The study population was selected from consecutive employees undergoingyearly physical examination on the anniversary of their initial employmentexamination. Except for physicians, study participants had been affiliatedwith the hospital for at least two years. Over 99% of the eligible employeeswho represented 40% of all hospital personnel participated in the study.The overall prevalence of HBV serological markers was 14.4%. No associationwas observed between frequency of patient contact and prevalence of HBV,but the association between frequency of blood contact and prevalence ofHBV was statistically significant (pandless;.05). Among workers with frequentblood contact, the seroprevalence of HBV markers was 18.9%; for workerswith occasional blood contact, it was 13.4%; and for workers with no bloodcontact, it was 11.4%. Socioeconomic status, as measured by the HollingsheadIndex derived from educational level attained and category of employment(highest socioeconomic level corresponding to Hollingshead Index 1; lowestsocioeconomic level corresponding to Hollingshead Index 5), was statisticallysignificantly associated with HBV prevalence but only when categories 1through 4 were combined and compared to category 5. Among workers withsimilar Hollingshead indicies (i.e. controlling for socioeconomic status),workers with frequent or occasional blood contact were twice as likelyto have serological markers for HBV as were workers with no blood contact.This is demonstrated in Table B.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,i1,s25,r20,3,2(7,5,4.5 </C><T4>Table B._ Correlation Between Frequency of Blood Contact and HBV Prevalencein Hospital Workers With Similar Socioeconomic Status Measured by the HollingsheadIndex </T4>a <H1>Hollingshead Index</H1> b <H1>Exposure to Blood</H1> c <H1>N </H1><H1>Number with HBV markers (percent) </H1><H1>Odds ratio </H1><H1>Chi-square (p-value)</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">1 and 2 <D>Freq/Occ </D><D>136 </D><D>18 (13.2) </D><D>2.21 </D><D>1.09 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Never </D><D>31 </D><D>2 (6.5)</D><D> </D><D>(pandless;.25) </D><ITAG tagnum="1">3 and 4 <D>Freq/Occ </D><D>125 </D><D>20 (16.0) </D><D>1.97 </D><D>2.56 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Never </D><D>102 </D><D>9 (8.8)</D><D> </D><D>(pandless;.10) </D><ITAG tagnum="1">5 <D>Freq/Occ </D><D>41 </D><D>13 (31.7) </D><D>2.55 </D><D>4.34 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Never </D><D>78 </D><D>12 (15.4)</D><D> </D><D>(pandless;.05) </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Total <D>Freq/Occ </D><D>302 </D><D>51 (16.9) </D><D>1.66 </D><D>3.57 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>Never </D><D>211 </D><D>23 (10.9)</D><D> </D><D>(pandless;.10) </D><F/>a Data from Table 3 of Pattison et al. (Ex. 6-65). <F/>b The Hollingshead Index is a measure of socioeconomic status derivedfrom educational level attained and category of employment. The highestsocioeconomic level corresponds to Hollingshead Index 1; the lowest socioeconomiclevel corresponds to Hollingshead Index 5. <F/>c Pattison categorized blood exposure as frequent or occasional(Freq/Occ) versus never.</ITAG> In a more recent study by Hadler et al. frequency of blood contact butnot frequency of patient contact was again shown to be strongly relatedto HBV prevalence (Ex. 4-16). Of all employees at three urban teachinghospitals and two midwest community hospitals, 5,697 (36%) participatedin this study. Serological markers of past or present HBV infection werefound in 14.2% of the study population. For workers with frequent bloodcontact, the prevalence of HBV markers increased with duration in occupationat a rate of 1.05 infection per 100 person-years (R=.95; pandless;.01), andfor workers with occasional blood contact, the prevalence increased ata rate of .71 infections per 100 person-years (R=.85; pandless;.05). Amongworkers with no blood contact, HBV prevalence was constant over durationof employment. Hadler et al. also found that frequency of needle accidents was relatedto HBV prevalence. Among workers with frequent or occasional needle accidents,HBV prevalence increased with duration in occupation at a rate of .80 infectionsper 100 person-years, and among workers with rare needle accidents, prevalenceincreased at a rate of .72 infections per 100 person-years. Among workerswho reported no needle accidents, the increase in HBV prevalence with durationin occupation was much lower (.24 infections per 100 person-years). Whensubjects were stratified into groups by degree of blood contact, frequencyof needle contact was positively associated with HBV infection rates onlyin persons with frequent blood contact and not in persons having occasionalor no blood contact. Needlesticks and cuts with sharp objects are by no means the only way workerswith exposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials can beexposed to the HB virus. In a study of the transmission of HBV in clinicallaboratory areas, Lauer et al. found that 26 of 76 (34%) environmentalsurfaces sampled were positive for HBsAg (Ex. 6-56). Samples were takenin a dialysis room specifically used for patients who had HBV infectionsat the time of dialysis. In addition, samples were collected in the clinicallaboratory where tests were done on blood samples drawn from HBV-infecteddialysis patients. The HB surface antigen was found on the outside of 6 of 11 (55%) of thesampled blood-specimen containers and 4 of 9 (44%) of the sampled serum-specimencontainers. The gloves and bare hands of personnel who had contact withthe blood- and serum-specimen containers were also sampled, and two ofthe three samples taken, including one from a bare hand, were positivefor HBsAg. Other contaminated surfaces included the handle portion of pipettingaids, marking devices, and an assay instrument for complete determinationof blood cell counts. The authors stated that their data ``indicate thattransmission of HBV in the clinical laboratory is subtle and mainly viahand contact with contaminated items during the various steps of bloodprocessing. These data support the concept that the portal of entry ofHBV is through inapparent breaks in skin and mucous membranes.''(C) Quantitative Assessment of HBV Risk OSHA's quantitative risk assessment focuses on HBV infection in healthcareworkers because healthcare workers with frequent exposure to blood or otherpotentially infectious materials constitute the only occupational groupwith such exposure for which OSHA has sufficient data to estimate the occupationalrisk of HBV infection. OSHA believes, however, that it is the exposureto blood and other potentially infectious materials that places these workersat risk for HBV and not some other factor unique to health care workers.This conclusion is borne out by the epidemiological studies reviewed inthe previous section. Therefore, for this risk assessment, OSHA will usethe data available for health care workers with frequent exposure to bloodor other potentially infectious materials to predict the HBV infectionrisk to any worker with frequent occupational exposure to blood or otherpotentially infectious materials. Estimates of the incidence of HBV infection in the U.S. population in generaland among health care workers in particular come from the Hepatitis Branchof the Center for Infectious Disease of the U.S. Public Health Service'sCenters for Disease Control (CDC). There are two systems for collectinginformation on hepatitis: the CDC National Morbidity Reporting System andthe Viral Hepatitis Surveillance Program (VHSP). The National MorbidityReporting System collects data on the number and type of hepatitis infectionsas well as the patients' ages in reported cases. The VHSP collects serologicaland epidemiological data pertaining to risk factors for the disease (Ex.6-217). Based on data from these systems, the CDC estimates that thereare over 300,000 HBV infections each year in the U.S. (Ex. 6-176). Onlya fraction of all infections are actually reported to the CDC because mostinfections produce no symptoms and people are unaware that they are sick.Furthermore, even when people become ill enough to seek medical help, thedisease is not always correctly diagnosed or faithfully reported. For itsrisk assessment, OSHA will assume that exactly 300,000 HBV infections occureach year, but the reader should bear in mind that CDC estimates the numberto be higher (Ex. 6-176). It is estimated that there are approximately 5.3 million health care workerswho have frequent contact with blood or other potentially infectious materialsputting them at high risk for bloodborne diseases including HBV (Ex. 6-13).This estimate includes staff at institutions for the developmentally disabled.A portion of the 5.3 million workers with frequent blood contact or exposureto other potentially infectious materials are not at risk for HBV infection.CDC estimates that between 15% and 30% of these workers (795,000 to 1,590,000)have already been infected with HBV and are now immune to further infection(Ex. 6-199). In addition, it is estimated that approximately 1.2 millionhealth care workers have received the plasma-derived HB vaccine since itsintroduction in 1982. CDC reports that 1.4 million persons have completedthe three-dose series of vaccine injections. Although no precise figuresare available, it is estimated that over 85% of the distributed vaccinehas gone to health care workers with frequent blood contact, staff andclients of institutions for the developmentally disabled, and staff andpatients in hemodialysis units (Ex. 6-176). The vaccine has been demonstratedto provide protective antibody levels in over 90% of healthy adults whohave received the series (Ex. 6-385), so OSHA estimated that 1,080,000workers, (1,200,000andmultiply;.9) are immune to HBV from vaccination. Thesefactors, prior infection and vaccination, remove between 1,875,000 and2,670,000 from the pool of 5.3 million health care workers with frequentexposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials, leaving between2,630,000 and 3,425,000 workers at risk for HBV infection. Of the 300,000 HBV infections each year, CDC estimates that 6% or 18,000occur in all health care workers. Two-thirds of these 18,000 cases, or12,000 cases, are believed to occur in health care workers who have frequentexposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials (Ex. 6-392).If between 2,630,000 and 3,425,000 workers are exposed, then the annualHBV infection rate for these workers is between 4.89 and 6.63 per 1000exposed workers. Clearly it is possible for workers with frequent blood exposure to becomeinfected with HBV by means other than occupational exposure. Over 50% ofall cases reported in 1985 had no known risk factors (Ex. 6-217). The riskattributable to occupational exposure is the difference between the riskfaced by exposed workers and the background risk faced by the general population.Thus, to determine whether workers exposed to blood and other potentiallyinfectious materials face a significant risk of infection due to theiroccupational exposure, OSHA has estimated the background risk of HBV infection.The vast majority of the 300,000 infections that occur each year in theU.S. are in young adults. In 1985, for example, 70% of all reported casesof acute infection occurred in the 20 to 39 year old age group. In contrast,only 1.4% of the reported cases of acute infection occurred in childrenunder 15 years of age (Ex. 6-217). Because of the low incidence of HBVinfection in children, OSHA has assumed for this risk assessment that infectionsoccur only in adults in order to arrive at an estimate of the HBV infectionrate in the adult population. While this assumption may lead to an overestimateof the infection rate, any bias will be offset to some degree by the assumptionthat exactly 300,000 HBV infections occur each year, which is probablyan underestimate.There are approximately 180 million adults in the U.S. (Ex. 6-389; in 1985,there were 186,778,000 residents in the U.S. 15 years of age or older).Of these, it is estimated that 4.8% (approximately 8.6 million) are immunebecause they have already had the disease (Ex. 6-390). In addition, wewill assume that all of the 1.4 million persons who have received the HBvaccine are adults and that 90% of them (1,300,000) are immune. Therefore,of the 180 million adults in the U.S., approximately 170 million are atrisk of HBV infection. Given that there are 300,000 cases of infectioneach year, the annual infection rate is 1.76 infections per 1000 adults.This estimated infection rate for the entire adult population constitutesthe background risk for HBV. In other words, OSHA estimates that the probabilitythat an adult in the U.S. will be infected with HBV this year is .00176.Estimates of the populations at risk and their HBV infection rates aregiven in Table C.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s100,12,20</C> <T4>Table C._Estimate of Populations at Risk for HBV Infection</T4><H1> </H1><H1>U.S. adults</H1><H1>High risk health care workers</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Number in population <D>180,000,000 </D><D>5,300,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Percent immune a <D>4.8 </D><D>15-30</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Number immune <D/>b 8,600,000 <D>795,000-1,590,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Number vaccinated <D>1,400,000 </D><D>1,200,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Percent vaccinated <D>0.1 </D><D>22.6</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Number immune from vaccination c<D/>b 1,300,000 <D>1,080,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Number at risk <D>170,100,000 </D><D>2,630,000-3,425,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Annual HBV infection rate per 1000<D>1.76 </D><D>3.50-4.56</D><F/>a Percent immune is the proportion of the population which has alreadybeen infected with the HB virus. Previous infection confers life-long immunity.<F/>b This number has be rounded to the nearest hundred-thousand.<F/>c This assumes that vaccination confers immunity on 90% of thosethat receive it.</ITAG></ITAG>OSHA's estimate of the background risk of HBV infection is probably muchhigher than the actual risk faced by most adults. Certain behaviors areknown to substantially increase the risk of HBV infection, but not alladults engage in these behaviors with equal probability. For example, arecent General Social Survey conducted in early 1988 recorded homosexualactivity among 3.2% of 504 sexually active men in the previous 12 months(Ex. 6-342), yet the proportion of HBV cases associated with homosexualactivity in 1987 in the CDC's sentinal county study was 9%, nearly threetimes as large (Ex. 6-321). Intravenous drug users, who accounted for 28%of the HBV cases in 1987 in the same CDC study, are another group whichare disproportionately represented in the number of HBV cases as comparedto their number in the adult population. Removing the HBV cases associatedwith male homosexual activity and IV drug use from the annual number ofcases and removing adult men who engage in homosexual activity and IV drugusers from the population at risk would substantially reduce OSHA's estimateof the background risk of infection because a greater proportion of caseswould be removed from the number of HBV cases (i.e. the numerator) thanthe proportion of people removed from the population at risk (i.e. thedenominator). This approach would be reasonable because males representonly 25% of all healthcare workers, as opposed to 48% of the general population,and IV drug users most likely are underrepresented among the healthcareworker population. Unfortunately, there are no reliable estimates of the number of peopleengaging in high risk behaviors such as homosexual activity or IV druguse. Therefore, OSHA must rely on its estimate of 1.76 HBV infections per1000 adults as its estimate of the background risk aware that the truerisk for most adults in the U.S., and therefore the background risk forhealthcare workers, is probably much lower.As outlined in the discussion of the health effects of HBV, there are anumber of possible outcomes following infection. Between two thirds andthree fourths of all infections result in either no symptoms of infectionor a relatively mild flu-like illness. Between one quarter and one thirdof the infections, however, take a much more severe clinical course. Asnoted above, the symptoms include jaundice, dark urine, extreme fatigue,anorexia, nausea, abdominal pain, and sometimes joint pain, rash, and fever.Hospitalization is required in about 20% of these cases. For its risk assessment,OSHA will use the lower estimate of 25% as the proportion of HBV infectionswhich take a more severe clinical course. CDC estimates that 2.2% of HBV infections lead to death. Death from fulminanthepatitis occurs in 0.125% of cases. Death from cirrhosis of the liveris estimated to occur in 1.7% of cases, and death from primary hepatocellularcarcinoma is estimated to occur in 0.4% of cases (Ex 6-392). Between 5% and 10% of individuals infected with HBV become chronic carriersof the virus. These individuals represent a pool from which the diseasemay spread. About 25% of the chronic carriers suffer from chronic activehepatitis (Ex 6-392). The estimated numbers of infections that result in any of these outcomeseach year in both the adult population and in the population of high riskhealth care workers is presented in Table D. Recall that among the adultpopulation, approximately 170 million persons are estimated to be at riskfor HBV and among health care workers with frequent exposure to blood orother potentially infectious materials, there are between 2,630,000 and3,425,000 workers estimated to be at risk for HBV infection. Using thenumbers in Table D and these population estimates, the annual risk of HBVinfection for the adult population and for any worker with frequent occupationalexposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials have been calculatedand are presented as rates per 1000 in Table E.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp10,i1,s30,14,9</C><T4>Table D._Estimates of the Number of HBV Infections and Outcomes inthe U.S. Adult Population and among Health Care Workers Exposed to Bloodand Other Potentially Infectious Material</T4> a <H1> </H1><H1>U.S. adults</H1><H1>Health care workers</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Infections<D>300,000</D><D>12,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Clinical Illness (25%)<D>75,000</D><D>3000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized (5%)<D>15,000</D><D>600 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Carrier (5% to 10%)<D>15,000-30,000</D><D>600-1200 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB (25% Carriers)<D>3750-7500</D><D>150-300 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant Death (.125%)<D>375</D><D>15 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_Cirrhosis (1.7%)<D>5100</D><D>204 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_PHC b (0.4%)<D>1200</D><D>48 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All Deaths (2.225%)<D>6675</D><D>267  </D><F/>a Data from Ex. 6-392. <F/>b Primary hepatocellular carcinoma.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp10,i1,s30,9,5-5</C><T4>Table E._Estimates of the Annual Risk HBV Infection and its Outcomesin the U.S. Adult Population and among Workers Exposed to Blood and OtherPotentially Infectious Material </T4>a <H1> </H1><H1>U.S. adults</H1><H1>Exposed workers </H1>b, c <ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Infections<D>1.76 </D><D>3.50-4.56 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Clinical Illness (25%)<D>0.44 </D><D>0.88-1.14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized (5%)<D>0.09 </D><D>0.18-0.23 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Carrier (5% to 10%)<D>0.09-0.18 </D><D>0.18-0.46 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB (25% Carriers)<D>0.02-0.04 </D><D>0.04-0.11 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant Death (.125%)<D>0.002</D><D>0.004-0.006 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_Cirrhosis (1.7%)<D>0.03 </D><D>0.06-0.08 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_PHC d (0.4%)<D>0.007</D><D>0.014-0.018 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All Deaths (2.225%)<D>0.04 </D><D> 0.08-0.10  </D><F/>a Risks are expressed as the number of events per 1000 at risk.<F/>b Exposed workers are workers with occupational exposure to bloodand other potentially infectious materials. <F/>c Risks for exposed workers are estimated assuming 15% and 30% ofthe workers had a previous infection and are thus immune. <F/>d Primary hepatocellular carcinoma.</ITAG></ITAG> Table F presents the risk attributable to occupational exposure for HBVinfection and its outcomes per 1000 exposed workers. The annual risk attributableto occupational exposure is simply the difference between the annual riskfaced by exposed workers and the annual risk faced by the adult population,both given in Table E. Because section (6)(b)(5) of the OSH Act statesthat no employee shall suffer ``material impairment of health or functionalcapacity even if such an employee has regular exposure to the hazard dealtwith * * * for the period of his working life,'' OSHA has converted theattributable annual risk into an attributable lifetime risk on the assumptionthat the a worker is employed in his or her occupation for 45 years.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp10,i1,s30,5-5,6-6</C><T4>Table F._HBV Risk Attributable to Occupational Exposure for Workers</T4>a<T4> Exposed to Blood or Other Potentially Infectious Materials  </T4><H1> </H1><H1>Annual risk </H1>b<H1>Lifetime occupational risk </H1>b, c <ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Infections<D>1.74-2.80</D><D>75.38-118.54 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Clinical Illness<D>0.44-0.70</D><D>19.61-31.02 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized<D>0.09-0.14</D><D>4.04-6.28 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Carrier<D>0.09-0.28</D><D>4.04-12.52 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB<D>0.02-0.07</D><D>0.90-3.15 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant Death<D>0.002-0.004</D><D>0.09-0.18 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_Cirrhosis<D>0.03-0.05</D><D>1.35-2.25 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_PHC d<D>0.007-0.011</D><D>0.31-0.49 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All Deaths<D>0.04-0.06</D><D>1.80-2.70 </D><F/>a Risks are expressed as the number of events per 1000 at risk.<F/>b Risks for exposed workers are estimated assuming 15% and 30% ofthe workers had a previous infection and are thus immune. <F/>c Assumes 45 years of occupational exposure and is calculated as1-[(1-p)\45\], where p is the annual risk. <F/>d Primary hepatocellular carcinoma.</ITAG></ITAG>Table F shows that for every 1000 workers with frequent exposure to bloodor other potentially infectious materials, between 75 and 119 will becomeinfected with HBV over the course of their working lifetime because ofoccupational exposure to the virus. Of these, 20 to 31 will suffer clinicalillness and 4 to 6 will need hospitalization. Between 4 and 13 of theseworkers will become chronic carriers, and 1 to 3 of them will suffer fromchronic hepatitis. HBV infection from occupational exposure will lead tothe death of 2 to 3 of these 1000 exposed workers. OSHA's estimate of the risk of HBV infection attributable to occupationalexposure for workers with frequent exposure to blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials is most likely an underestimate of the true risk.As noted above, the true risk of HBV infection among the majority of U.S.adults is probably much lower than OSHA's estimate of the background risksince the majority of adults do not engage in the high risk behaviors associatedwith a large proportion of HBV infections. By overestimating the backgroundrisk, OSHA has probably underestimated the risk attributable to occupationalexposure. Nonetheless, OSHA's calculations show that exposed workers areat an increased risk of infection, clinical illnesses, hospitalization,chronic hepatitis, and death over the course of their working lifetime.In addition, these workers are at an increased risk of becoming HBV carriersand of transmitting the infection sexually and perinatally. Since 1982, a plasma-derived HB vaccine has been available. In July of1986, a new genetically engineered HB vaccine was licensed by the U.S.Food and Drug Administration. When given in the recommended three doseseries, the new vaccine has been found to induce protective antibodiesin over 95% of healthy adults 20-39 years of age, but like the plasma-derivedvaccine, the new vaccine induced a somewhat lower antibody response inolder adults (Ex. 6-176). Assuming that both vaccines are 90% effectivein preventing HBV infection, OSHA believes that administration of eithervaccine will lead to a significant reduction in the HBV infection riskfaced by workers with frequent exposure to blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials. OSHA's Office of Regulatory Analysis estimates that there are 5.3 millionworkers with frequent exposure to blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials who would be covered by this standard (see Section VII of thispreamble). Approximately 4.7 million of these exposed workers are employedin the health care field, (OSHA estimates that there are approximately600,000 health care workers who would not be covered by this standard).Approximately 600,000 of these 5.3 million exposed workers are employedin fields other than healthcare. If it is assumed that 23% of the 4.7 millionhealth care workers have been vaccinated (1,081,000) and that between 15%and 30% healthcare workers are immune to HBV because of previous HBV infection(705,000 to 1,410,000), then there are between 2,209,000 and 2,914,000health care workers who are both at risk for HBV and would be covered bythis standard. The 10% of vaccinated workers on whom immunity was not conferredwould most likely not participate in a vaccination program because theywould not know they were not immune. There are no estimates of the number of other exposed workers (i.e. thosenot employed in the health care field) who have been vaccinated or areimmune to HBV from prior infection. Because 85% of all people vaccinatedhave been in the health care field, it is reasonable to assume that thisgroup of nonhealthcare workers has been vaccinated at a rate more likethe entire adult population (.1%) than like the population of exposed healthcare workers. Because these workers have frequent exposure to blood orother potentially infectious materials, however, it is reasonable to assumethat like the health care workers, between 15% and 30% are immune to HBVbecause of previous HBV infection. If it is assumed that 0.1% of the 600,000other workers have been vaccinated (660) and that between 15% and 30% areimmune to HBV because of previous HBV infection (90,000 to 180,000), thenthere are between 419,340 and 509,340 other workers who are both at riskfor HBV and would be covered by this standard.In total, OSHA estimates that between 2,628,340 and 3,423,340 workers withfrequent exposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials areat risk for HBV. If all of these workers were vaccinated with a 90% effectiveHBV vaccine, then over a 45 year working lifetime, OSHA estimates thatbetween 232,000 and 280,000 HBV infections would be prevented, between60,000 and 73,000 cases of clinical illness would be prevented, and between5500 and 6400 deaths would be prevented. The numbers of HBV infectionsand their outcomes which would be prevented by this provision are presentedin Table G.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s25,15</C><T4>Table G._HBV Infections and Outcomes Prevented In Workers With LifetimeOccupational Exposure to Blood and Other Potentially Infectious MaterialAfter Administration of HB Vaccine With 90% Efficacy \1\</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Number prevented \2\</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV infections<D>232,246-280,407</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Clinical illness<D>60,419-73,378</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized<D>12,447-14,855</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV carrier<D>\3\ 12,447-29,616</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB<D>\3\ 2,773-7,451</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant death<D>277-426</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_cirrhosis<D>4,159-5,322</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_PHC \4\<D>955-1,159</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All deaths<D>5,546-6,387</D><F>\1\ Numbers calculated assuming that vaccine is given to all workerswith frequent exposure to blood and other potentially infectious materialswho are covered by this standard and who have not been vaccinated or hada prior HBV infection. The population at risk is estimated to be between2,628,340 and 3,423,340. Numbers are calculated by applying 90% of thelifetime HBV risk attributable to occupational exposure given in TableF to the estimates of the population at risk. See text for details.</F><F>\2\ Risks for all exposed workers are estimated assuming 15% and 30%had a previous infection and are thus immune.</F><F>\3\ Smaller number assumes that 30% of the workers are immune due toprior infection and 5% of the workers infected will become HBV carriers.Larger number assumes that 15% of the workers are immune due to prior infectionand 10% of the workers infected will become HBV carriers.</F><F>\4\ Primary hepatocellular carcinoma.</F></ITAG></ITAG>Table H presents the lifetime risk of HBV infection and its outcomes attributableto occupational exposure after administration of a 90% efficacious HB vaccine.The numbers show that even with a vaccine which is 90% effective, thereremains an increased risk of HBV infection to workers with occupationalexposure to blood and other potentially infectious materials. Table H showsthat after vaccination, the lifetime risk of infection is between 8 and12 per 1000, the risk of clinical illness is between 2 and 3 per 1000,and the risk of death from fulminant hepatitis, cirrhosis, or primary hepatocellularcarcinoma is between 2 and 3 per 10,000. By employing engineering controls,work practices and personal protective equipment, the remaining risk tohealth care workers can be further reduced.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s25,15</C><T4>Table H._Estimate of HBV Infection and its Outcomes among Workers WithExposure to Blood or Other Potentially Infectious Materials After Administrationof HB Vaccine With 90% Efficacy\1\</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Lifetime occupational risk </H1>2, 3<ITAG tagnum="1">HBV infections<D>7.54-11.85</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Clinical illness<D>1.96-3.10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized<D>0.40-0.63</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV carrier<D>0.40 -1.25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB<D>0.09-0.32</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant death<D>0.009-0.018</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_cirrhosis<D>0.14-0.23</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death_PHC \4\<D>0.03-0.05</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All deaths<D>0.18-0.27</D><F>\1\ Risks are expressed as the number of events per 1000 at risk.</F><F>\2\ Risks for exposed workers are estimated assuming 15% and 30% ofthe workers had a previous infection and are thus immune.</F><F>\3\ Assumes 45 years of occupational exposure.</F><F>\4\ Primary hepatocellular carcinoma.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(D) Qualitative Assessment of HIV RiskThe CDC estimates that there are between 1 million and 1.5 million HIV-infectedpersons in the U.S. (Ex. 6-356). While the exact number of infections isunknown, CDC reported the number of adults with AIDS to be 78,312 as ofNovember, 1988 (Ex. 6-379). Occupational information is available for 61,929of the cases, and of these, 3,182 or 5.1% are health care workers (Ex.6-378). This proportion is similar to the proportion of the labor forceemployed in the health care field.Most health care workers with AIDS also belong to some other group whichplaces them at high risk for HIV infection (e.g. homosexual men, intravenousdrug users, etc.). There is, however, a statistically significantly largerproportion of health care workers with no known risk factors (5.3%), thanthe proportion of other AIDS cases (i.e. individuals with AIDS not in thehealth care field) with no known risk factors (2.8%). These 169 healthcare workers with no known risk factors are being studied further. CDCreports that 44 could not be assigned to a risk group after follow-up,28 had either died or refused to be interviewed, and 91 were still underinvestigation (Ex. 6-378).Adequate data do not exist for quantifying the risk of infection to healthcare or other workers with frequent occupational exposure to blood or otherpotentially infectious material. Because the extent of HIV infection inthe general population is unclear, it is not possible to estimate an ``expected''infection rate, and because the prevalence of HIV infection among healthcare and other workers with frequent exposure to blood or other potentiallyinfectious material is unknown, it is not possible to estimate an ``observed''infection rate. Therefore, it is not possible to quantify the risk as wasdone for occupational exposure to HBV. Certain deductions, however, canbe made. It is known that the virus is present only in blood or certainbody fluids and that exposure to these fluids from an HIV-infected personputs one at risk for HIV-infection. Therefore, workers who have frequentcontact with blood or certain body fluids are at risk. No case of infection due to casual contact with these fluids has been documented.Rather, infection can occur only if infectious fluids enter the body eitherthrough a percutaneous or mucosal route, although exposure by either ofthese routes does not mean that infection will occur. In several prospectivestudies of health care workers with HIV exposures, seroconversions havebeen observed. Although the rate of infection is low, it is not insignificant.The most recent report from the CDC Cooperative Needlestick SurveillanceGroup (Marcus et al) shows that of 860 health care workers with an exposureto HIV-infected blood through needlestick or cut from sharp instruments,3 workers became infected with the virus (Ex. 6-372). This leads to a seroconversionrate of 3.5 per 1000 exposures to infected blood through needlestick orcut, with a 95% upper confidence limit of 9 per 1000 exposures. Gerberdinget al recently reported that of 180 workers with 215 exposures to HIV-infectedblood through needlesticks, 1 worker became infected with the virus (Ex.6-375). This leads to a seroconversion rate of 4.7 per 1000 exposures toinfected blood through needlestick with a 95% upper confidence limit of14 per 1000 exposures. The HIV infection rates reported by both of thesestudies are very close, and the upper confidence limit from each includesthe estimated infection rate from the other. The upper confidence limitconstructed from the Gerberding et al data is much larger than the upperconfidence limit constructed from the CDC data because of the smaller samplesize. Both the CDC and the Gerberding et al studies provide estimates of therisk of infection given parenteral exposure to HIV-infected blood. Neitherstudy, however, provides estimates of the risk of all occupational exposure.One approach to this problem has been suggested by Wormser et al who estimatedthe probability of HIV infection in terms of HIV-infected patient-daysfor hospital staff caring for HIV-infected patients (Ex. 6-388). For the18 month period from January of 1986 to June of 1987, the authors observeda needlestick rate of 1.9 per 1000 HIV-infected patient-days among staffcaring for HIV-infected patients. This rate was substantially lower thanthe needlestick rates of 4.3 and 4.6 per 1000 HIV-infected patient-daysreported at the hospital for 1985 and 1984, respectively. Using the observed rate of 1.9 needlesticks per 1000 HIV-infected patient-days,Wormser et al estimated the expected number of needlesticks for differentnumbers of HIV-infected patient-days. For example, for 45,000 HIV-infectedpatient-days, (750 HIV-infected patients hospitalized for 60 days, 1500HIV-infected patients hospitalized for 30 days, etc.), the expected numberof needlesticks is 86 (1.9/1000 x 45,000). Wormser et al then estimatedthe probability of at least one exposed worker becoming infected with HIVas 1^[(1^p)n], where n is the number of needlesticks and p is the probabilityof becoming infected with HIV given needlestick exposure to HIV-infectedblood, which the authors assumed to be 0.0035. The estimated probabilities,which are expressed per expected number of needlesticks or per HIV-infectedpatient-days, are presented in Table I. In addition, OSHA has calculatedthese probabilities using Gerberding et al's estimate of 4.7 infectionsper 1000 needlestick exposures to HIV-infected blood and has included themin Table I. In reviewing Table I, it is important to remember that the probabilitiespresented there do not represent an estimate of the number of exposed workerswho will become infected with HIV. ``Number of workers exposed'' is notused in any of the calculations, and therefore an expected number of infectionsper some number of workers caring for HIV-infected patients can not becalculated. One worker may experience more than one needlestick. The probabilitiesin Table I depend only upon the number of needlesticks which, in turn,depends only upon the number of HIV-infected patient-days and the assumptionthat needlesticks occur at a rate of 1.9 per 1000 HIV-infected patient-days.Table I shows that the probability of HIV infection for at least one healthcare worker caring for HIV-infected patients does not increase linearlyas the number of HIV-infected patient-days increases. A ten-fold increasein HIV-infected patient-days from 20,000 to 200,000 leads only to a six-foldincrease in the probability of at least one infection. If one were to assumethat the needlestick rate were two times higher than the rate used in TableI (i.e. 3.8 needlesticks per 1000 HIV-infected patient-days instead of1.9 needlesticks per 1000 HIV-infected patient-days), the probability ofat least one infection doubles at 5000 HIV-infected patient-days but increasesonly 6% at 440,000 HIV-infected patient-days. If one were to assume thatthe needlestick rate were half as high as the rate used in Table I, (i.e..95 needlesticks per 1000 HIV-infected patient-days instead of 1.9 needlesticksper 1000 HIV-infected patient-days), the probability of at least one infectionis one-third smaller at 5000 HIV-infected patient-days but only one-fifthsmaller at 440,000 HIV-infected patient-days.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,i1,s10,10,10,10</C><T4>Table I._Probability of at Least One Infection Due to Needlestick Exposureto HIV-Infected Blood </T4>a<H1>Estimated</H1><H2>HIV-infected patient-days</H2><H2>Number of needlesticks </H2>b<H1>Probability of at least 1 infection</H1><H2>Wormser </H2>c<H2>Gerberding </H2>d <ITAG tagnum="1">5,000<D>10</D><D>.03</D><D>.05 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">20,000<D>38</D><D>.12</D><D>.16 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">45,000<D>86</D><D>.26</D><D>.33 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">105,000<D>200</D><D>.50</D><D>.61 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">200,000<D>380</D><D>.74</D><D>.83 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">440,000<D>836</D><D>.95</D><D>.98 </D><F/>a Probabilities are binomial (n,p) and calculated as one minus theprobability of no infections. <F/>b Number of needlesticks is calculated based on the estimated rateof 1.9 needlesticks per 1000 HIV-infected patient-days. <F/>c From Wormser et al, (Ex. 6-388). Assumes that the probabilityof infection give needlestick exposure to HIV-infected blood is 3.5 per1000 exposures. <F/>d Probabilities calculated by OSHA using Gerberding et al's estimateof 4.7 infections per 1000 needlestick exposures to HIV-infected blood(Ex. 6-375).</ITAG></ITAG> This approach to estimating the risk of HIV infection would apply onlyto staff caring for HIV-infected patients because Wormser et al used aneedlestick rate per HIV-infected patient-days which was estimated fromthis population. Instead of expressing the risk for a limited populationin terms of HIV-infected patient-days, it has been suggested that the riskof HIV infection be expressed for all workers performing a certain procedurein terms of the number of procedures performed. The cumulative probabilityof HIV-infection would be estimated by<ITAG tagnum="26">1^[(1^p)N],</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">where N is the number of procedures performed and p is the probabilityof HIV infection for a single procedure. This probability is estimatedby the product of the probability that blood or other potentially infectiousmaterial is infected with HIV, the probability that the worker is exposedwhile performing the procedure, and the probability the workers becomesinfected if the blood or other potentially infectious material is HIV-infectedand the worker is exposed. OSHA seeks comments on this approach for estimatingthe HIV infection risk to workers with frequent exposure to blood or otherpotentially infectious material. Clearly, reducing the risk of needlestick will reduce the probability ofHIV infection. CDC reported that of 1,201 exposures to HIV-infected bloodthrough needlesticks, cuts with sharp objects, contamination of open wounds,or contamination of mucous membrane, 37% of the exposures could have beenprevented if recommended infection control precautions had been followed.Recapping of needles accounted for 17% of the 1,201 exposures, improperdisposal of needles or sharp objects accounted for 14%, and contaminationof open wounds accounted for 6% (Ex. 6-372). A study of needlestick injuries among hospital personnel by Jagger et alfound that the risk of injury depended upon the type of device used andthat devices requiring disassembly had the highest risks (Ex.6-350). Jaggerinvestigated 326 needlestick injuries over a 10 month period and foundthat 17% occurred before or during use of the device, and 13% occurredduring or after disposal of the devices. The majority (70%), however, occurredafter use but before disposal of the devices. The single largest causeof injury was due to recapping. Workers missed the cap and stabbed themselveswhen attempting to cover a used needle in 17.8% of the injuries. Othermajor causes of injury were needles piercing caps when recapped after use(12.3%), contacting needles on exposed surfaces after use (10.7%), andneedles protruding from trash (8.9%). The largest number of injuries wasassociated with disposable syringes, but when the injury rate for variousdevices was adjusted for the number of each type of device purchased, disposablesyringes had the lowest accident rate at 6.9 per 100,000 purchased. Allof the devices requiring disassembly had higher accident rates rangingfrom 8.3 per 100,000 purchased for prefilled cartridge injection syringesto 36.7 per 100,000 purchased for intravenous tubing and needle assemblies.While most of the epidemiological investigations have concentrated on assessingthe risk of HIV infection to health care workers exposed to HIV-infectedblood through needlesticks or cuts with sharp objects, there is evidencethat workers in research and production laboratories routinely exposedto high concentrations of the virus are also at risk of infection. Weisset al prospectively studied 265 laboratory and affiliated workers and foundone worker infected with the same strain of HIV as was used in the laboratory(Ex. 6-187). The infected worker reported occurrences of HIV contaminationin the work area but could not recall any episode of direct skin exposurewith the virus and denied any parenteral exposures. The worker reportedthat double gloves were worn whenever there were bandaged cuts on fingersor hands. An episode of nonspecific dermatitis on the arm was recalled,but the affected area was always covered by a cloth laboratory gown. Therewas no contact of potentially infectious material with these areas as hasbeen reported for health care workers infected after clinical exposureto HIV-infected fluids (see Case Reports in the discussion of HIV healtheffects). For 99 workers who shared a work environment involving exposureto concentrated virus, the authors estimated the HIV infection rate tobe .48 per 100 person-years with a 95% upper confidence limit of 2.39 infectionsper 100 person-years. Over a 45 year working lifetime, this would leadto a risk of 195 per 1000 exposed workers in research and production laboratorieswith a 95% upper confidence limit of 663 per 1000. Weiss et al also reported a second incident of HIV infection in a researchlaboratory worker who was employed in the production of concentrated virusand who was cut on the hand with a potentially contaminated stainless steelneedle used for cleaning an apparatus. The worker was not part of the Weisset al cohort, and it is not yet known whether the virus which infectedthis worker is the same (i.e. genetically identical) as was found in thelaboratory. Weiss et al noted that although the infected workers were careful,neither was fully conversant with or strictly adhered to biosafety guidelinesin day to day procedures at all times. Weiss et al concluded that the infectionof laboratory workers under prescribed Biosafety Level 3 containment ``suggeststhe need to review carefully all operations involving highly concentratedinfectious material and to ensure proficiency in the conduct of recommendedsafeguards'' (Ex. 6-187). Although it is not possible to quantify the risk of HIV infection in healthcare or other workers with frequent exposure to blood or other potentiallyinfectious material or with direct exposure to the virus itself, the datashow that a risk does exist. As the number of people with HIV-associatedillnesses increases, the probability that workers exposed to blood or infectiousmaterial will also be exposed to HIV increases. Given needlestick exposureto HIV-infected blood, the risk of seroconversion is estimated to be between3.5 and 4.7 per 1000 exposures, with 95% upper confidence limits of 9 and14 per 1000 exposures respectively. For research and production laboratoryworkers with occupational exposure to high concentrations of the virus,the risk of seroconversion is estimated to be 4.8 per 1000 person-years,with a 95% upper confidence limit of 24 per 1000 person-years. Over a 45year working lifetime, the risk would be 195 per 1000 exposed workers.By reducing the risk of exposure to blood and other potentially infectiousmaterial and by strictly adhering to biosafety procedures in handling thevirus in laboratories, the risk of HIV infection can be reduced. (E) Risk from Other Bloodborne Pathogens As described in the health effects discussions, there are other bloodbornepathogens, such as syphilis and malaria, which are present in blood duringcertain phases of infection. During these phases, the blood of infectedindividuals poses a risk to exposed workers. Although this risk has notbeen quantified, it does exist and will be minimized or eliminated by preventingoccupational exposure to blood. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Significance of Risk </ITAG>Section 6(b)(5) of the OSH Act vests authority in the Secretary of Laborto issue health standards. This section provides, in part, that:<ITAG tagnum="21">The Secretary, in promulgating standards dealing with toxic materialsor harmful physical agents under this subsection, shall set the standardwhich most adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis ofthe best available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairmentof health or functional capacity even if such employee has regular exposureto the hazard dealt with by such standard for the period of his workinglife.</ITAG>OSHA's overall analytic approach for setting worker health standards isa four-step process consistent with recent court interpretations of theOSH Act and rational, objective policy formulation. In the first step,a quantitative risk assessment is performed where possible and consideredwith other relevant factors to determine whether the substance to be regulatedposes a significant risk to workers. In the second step, OSHA considerswhich, if any, of the regulatory alternatives being considered will substantiallyreduce the risk. In the third step, OSHA looks at the best available datato set the most protective requirements that are both technologically andeconomically feasible. In the fourth and final step, OSHA considers themost cost-effective way to achieve the objective. In the Benzene decision, the Supreme Court indicated when a reasonableperson might well consider the risk significant and take steps to decreaseit. The Court stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">It is the Agency's responsibility to determine in the first instancewhat it considers to be a ``significant'' risk. Some risks are plainlyacceptable and others are plainly unacceptable. If, for example, the oddsare one in a billion that a person will die from cancer by taking a drinkof chlorinated water, the risk clearly could not be considered significant.On the other hand, if the odds are one in a thousand that regular inhalationof gasoline vapors that are 2% benzene will be fatal, a reasonable personmight well consider the risk significant and take the appropriate stepsto decrease or eliminate it. (<T3>I.U.D. v. </T3><T3>A.P.I.</T3>) 448 U.S. at 655).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The Supreme Court's language indicates that the examples given wereof excess risk over a lifetime. It speaks of ``regular inhalation'' whichimplies that it takes place over a substantial period of time and refersto the ``odds * * *  that a person will die,'' obviously a once in a lifetimeoccurrence.The Court indicated, however, that the significant risk determination requiredby the OSH act is ``not a mathematical straitjacket'' and that ``OSHA isnot required to support its findings with anything approaching scientificcertainty.'' The Court ruled that ``a reviewing court (is) to give OSHAsome leeway where its findings must be made on the frontiers of scientificknowledge (and that) * * *  the Agency is free to use conservative assumptionsin interpreting the data with respect to carcinogens, risking error onthe side of overprotection rather than underprotection'' (448 U.S. at 655,656). As part of the overall significant risk determination, OSHA considers anumber of factors. These include the type of risk presented, the qualityof the underlying data, the reasonableness of the risk assessments, andthe statistical significance of the findings. The risks presented by the transmission of bloodborne pathogens are serious,as detailed above in the section on health effects. Hepatitis B is a viralinfection that can cause acute and chronic disease. Symptoms of the diseasecan range from a flu-like illness to a more severe clinical illness characterizedby jaundice, dark urine, nausea, vomiting, loss of appetite, abdominalpain and diarrhea. Chronic infection may also occur resulting in frequentperiods of illness, and continual, usually life-long, infectious status.When an individual is infectious, either because of acute infection orbecause the individual has become a carrier, his or her blood and certainbody fluids can transmit the virus to others. The hepatitis B infectionmay place other members of the infected individual's family at risk. Thereis a 30% chance that a sexual partner will become infected if the patienthas an acute infection. If the patient is a carrier the probability ismuch higher. Perinatal transmission from an infected employee to her infantis an efficient mode of transmission with a particularly serious outcome.In the most extreme cases of infection death can result from fulminenthapatitis, viral cirrhosis of the liver or liver cancer. (See Section IVHealth Effects). HIV, the other major bloodborne pathogen, attacks the immune system, causingdisease and death. Within a month following infection, the individual mayexperience an acute retroviral syndrome characterized by a mononucleosis-likesyndrome. Later signs and symptoms can include persistent, generalizedlymphadenopathy, fever, and constitutional illness characterized by wastingsyndrome which may lead to death. HIV infected individuals who have developedAIDS may develop neurologic problems or cancer as well as opportunisticinfections. Common conditions include encephalopathy, dementia, <T3>Pneumocystis carinii</T3> pneumonia; Kaposi's sarcoma: candidiasisof the esophagus, trachea bronchi or lungs; as well as bacterial infections.The blood and certain other body fluids from an infected individual arecapable of transmitting the infection to others. In this proposed standard, OSHA has presented quantitative estimates ofthe risk of death and clinical illness from occupational exposure to HBVinfected blood and other potentially infectious materials. Qualitativeevidence of occupational transmission of HIV is also included in OSHA'srisk assessment. OSHA estimates the lifetime risk of infection from HBV to be from 75 to119 cases per thousand, the risks of material impairment of health or functionalcapacity, that is, clinical hepatitis, to be from 20 to 31 per thousand.The risk of death from HBV is 2 to 3 per one thousand. These estimatesare based on the assumption of exposure to HBV for the period of a workinglifetime of 45 years. Moreover, OSHA's risk assessment shows that evenif every employee were to receive the HBV vaccine there would still bea remaining risk of material impairment of health of 2 to 3 per one thousandworkers based on the 90% efficacy of the vaccine. OSHA believes these preliminaryestimates may understate the risk; the actual risks attributable to occupationalexposure to bloodborne diseases may be much higher as suggested in theprevious section. In the benzene decision the Court wrote of deaths from carcinogens, butthe Act requires the Agency to assure that no employee will suffer'' ** * material impairment of health or functional capacity * * *'' Obviously,material impairment includes not only death, the risk of which is morethan twice the risk the Supreme Court suggested might be significant, butalso serious illnesses or the development of permanent infectious status(HBV carrier). For HBV infection, material impairment occurs when the patientpresents acute symptoms, suffers chronic hepatitis, or becomes a carrier.As detailed above in Section IV_Health Effects, HBV infection can resultin very serious and debilitating illnesses. Any one of the symptoms characterizingan acute or chronic infection such as fatigue, fever, vomiting, abdominalpain, diarrhea and jaundice, by itself, is enough to prevent an employeefrom doing his or her job effectively, efficiently or at all. An infectionthat requires hospitalization, such as occurs in 20% of the cases of clinicalhepatitis, will prevent an employee from working. The shortest period thatan employee would be unable to work would be the time he or she is hospitalized,but undoubtedly the out-of-work time would be longer as additional recoverytime is invariably required following hospital discharge. Since symptomstypically last from several weeks to several months and, in the case ofchronic hepatitis, several years, there can be considerable lost work time.Becoming a carrier is a material impairment of health even though the carriermay have no symptoms. This is because the carrier will remain infectious,probably for the rest of his or her life, and any person who is not immuneto HBV who comes in contact with the carrier's blood or certain other bodyfluids will be at risk of becoming infected.OSHA's preliminary risk estimates from HBV are comparable to other riskswhich OSHA has concluded are significant, and are substantially higherthan the example presented by the Supreme Court. Public response to the ANPR indicated general agreement that the risk toemployers of contracting HBV are unacceptably high. Indeed, many employershave already instituted or upgraded their infection control programs andare vaccinating their employees. Industry response to the various pertinentCDC guidelines, the Joint Advisory Notice published by DOL and HHS, andthe OSHA compliance initiative has been generally positive, indicatingan acceptance by employers that employees who are not provided the protectionsthat would be mandated by this proposed standard are at risk of contractingHBV. After thoroughly considering the magnitude of the risk as shown by thequantitative and qualitative data, OSHA preliminarily concludes that therisk of death and material impairment of health resulting from acute andchronic HBV infection is significant, that HBV presents a significant riskto both unvaccinated employees and employees who have been vaccinated buthave not developed immunity. Moreover, because HBV is not the only bloodbornepathogen capable of causing disease, all employees who are exposed to bloodand other potentially infectious materials, whether they are HB-vaccinatedor not, are at risk of infection. At this time, OSHA believes that there are not sufficient data on HIV toquantify the occupational risk of infection. Nevertheless, the epidemiologicaldata on HIV provide additional qualitative evidence that another bloodbornepathogen can be transmitted in the workplace and serve to further illustraterisk remaining after the major protection measure of HBV vaccination isimplemented. OSHA's preliminary determination that employees who work invirus research and production facilities are at risk is supported by thereport of one employee out of a population of less than 100 who were workingwith concentrated HIV who seroconverted. These employees are at risk becausethe virus is concentrated and is present in much higher titers than inblood, thus increasing the likelihood of the employee becoming infectedfollowing an exposure incident. OSHA also preliminarly concludes that the new bloodborne pathogen standardwill result in a substantial reduction of significant risk. The risk ofHBV infection is most efficiently and dramatically reduced by vaccinatingall workers exposed to blood and other potentially infectious materials.Based on OSHA's estimate of risk, vaccination of all workers would resultin 2 fewer deaths and 18 to 28 fewer cases of material impairment of healthper 1000 workers exposed over a working lifetime. If 30% of the populationat risk is immune to HBV because of prior infection, then vaccinating theremaining 70% at risk will prevent approximately 280,407 infections, over73,378 of which will be clinical infections including, in addition to casesof acute and chronic symptomatic illness, 29,616 carriers and 6,387 deathsover 45 years. If only 15% of the population at risk is immune, the numberof infections prevented by vaccinating the remaining 85% at risk is estimatedto be approximately 232,246 including 60,419 cases of clinical disease,over 12,447 carriers and more than 5,546 deaths over 45 years. Despite these dramatic decreases in infections, OSHA's risk assessmentestimates 8 to 12 HBV infections with 2 to 3 cases of clinical hepatitisper 1000 workers would occur even if all exposed employees were to receivethe HBV vaccine. This is because the vaccine is effective for only 90%of the people to whom it is given. Even this remaining risk is probablyan underestimate of the number of HBV infections that are likely to occurbecause it is unlikely that all workers will agree to be vaccinated. Moreover,the HBV vaccine will not protect employees from other bloodborne pathogenssuch as HIV. Based on these data, OSHA has preliminarily concluded thatwidespread administration of the vaccine will not completely eliminatesignificant risks. Congress passed the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 becauseof a determination that occupational safety and health risks were too high.Based on this, it is clear that Congress gave OSHA authority to reducerisks of average or above average magnitude when feasible. Typical occupationalrisk of death (from all causes including accidents and illness) in occupationsof average risk are 2.7 per 1,000 for all manufacturing and 1.62 per 1,000for all service employment derived from 1979 and 1980 Bureau of Labor Statisticsdata from employers with 11 or more employees adjusted to 45 years of employmentfor 46 weeks per year. As OSHA believes the proposed standard for bloodbornepathogens will reduce HBV associated risk of death and material impairmentof health from 20 to 31 per thousand to 3 to 4 per 1000, the Agency iscarrying out the Congressional intent and is not attempting to reduce insignificantrisks. Under both the Congressional intent and the Supreme Court rationale, OSHAmust, if feasible, reduce all significant risks including those remainingafter administration of the HBV vaccine. OSHA expects that the proposedrule as drafted will reduce the risks of exposure to levels well belowthose estimated. This is because the estimates of risk reduction only quantifythe reduction achieved with universal vaccination, and do not fully takeinto account the other protective provisions of the proposed standard suchas the infection control program, and methods of compliance including universalprecautions, engineering controls, work practices and personal protectiveequipment, as well as medical surveillance and training. For the purposeof this discussion, the decrease in risk to be achieved by the additionalprovisions is not quantified beyond a determination that they will addto the protection provided by the requirement to vaccinate alone. OSHA has considered various regulatory alternatives in addressing the risksof occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens. These include informingemployers and employees of the risk through the Joint Advisory Notice publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>by the Department of Labor and the Departmentof Health and Human Services and the institution of an enforcement program.Although these efforts have been fruitful, they have not eliminated therisks and therefore OSHA has preliminarily concluded that a standard specificallyaddressing the risks of bloodborne pathogens is necessary. OSHA's currentdata indicate the alternative selected is both technologically and economicallyfeasible. OSHA's preliminary analysis of technological and economic feasibilityof the proposed standard is discussed in the following section of the preamble.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Preliminary Regulatory Impact and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis</ITAG>Executive Summary The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) has prepared aPreliminary Regulatory Impact and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis for theproposed Bloodborne Pathogens standard. The analysis is presented in sixsections: Introduction; Industry Profile; Benefits; Technological Feasibility;Costs of Compliance; and Economic Impacts. <ITAG tagnum="81">Industry Profile </ITAG>Industries where workers are in contact with or handle blood and otherpotentially infectious materials will be affected by the proposed standard.Sixteen such industry sectors were identified for this analysis: hospitals(SIC 806); dental offices (SIC 802); offices of physicians (SIC 802. 803);medical and dental laboratories (SIC 807); nursing homes (SIC 805); residentialcare facilities (SIC 836); outpatient care facilities (SIC 808); bloodcollections and processing (SIC 809); health clinics in industrial facilities(various SIC codes); research laboratories (SIC 7391); law enforcement(SIC 9221); (ire protection (SIC 9224); correctional institutions (SIC9223); funeral homes (SIC 726); personnel services (SIC 7362); and medicaland dental equipment repair (SIC 384,7699). Table E.S.-1 provides a summary of the number of affected establishmentsand employees by SIC classification. Over 616,000 establishments are estimatedto be affected by the proposed rule. Most of these establishments, about585,000, are in the health care sector. Any employee who is routinely exposed to human blood or other potentiallyinfectious material as part of their assigned duties and who comes underOSHA's purview is affected by the proposed standard. On this basis, itis estimated that approximately 5.3 million workers will be affected bythe standard. Approximately 87 percent of these workers, over 4.6 millionpeople, are employed in health care occupations.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table E.S.-</T4>1._<T4>Summary of Affected Establishments and Population at Risk</T4><H1>SIC code </H1><H1>Type of establishment </H1><H1>Number of establishments </H1><H1>Population at risk</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">801, 803 <D>Offices of physicians </D><D>179,405 </D><D>536,122</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">802 <D>Offices of dentists </D><D>94,994 </D><D>322,676</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">805 <D>Nursing homes </D><D>18,247 </D><D>778,375</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">806 <D>Hospitals </D><D>5,983 </D><D>2,145,140</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">807 <D>Medical and dental labs </D><D>12,195 </D><D>40,822</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> Medical </D><D>4,916 </D><D> </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> Dental </D><D>7,279 </D><D> </D><ITAG tagnum="1">808 <D>Outpatient care </D><D>29,706 </D><D>370,514</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">809 <D>Blood/plasma/tissue centers </D><D>672 </D><D>22,198</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">836 <D>Residential care </D><D>20,537 </D><D>80,569</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7362 <D>Personnel services </D><D>1,615 </D><D>155,844</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">726 <D>Funeral services </D><D>15,051 </D><D>26,407</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(*) <D>Health units in industry </D><D>221,650 </D><D>223,903</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7391 <D>Research labs </D><D>2,146 </D><D>98,715</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9221 <D>Law enforcement ** </D><D>6,205 </D><D>208,693</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9224 <D>Fire and rescue*** </D><D>3,174 </D><D>201,749</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9223 <D>Correctional facilities </D><D>2,333 </D><D>97,945</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">384 <D>Medical equipment repair </D><D>2,967 </D><D>1,882</D><R>n,n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Totals </D><D>616,880 </D><D>5,311,554</D><F>* Includes various SIC codes.</F><F>** Includes state and local departments only.</F><F>*** Includes fire departments and private ambulance services.</F><F/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Benefits </ITAG>After adjusting for background risk, OSHA has estimated that occupationalexposures are responsible for between 5,953 and 7,416 cases of hepatitisB virus (HBV) infections per year. In total, considering the full combinationof proposed provisions, including vaccination, engineering controls, workpractices, protective equipment, housekeeping, and training, OSHA believesthat the great majority of these HBV cases can be avoided. Compliance withthe standard is estimated to prevent between 5,089 and 6,324 cases of occupationallyinduced HBV infection per year, of which 1,272 to 1,581 would have resultedin acute symptoms, and 113 to 141 in death. In addition, OSHA estimates that between 3,653 and 4,132 non-occupationallyinduced cases of hepatitis B infection will be prevented annually, of which81 to 92 would be fatal. These cases will be prevented due to the substantialelimination of background risk (non-occupational risk) for vaccinated workersand due to the reduced transmission of infections to sex partners of employees.In total, OSHA expects the proposed standard to prevent between 9,221 and9,977 infections and between 205 and 222 deaths annually.In addition to hepatitis B, the provisions of the standard will greatlyreduce workers' risk of contracting acquired immune deficiency syndrome(AIDS) and other bloodborne diseases. Since at least 25 cases of humanimmunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection were reported to be associated withoccupational exposure, OSHA believes that at least some cases of AIDS willbe avoided. <ITAG tagnum="81">Technological Feasibility </ITAG>Limiting worker exposure to bloodborne diseases is achieved through theimplementation of the following categories of controls: andbullet; Training and education programs andbullet; Use of personal protective equipment, especially gloves, gownsmasks, and eye protection andbullet; Use of mouth pieces, resuscitation bags or other ventilation devicesandbullet; Work practices, such as careful hand-washing after each patientcontact and procedures for handling sharps andbullet; Engineering controls, such as the use of puncture resistant containersandbullet; Immunization programs andbullet; Disposal and handling of contaminated waste andbullet; Use of disinfectants andbullet; Post exposure follow-up andbullet; Labeling and signs The requirements of the standard follow closely the guidelines issued bythe Centers for Disease Control (CDC) on universal precautions (UP). Asa consequence, the efforts by many organizations to adopt UP have createda solid base of practices and technology for the implementation of thestandard. Table E.S.-2 provides a tabular summary of estimated currentrates of compliance with the various provisions of the proposed standard.OSHA findings with respect to the technological feasibility of the proposedBloodborne Pathogens Standard are that the provisions of the standard permitpractical means to reduce the risk now faced by those employees workingwith blood and other infectious materials and that there do not appearto be any major obstacles to implementing the proposed rule. <ITAG tagnum="81">Costs of Compliance </ITAG>Net compliance costs were estimated for each provision of the proposedstandard by each facility type affected. These costs represent the additionalcosts of fully complying with the requirements of the standard, after deductingfrom total cost the current baseline activities that already voluntarilyoccur at affected facilities. One-time costs were annualized using a capitalrecovery factor. Exhibit E.S.-3 summarizes annual net compliance costsby facility type and by provision, while Table E.S.-4 provides cost byprovision components. The total annual costs amount to about $852 million.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table E.S.-2_Summary of Current Compliance</T4><H1>Industry</H1><H1>PPE</H1><H2>Gloves (percent)</H2><H2>Other (percent)</H2><H1>Housekeeping</H1><H2>Containers (percent)</H2><H2>Waste disposal (percent)</H2><H1>Post exposure follow-up (percent)</H1><H1>Records (percent)</H1><H1>Training (percent)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>60</D><D>60</D><D>40</D><D>39</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>75</D><D>40</D><D>50</D><D>39</D><D>75</D><D>0</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>50</D><D>25</D><D>50</D><D>81</D><D>20</D><D>0</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>90</D><D>60</D><D>80</D><D>81</D><D>75</D><D>0</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>90</D><D>90</D><D>92</D><D>86</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>90</D><D>90</D><D>50</D><D>39</D><D>85</D><D>0</D><D>75</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>50</D><D>25</D><D>35</D><D>86</D><D>80</D><D>0</D><D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>50</D><D>25</D><D>50</D><D>81</D><D>20</D><D>0</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>N/A</D><D>N/A</D><D>N/A</D><D>N/A</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>100</D><D>100</D><D>100</D><D>39</D><D>100</D><D>0</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>90</D><D>90</D><D>85</D><D>86</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and Rescue<D>50</D><D>50</D><D>50</D><D>39</D><D>50</D><D>0</D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>100</D><D>50</D><D>100</D><D>39</D><D>50</D><D>0</D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>50</D><D>50</D><D>50</D><D>39</D><D>50</D><D>0</D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>50</D><D>50</D><D>50</D><D>39</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>50</D><D>50</D><D>50</D><D>86</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>50</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis. (Adapted from Ex. 13, Table II-31).</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table E.S.-3._Summary of Compliance Costs</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Grand Totals]</ITAG><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Infection control plan</H1><H1>Vaccination/post exposure follow-up</H1><H1>PPE</H1><H1>Training</H1><H1>Housekeeping</H1><H1>Recordkeeping</H1><H1>Totals</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>$4,403,308</D><D>$9,786,439</D><D>$36,594,622</D><D>$53,761,970</D><D>$44,558,542</D><D>$481,395</D><D>$149,586,276</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>2,331,528</D><D>4,876,909</D><D>161,765,977</D><D>11,066,362</D><D>43,218,848</D><D>314,054</D><D>223,573,678</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>895,707</D><D>14,765,531</D><D>69,627,753</D><D>9,311,852</D><D>27,438,924</D><D>842,452</D><D>122,882,219</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>528,647</D><D>28,787,707</D><D>90,338,514</D><D>31,345,685</D><D>41,864,493</D><D>2,041,164</D><D>194,906,210</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>299,313</D><D>681,200</D><D>1,250,981</D><D>1,347,072</D><D>1,556,349</D><D>49,113</D><D>5,184,028</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>745,154</D><D>4,459,264</D><D>17,961,080</D><D>5,622,316</D><D>9,268,560</D><D>338,261</D><D>38,394,636</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>16,494</D><D>252,304</D><D>6,044,858</D><D>850,181</D><D>1,880,171</D><D>19,089</D><D>9,063,097</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>1,008,118</D><D>1,464,328</D><D>7,347,507</D><D>1,883,237</D><D>9,787,658</D><D>147,643</D><D>21,638,492</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>39,638</D><D>2,393,285</D><D>0</D><D>8,662,944</D><D>0</D><D>404,305</D><D>11,500,173</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>369,411</D><D>425,625</D><D>0</D><D>821,269</D><D>472,850</D><D>32,505</D><D>2,121,660</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>52,671</D><D>2,285,227</D><D>4,663,091</D><D>1,872,736</D><D>4,564,571</D><D>217,188</D><D>\1\ 13,659,113</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>90,174</D><D>1,850,542</D><D>1,388,457</D><D>715,333</D><D>770,839</D><D>133,149</D><D>4,948,495</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>57,261</D><D>1,407,964</D><D>98,861</D><D>1,209,767</D><D>1,637,316</D><D>112,482</D><D>4,523,651</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>152,295</D><D>552,494</D><D>814,121</D><D>2,219,885</D><D>254,751</D><D>128,157</D><D>4,121,702</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>5,440,167</D><D>4,331,546</D><D>2,550,640</D><D>31,438,546</D><D>1,603,392</D><D>291,164</D><D>45,655,456</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>72,822</D><D>53,714</D><D>271,255</D><D>22,099</D><D>0</D><D>2,088</D><D>421,977</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>16,502,710</D><D>78,374,079</D><D>400,717,716</D><D>162,151,255</D><D>188,877,264</D><D>5,554,209</D><D>852,180,862</D><F>\1\ Includes $3,628 for signs.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table E.S.-</T4>4.<T4>_Summary of Compliance Costs by Provision</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Infection Control Plan<D/><D>16,502,710</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Vaccination/Follow-up<D/><D>78,374,079</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Vaccination Program<D>60,386,424</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Post-Exposure Follow-up<D>17,987,655</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">PPE<D/><D>400,717,716</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Gloves <D>161,144,593 </D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Masks <D>159,330,782 </D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Gowns<D>62,914,128</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Goggles<D>8,895,488</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Resuscitation Devices<D>8,432,726</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Training<D/><D>162,151,255</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Housekeeping<D/><D>188,877,264</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Sharps Disposal<D>28,448,263</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Biohazard Bags<D>28,348,256</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Infectious Waste Disposal<D>117,217,433</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Foil Covering (Dental Offices)<D>14,863,312</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Labeling/Signs<D/><D>3,628</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Recordkeeping<D/><D>5,554,209</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D> </D><D>852,180,862</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG> Personal protective equipment accounts for the largest amount of net compliancecosts ($400 million per year). Housekeeping ($189 million), training ($162million), and vaccination and post exposure follow-up ($78 million) werealso found to be significant cost components. <ITAG tagnum="81">Economic Feasibility and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis </ITAG>Table E.S.-5 provides a summary of economic impacts for the facility typesaffected by the proposed standard. The cost of the standard is largestrelative to profits for temporary help services, where costs may representover 12% of profits. Profit impacts also exceed 10% for dental offices(11%), though this impact estimate uses a profit figure which is exclusiveof dentists' salaries. Dental offices have the highest costs relative torevenue. Two other high impact sectors are nursing homes (over 9 percent)and residential care facilities (over 5 percent). It is probable that a large part of the compliance costs for establishmentsin SIC 80 (health care) will be passed on to consumers and third partypayers. Also, the structure of health care financing in the United Statesdictates that a large proportion of the cost impact will be borne by federal,state and local government. OSHA finds that a large number of small businesses, defined as firms withannual revenues of less than $3.5 million, will be affected by the proposedrule. With the exception of hospitals, over 87 percent of all health carefacility types are small businesses. Thus, the impact on small businessshould not differ significantly from the impact on the affected universeas a whole. In the hospital sector, one consequence may be some increasedindustry consolidation, as smaller hospitals report lower operating marginsthan larger hospitals (Ex. 13, p. IV-18).<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table E.S.</T4>-5_<T4>Summary of Economic Impacts</T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Revenue/budget ($ million) </H1><H1>Profits </H1>a ($ million) <H1>Annual costs ($ million) </H1><H1>Costs/revenue (percent) </H1><H1>Costs/profits </H1>g (percent) <ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>92,900 </D><D/>b 6,900 <D>149.59 </D><D>0.161 </D><D>2.168</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D/>c 57,500 <D> </D><D> </D><D>0.260</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>25,700 </D><D/>b 2,030 <D>223.57 </D><D>0.870 </D><D>11.013</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D/>c 19,000 <D> </D><D> </D><D>1.177</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>30,600 </D><D>961 </D><D>122.88 </D><D>0.402 </D><D>9.339</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>161,000 </D><D>1,589 </D><D>194.91 </D><D>0.121 </D><D>2.576</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>7,100 </D><D>475 </D><D>5.18 </D><D>0.073 </D><D>1.091</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>33,750 </D><D/>d 1,033 <D>38.39 </D><D>0.114 </D><D>2.231</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/Plasma/Tissue centers <D>1,420 </D><D>N/A </D><D>9.06 </D><D>0.638 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>8,700 </D><D/>e 254 <D>21.64 </D><D>0.249 </D><D>5.784</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>3,200 </D><D>96 </D><D>11.50 </D><D>0.359 </D><D>11.979</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>5,500 </D><D>390 </D><D>2.12 </D><D>0.039 </D><D>0.543</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>10,300 </D><D>433 </D><D>13.66 </D><D>0.133 </D><D>2.017</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>4,000 </D><D>N/A </D><D>4.95 </D><D>0.124 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>9,900 </D><D>N/A </D><D>4.52 </D><D>0.046 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>16,900 </D><D>N/A </D><D>4.12 </D><D>0.024 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>(</D>h) <D>(</D>h) <D>45.66 </D><D>N/A </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>18,700 </D><D/>f 1,000 <D>0.42 </D><D>0.002 </D><D>0.042</D><F/>a Profit totals reflect proprietary firms only.<F/>b Profits exclusive of salary.<F/>c Profits including salaries.<F/>d Based on profit margin of ambulatory facilities.<F/>e Based on profit margin of nursing home sector.<F/>f Medical equipment supply firms only.<F/>g Ratio reflects private firms only.<F/>h Health care budgets not estimated.<F/></ITAG></ITAG>a. <T3>Introduction. </T3>Executive Order 12291 (46 FR 13197, February 19,1981) requires that a regulatory impact analysis be conducted for any rulehaving major economic consequences on the national economy, individualindustries, geographical regions, or levels of government. Similarly, theRegulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>) requires the Occupational Safety and Health Administration(OSHA) to consider the impact of the regulation on small entities.Consistent with these requirements, OSHA has prepared a preliminary RegulatoryImpact and Regulatory Flexibility Analysis for the proposed BloodbornePathogens standard. This analysis describes the industries affected bythe standard, the potential benefits that will be realized by health careworkers and others who are currently at risk, the current infection controlpractices in the workplace, the costs of compliance, and OSHA's assessmentof the technological and economic feasibility of the standard.b. <T3>Industry Profile. </T3>Of interest in this proposed rulemaking arethose workplaces in which employees are exposed to blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials (as defined earlier in this preamble) during the performanceof their duties. OSHA has included sixteen industry sectors in this analysis:hospitals (SIC 806); dental offices (SIC 802); offices of physicians (SIC802, 803); medical and dental laboratories (SIC 807); nursing homes (SIC805); residential care facilities (SIC 836); outpatient care facilities(SIC 808); blood collections and processing (SIC 809); health clinics inindustrial facilities (various SIC codes); research laboratories (SIC 7391);law enforcement (SIC 9221); fire protection (SIC 9224); correctional institutions(SIC 9223); funeral homes (SIC 726); personnel services (SIC 7362); andmedical and dental equipment repair (SIC 384,7699).Estimates of the number of affected establishments were based largely ongovernment statistical publications as presented in a report to OSHA byJack Faucett Associates (JFA) [Ex. 13]. Table VII-1 enumerates affectedestablishments by SIC code. As shown in the table, an estimated 616,880establishments will be affected by the proposed rule.JFA also provided estimates of the affected worker population. The majoroccupational groups exposed to blood and other infectious materials includenurses, physicians, dental professionals, laboratory workers, phlebotomists,and emergency responders. Table VII-2 provides a tabular summary of thepopulation at risk. (Except where otherwise noted, population at risk dataare based on the Bureau of Labor Statistics' (BLS) Industry OccupationMatrix for 1986). The 5.3 million workers identified do not include stateand local government workers in states without state occupational safetyand health plans, because these workers are not covered by OSHA. Thus,unless noted otherwise, estimates of the population at risk and the numberof affected establishments used below reflect state and local governmentsonly to the extent that state occupational safety and health plans arein place. Moreover, the estimate does not include the reported 190,000self-employed physicians and dentists who would not fall under OSHA's purview.The most common routes of exposure are by needlestick or entry throughmucousal membranes or non-intact skin. These types of exposure occur acrossall of the affected industry sectors and throughout the various occupationalcategories. Exposure also takes place via cuts with sharp instruments orbroken glass. Other routes of exposure are more or less confined to certaintypes of procedures. For example, laboratory employees may be exposed tocontaminated equipment such as centrifuges or pipetting devices.The remainder of this section briefly examines each industry, developingestimates of the number of affected establishments and employees, and describingthe industry structure. Sources of exposure are also discussed.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>1.<T4>_Establishment Summary</T4> <H1>SIC code </H1><H1>Type of establishment </H1><H1>Number of establishments</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">801,803 <D>Offices of physicians </D><D>179,405</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">802 <D>Offices of Dentists </D><D>94,994</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">805 <D>Nursing homes </D><D>18,247</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">806 <D>Hospitals </D><D>5,983</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">807 <D>Medical and dental labs </D><D>12,195</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> Medical </D><D>4,916</D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> Dental </D><D>7,279</D><ITAG tagnum="1">808 <D>Outpatient care </D><D>29,706</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">809 <D>Blood/plasma/tissue centers </D><D>672</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">836 <D>Residential care </D><D>20,537</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7362 <D>Personnel services </D><D>1,615</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">726 <D>Funeral services </D><D>15,051</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">\1\ <D>Health units in industry </D><D>221,650</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7391 <D>Research labs </D><D>2,146</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9221 <D>Law enforcement </D><D>\2\ 6,205</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9224 <D>Fire and rescue </D><D>\3\ 3,174</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">9223 <D>Correctional facilities </D><D>2,333</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">384 <D>Medical equipment repair </D><D>2,967</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D> </D><D>616,880</D><F>\1\ Includes various SIC codes.</F><F>\2\ Includes state and local departments only.</F><F>\3\ Includes fire departments and private ambulance services.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>2._<T4>Summary of Population At Risk </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Number of affected workers]</ITAG><H1>  </H1><H1>Hospitals </H1><H1>Dental offices </H1><H1>Physicians offices</H1><H1>Med./dent. labs </H1><H1>Research labs </H1><H1>Police depts. </H1><H1>Fire andamp; rescue </H1><H1>Nursing homes </H1><H1>Residential care </H1><H1>Outpatient care </H1><H1>Funeral homes </H1><H1>Personnel services </H1><H1>Correctional institutions </H1><H1>Blood/tissue collection </H1><H1>Industrial clinics </H1><H1>Equipment repair </H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Physicians <D>100,460 </D><D>1,194 </D><D>208,929 </D><D>2,223 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>2,294 </D><D>579 </D><D>50,586 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>2,251 </D><D> </D><D>368,516</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dentists <D>1,938 </D><D>74,679 </D><D>451 </D><D>233 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>295 </D><D> </D><D>2,371 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>79,967</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Registered nurses <D>756,836 </D><D>1,505 </D><D>97,515 </D><D>534 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>10,366 </D><D>1,074 </D><D>119,877 </D><D> </D><D>43,455 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>1,031,162</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lic. pract. nurses <D>301,951 </D><D>486 </D><D>52,759 </D><D>248 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>116,565 </D><D>8,125 </D><D>33,530 </D><D> </D><D>28,556 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>542,220</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Occupational nurse <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>8,492 </D><D> </D><D>8,492</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Therapists <D>83,730 </D><D>136 </D><D>5,815 </D><D>228 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>23,297 </D><D>1,460 </D><D>14,124 </D><D> </D><D>2,235 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>131,025</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Therapy assistants <D>16,998 </D><D> </D><D>1,191 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>3,760 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>21,949</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dental hygienists <D>620 </D><D>84,332 </D><D>495 </D><D>164 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>50 </D><D> </D><D>890 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>86,551</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Laboratory tech. <D>132,619 </D><D>566 </D><D>30,075 </D><D>28,065 </D><D> </D><D>7,820 </D><D> </D><D>233 </D><D> </D><D>14,281 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>213,659</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Emerg. med. tech. <D>12,921 </D><D> </D><D>239 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>25,550 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>11,621 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>50,331</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Surgical tech. <D>31,497 </D><D>77 </D><D>864 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>317 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>32,775</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other health prof. <D>54,327 </D><D>886 </D><D>6,026 </D><D>2,399 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>302 </D><D>2,809 </D><D>4,387 </D><D>27,359 </D><D>357 </D><D>38,486 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>137,338</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dental asst. <D>1,390 </D><D>148,556 </D><D>564 </D><D>211 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>185 </D><D> </D><D>3,983 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>154,889</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing aids/orderlies <D>325,743 </D><D> </D><D>1,641 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>509,573 </D><D>40,282 </D><D>60,814 </D><D> </D><D>43,112 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>981,165</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Psychiatric aids <D>52,042 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>2,636 </D><D>850 </D><D>(in above) </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>55,528</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other health service <D>41,792 </D><D>465 </D><D>929 </D><D>1,932 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>4,876 </D><D>2,885 </D><D>7,747 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>27,564 </D><D> </D><D>88,190</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Physician asst. <D>4,792 </D><D> </D><D>11,207 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>705 </D><D> </D><D>5,004 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>21,708</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical asst. <D>16,204 </D><D>1,104 </D><D>88,621 </D><D>423 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>1,190 </D><D> </D><D>7,930 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>115,472</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Ambulance drivers <D>2,830 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>5,382 </D><D>119 </D><D> </D><D>1,322 </D><D>754 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>10,407</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitors andamp; cleaners <D>206,450 </D><D>8,690 </D><D>28,801 </D><D>1,313 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>103,182 </D><D>20,927 </D><D>4,998 </D><D>4,375 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>692 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>379,428</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Life scientists <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>2,849 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>2,849</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lab researchers <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>98,715 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>98,715</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police officers <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>200,873 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>200,873</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire fighters <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>170,515 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>170,515</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Embalmers <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>20,921 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>20,921</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections staff <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>97,945 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>97,945</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nurses/phlebotomists <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>9,300 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>9,300</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood bank lab workers <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>6,510 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>6,510</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Plasma center workers <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>5,600 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>5,600</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tissue bank workers <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>96 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>96</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Emergency personnel <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>234,536 </D><D> </D><D>234,536</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Unpackers/cleaners <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>1,882 </D><D>1,882</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total affected </ITAG><D>2,145,140 </D><D>322,676 </D><D>536,122 </D><D>40,822 </D><D>98,715 </D><D>208,693 </D><D>201,749 </D><D>778,375 </D><D>80,569 </D><D>370,514 </D><D>26,407 </D><D>155,844 </D><D>97,945 </D><D>22,198 </D><D>223,903 </D><D>1,882 </D><D>5,311,554</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis; Bureau of Labor Statistics; and Jack Faucett Associates.</F></ITAG>Hospitals. It is expected that approximately 5,983 hospitals will be affectedby the proposed standard. There are 343 federal hospitals. Of the remaining5,640, it is estimated that approximately 979 are administered by stateand local governments in state plan states. Virtually all hospitals fall into one of three major categories: long-term,short term, or psychiatric. The American Hospital Association (AHA) reportsthat 90 percent of all nonfederal hospitals are classified as short-term,or community hospitals. Roughly 60 percent of all community hospitals arenon-profit. OSHA believes that over 2,000,000 workers are at risk in hospitals. Nursesand nursing aids comprise over 60 percent of the population at risk. Physicians(including surgeons), laboratory technicians, and janitors collectivelymake up an additional 20 percent (Ex. 13, p. I-16). As most hospitals perform a great variety of services, there are many differentexposure scenarios. The most frequently reported route of exposure forhospital personnel is by needlestick, with the greatest potential for exposureoccurring during needle recapping (Ex. 13, pp. II-16, -19). Other hospitalprocedures that are associated with frequent exposure include phlebotomy,IV line placement, bronchoscopy, intubation, airway suction, endoscopy,colonoscopy, and proctosigmoidoscopy (Ex. 13, p. II-19). The highest riskareas in hospitals include the emergency room, surgical suite, hemodialysiscenter, and intensive care unit. Laundry workers and janitors may be exposedwhen handling contaminated linen or refuse. Total revenue in 1986 for all hospitals is estimated at $174 billion (Ex.13, p. I-10), about 84% of which was received by community hospitals. Thetotal margin for hospitals, that is, the difference between revenue fromall sources and total expenses expressed as a percentage of total revenue,is estimated to be about 4.5 to 5% (Ex. 13. p. I-10). U.S. Commerce Departmentestimates indicate that the 1988 total revenue for hospitals affected bythe standard will be $169.1 billion with profits for proprietary hospitalstotalling $1.6 billion. Offices of Physicians. As shown in Table VII-1, an estimated 179,405 physicians'offices will be covered by the proposed rule. (This estimate is based on1982 Census of Service Industries for offices with salaried employees).While exposure to blood and body fluids would be expected in a physician'soffice, the increase in the number of physician office laboratories (POLs)now provides an even greater potential for exposure. These office-basedlaboratory facilities have recently grown in number by about 15 percentannually, though the total number of such facilities is unknown (Ex. 13,p. I-38). The number of potentially exposed workers in physicians' offices is estimatedto be 536,122 (Ex. 13, p. I-37). Physicians are the predominant occupationalgroup, making up just under 40 percent of the total. (As noted above, 119,000self-employed physicians are excluded). Nurses comprise approximately 28percent of the total and medical assistants about 17 percent. Frequency and type of exposure in a physician's office depends on the typeof practice and the distribution of tasks. It is likely that phlebotomyis performed in a large number of offices, especially those with laboratoryfacilities. This task is typically performed by nurses. Nurses also changewound dressings. Physicians performing gynecological examinations or examiningpatients for sexually transmitted diseases are most certainly at risk.Invasive procedures and examination of mucous membranes can also put theexamining physician at risk. Other types of procedures commonly encounteredwhich place physicians and physicians' assistants at risk are treatmentof lacerations, abrasions, and compound fractures. Revenue for SIC codes 801 and 803 (offices of medical doctors and of doctorsof osteopathy, respectively) totalled $76.7 billion in 1986 and are expectedto climb to about $92 billion in 1988. Pre-tax profits are expected toreach $6.9 billion, non-inclusive of physicians' salaries. Profits includingphysicians' salaries are expected to total $57.5 billion (Ex. 13, p. I-33,-36). Offices of Dentists. Based on 1982 Census data, OSHA estimates that 94,994dental facilities will be affected by the proposed rule. (As noted abovefor Offices of Physicians, this includes offices with salaried employees).Dentist office laboratories numbered 9,737 in 1982, which is consistentwith the American Dental Association (ADA) report that 11% of all dentistspractice in an office with a laboratory. However, only 8.4% of these officesemploy a lab technician (Ex. 13, p. I-26). The potentially exposed workforce numbers 322,676 (Ex. 13, p. I-29). DentalAssistants are the predominant occupational category, with over 148,000listed by BLS. The number of dental hygienists is estimated to be 84,332and the number of dentists is approximately 74,679. (The 71,000 dentistswho are reported as self-employed were not included in this figure). Datafrom the ADA indicate that 51% of all dental practices employ hygienists,with a mean work week of 23 hours for this occupation. About 88% of dentalpractices employ a dental assistant (Ex. 13, p. I-27, -28). Evidence suggests that a common route of exposure in the dental officeis allowing chapped or abraded skin to come into contact with saliva and/orblood. Also, dental staff receive on average in excess of one needlestickinjury per month, a result consistent with the high percentage of dentalstaff who engage in recapping (Ex. 13, p. 11-52). Instances where the faceor eyes are splashed or spattered with saliva, blood, or tissue fluidsalso increases risk. Dental workers are also exposed if improper proceduresare employed when disinfecting dental instruments. Revenues for dental offices for 1986 were reported by the U.S. CommerceDepartment to be $21.4 billion. Operating profits were 7.7% of revenues,according to data from Robert Morris Associates. Commerce Department estimatesindicate that 1988 total revenues for dentists will be $25.7 billion. Applyingthe 1987 profit margin of 7.9% yields total profits for 1988 of $2 billion(Ex. 13, p. I-27). Total income, including dentists' salaries, was also estimated. ADA datafrom 1983 indicate that general practitioners had average annual grossincome of $154,830 and average net income of $55,570. For specialists,average gross income was $213,700, and net income was $84,250 (Ex. 13,p. I-28). Assuming an average net income of $60,000, an average numberof dentists per practice of 3.4, and a number of affected practices of94,994, yields a total income estimate of approximately $19 billion.Medical and Dental Laboratories. Census data from 1982 indicate that approximately12,000 medical and dental labs will be affected by the proposed rule. Anestimated 7,279 dental laboratories and 4,916 medical laboratories wereidentified (Ex. 13, p. I-39). The population at risk in medical and dental labs totals 40,822 workers(Ex. 13, p. I-41). Laboratory technicians comprise 68 percent of this total.Other occupational categories represented include physicians (2,223), phlebotomistsand medical technologists (4,754), janitors (2,849) and nurses (782). Accordingto census data, medical labs averaged 13 employees each and dental labsaveraged 5 employees each in 1984. Procedures that most often result in exposure in the laboratory are specimencollection and specimen processing. Workers are exposed through needlesticks(phlebotomists), spills, or the improper use of laboratory equipment, suchas the centrifuge. Phlebotomists appear to have the highest rate of exposureincidents (Ex. 13, p. II-68). Revenues for medical labs were $4.4 billion in 1986, and dental lab receiptstotaled $1.6 billion for that year. Based on Robert Morris data, medicallabs realized pre-tax profits of 7.5% of total receipts in 1986, and thusearned net profits of $300 million. Assuming the same margin is applicablefor dental labs yields a net profit figure of $120 million for 1986. Revenuefor medical and dental labs is estimated to be $7.1 billion in 1988, withprofits totalling $475 million (Ex. 13, p. I-39). Nursing Homes. This sector includes three types of facilities: nursinghomes, of which there are estimated to be about 17,000; homes for emotionallydisturbed children, of which there are 322; and homes for the mentallyill, of which there are 1,341. (Preliminary data on number of establishmentswere obtained from the 1986 National Center for Health Statistics surveyof nursing and related care homes and from the public Health Service.)It was reported that in 1988 roughly 72% of nursing homes were proprietary(Ex. 13, pp. I-55, -56).The potentially exposed workforce for this sector is estimated at 778,375.Nursing aids and orderlies are by far the most numerous workers, comprisingover 65% of the total. Over 125,000 nurses are potentially exposed, aswell as over 100,000 janitors and cleaners (Ex. 13. p. I-59). It is the nursing staff who most often come into contact with body fluidsof patients. Although the types of care rendered do not put staff intodirect contact with blood very often, some contact with blood occurs. Needlesticksand sharps do not appear to present a great hazard, as the number of invasiveprocedures performed by staff is generally low (Ex. 13. p. II-97). Nonetheless,the number of these exposures is increasing as cost-containment measuresby hospitals encourage early patient release. As OSHA lacks full informationon these job tasks, the Agency requests additional public comment on thenature of employee exposures to blood and other infectious materials innursing homes. The 1986 revenue for nursing homes was $26.4 billion, representing 9.4%of the national health care budget. Based on Commerce Department information,gross revenues for those homes affected by the proposed rule will be $30.6billion in 1988 (Ex. 13, p. I-58). Using the 1987 Robert Morris pre-taxprofit estimate of 4.3% of receipts, 1988 profits for proprietary homesare estimated to be $960 million. Residential Care. Residential care establishments affected by the proposedrule number about 20,537, based on information obtained from the NationalCenter for Health Statistics for 1986. These include homes for the elderlyand homes for the developmentally disabled. About 83% of homes for theelderly and 43% of homes for the developmentally disabled are proprietary.Homes for the elderly are generally quite small, with about 60% consistingof only 3 to 9 beds (Ex. 13, p. I-64, -65). BLS employment data suggest that 80,569 workers are at risk in residentialcare facilities. As in nursing homes, nursing aids and orderlies make upthe largest percentage of workers. About 50% of all potentially exposedworkers fall into this category. Janitors and cleaners make up another25% and over 9,000 nurses are at risk (Ex. 13, p. I-69). As in nursing homes, blood exposures in residential care facilities donot occur often, but contact with blood does occur. The risk of exposureis greatest where unprotected chapped or non-intact skin comes into contactwith blood or other potentially infectious materials. As noted above fornursing homes, OSHA requests additional public comment on the nature ofpotential exposures in this sector. Estimated 1986 revenues for residential facilities affected by the standardwere $7.4 billion. Estimated revenues for 1988 are $8.7 billion (Ex. 13,p. I-66) and estimated profits for proprietary facilities are estimatedto be approximately $254 million. Outpatient Care Facilities. Most outpatient care facilities fall into oneof the following six categories: Health Maintenance Organizations (HMOs),freestanding ambulatory, hospices, home health care, drug treatment, orhemodialysis. An estimate of the number of HMOs is based on the 1987 Census of HealthMaintenance Organizations conducted by Interstudy and includes 654 establishments(Ex. 13, p. I-72). Most HMOs are independent, but some are administeredby insurance companies (31 plans), hospital chains (10 plans), and corporationsor consulting firms (16 plans) (Ex. 13, p. I-72). The number of ambulatory care facilities is estimated to be 4,300, basedon information for 1987 from the National Association of Ambulatory Care(NAAC). A reported 41.4% of these facilities are owned by corporations(Ex. 13, p. I-74). Information published in 1987 puts the number of hospice care facilitiesat about 812, excluding hospices based in hospitals or home health establishments.The vast majority of hospices are non-profit, with 42% being independent,community based organizations (Ex. 13, p. I-74). The number of home health care facilities that would be affected is estimatedto be 7,000, based on 1987 data on Medicare-certified establishments andon 1987 data from the National Association of Home Health Care (Ex. 13,p. I-72). The most recent data regarding drug treatment centers, a 1982 survey bythe National lnstitute on Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism, placed the numberof such facilities at 4,818. Excluding those facilities based in hospitalsand correctional facilities leaves an estimated 3,887 centers that classifyas outpatient facilities (Ex. 13, p. I-75). Medicare-certified hemodialysis centers numbered 1,578 in 1986, but only861 were freestanding. About 80% of these facilities are for-profit (Ex.13, p. I-75). Also, 10,483 government outpatient care facilities are estimated to bein operation (Ex. 13, p. I-75A). It is likely that this total includesa number of facilities which provide care for the mentally retarded. Thus, the total number of outpatient facilities believed to be coveredby the proposed rule is 29,706. The affected worker population totals 370,514 (Ex. 13, p. I-79). Over 150,000nurses are at risk in this sector, as well as approximately 61,000 nursingaids and orderlies. An estimated 50,586 physicians and surgeons are alsoat risk. With so many different kinds of services offered within this SIC, all majorroutes of exposure are expected. Ambulatory centers and HMOs perform manyof the same procedures that are performed in a physician's office, andthus exposure routes are similar to those outlined for that sector. Homehealth and hospice services perform many of the same procedures performedin a nursing home or residential care facility, and thus the exposure potentialis similar. Over 14,000 laboratory technicians were identified in thissector by BLS, so exposure via laboratory procedures and equipment is probable.Revenues for home health care establishments is estimated at $8 billion,as this was the level of expenditure on such services in 1987. Total revenuefor ambulatory centers is estimated at $2 billion, based on 1983 data compiledby NAAC. Profit levels for ambulatory care centers were reportedly 5.1%of profits (Ex. 13, pp. I-76, -77). In 1988, outpatient facilities areprojected to receive about $33.7 billion in revenues and proprietary facilitiesare projected to receive about $1.0 billion in profits. Blood Collections and Processing. According to information received fromthe American Association of Blood Banks (AABB), there are 260 independentblood centers in operation. About 400 plasma centers and 12 tissue bankswill also be affected by the proposed rule, based on information suppliedby the American Blood Resources Association (ABRA) and the American Associationof Tissue Banks (Ex. 13, p. I-95). The population at risk for this sector is estimated to be 22,198 workers(Ex. 13, p. I-98). Phlebotomists, nurses, and laboratory workers are thepredominant occupational categories for blood banks, and it is reasonableto assume that this is also true for plasma centers and tissue banks. Over40% of all blood center employees are part-time.Workers in this sector are exposed most often during blood collection andblood processing. As in medical and dental labs (discussed above), workersin this SIC are exposed through needlesticks (phlebotomists), mucous membranecontacts, spills, or the improper use of laboratory equipment, such asthe centrifuge [Ex. 13. pp. II-125-127]. Revenue for blood centers was estimated at $1.3 billion in 1987, basedon data obtained from 106 members of AABB. Using this figure as an indicatorfor the sector as a whole yields a total revenue estimate of $1.42 billionfor SIC 809. Health Clinics in Industrial Facilities. Of the 16 sectors included inthis analysis, this sector includes the most facilities, as 221,650 industrialhealth clinics have been identified [Ex. 13. p. I-10]. These services arein operation throughout industry and are not peculiar to any SIC code orindustry sector. The potentially exposed workforce is estimated to be 223,903. The greatmajority of these workers are full or part-time emergency personnel. Inalmost 11,000 workplaces, a physician or nurse is in charge [Ex. 13, pp.I-100-101]. Traumatic injuries occur in industrial facilities, giving rise to potentialfor blood exposure. Invasive procedures or the changing of wound dressingsalso occur. Research Laboratories. For the purposes of this analysis, research laboratoriesinclude any laboratory performing research activities where workers maybe occupationally exposed to blood or other potentially infectious materials.(This definition differs from that used in the standard which defines asresearch laboratories only those facilities producing research laboratoryscale amounts of HIV or HBV.) Research laboratories have been classifiedinto four categories: academic labs; independent labs; captive labs (industryaffiliated); and government sponsored labs. The number of labs covered by the proposed rule is estimated at 2,146 [Ex.13, p. I-42]. These include 246 academic labs, 719 independent labs, 1081captive labs, and 100 medical labs sponsored by the federal government.These estimates are based on a 1987 survey of laboratories performed byBooz, Allen, and Hamilton (BAH) and on 1982 Census of Manufactures data.The potentially exposed workforce is estimated to be 98,715 [Ex. 13, p.I-46]. These workers are scientists, research assistants, and laboratorytechnicians. Exposure incidents in this sector, as in all others, tend to be linkedto procedures. Workers in these types of establishments, however, havelittle or no patient contact. Spills, which may cause infectious materialto come into contact with non-intact skin, mucous membrane contamination,and cuts with sharp instruments are the most frequent routes of exposurein these facilities. Reduction of risk will be almost totally dependentupon the use of engineering controls and proper laboratory work practiceswhen handling potentially infectious materials. Paragraph (e) of the standardcontains special requirements for research laboratories and productionfacilities handling the concentrated virus. Additional training requirementsfor employees in these facilities is found in paragraph (9)(2)(v). Based on a study by the National Science Foundation, approximately 28%of funds expended for private research went for medical research. Thistranslates to an annual budget of $2.5 billion for 1986. Additionally,$3.8 billion was spent in the U.S on pharmaceutical research in 1986. Profitmargins for commercial and development labs were 4.3 percent of receiptsfor that year. Information obtained by BAH indicates that federally sponsoredlabs have average budgets of $2.2 million. Assuming this figure is applicableto medical research labs, the 100 federally sponsored medical labs wouldhave a total budget of about $220 million [Ex, JFA, pp. I-43-44]. Total revenues for this sector are estimated to be $10.3 billion [Ex. 13,p. I-44]. Profits for proprietary labs are estimated at $433 million. Law Enforcement. The total number of law enforcement establishments affectedis approximately 6,205 [Ex. 13, p. I-47]. This number includes state andlocal police departments in states with state occupational safety and healthplans. These departments employ approximately 170,000 workers who are atrisk. Based on Bureau of Justice Statistics (BJS) and Census Bureau data,Federal law enforcement personnel at risk number approximately 31,000.These personnel, at risk because their jobs provide potential for contactwith blood and blood contaminated weapons and drug paraphernalia, are estimatedto represent 70 percent of all law enforcement officers [Ex. 13, p. I-48].Additionally, approximately 8,000 laboratory technicians are estimatedto be at risk in police labs [Ex. 13, p. I-49]. Law enforcement personnel are at risk because they may come into contactwith blood or other potentially infectious materials during the courseof duty. In the event that violent crime or life-saving situations areencountered, appropriate precautions need to be taken in the form of properwork practices and personal protective equipment. The frequency of theseexposures varies with the locality and the rate of violent crime, but OSHAestimates that about 10% of these employees are exposed on a fairly frequentbasis. According to BJS, expenditures for law enforcement totalled $22 billionfor fiscal year 1984-85. State and local governments spent $19.2 billionand federal expenditures were $2.8 billion [Ex. JFA. p. I-47]. It is estimatedthat 1988 expenditures will be $30.8 billion, with 47.5%, or $16.7 billion,occurring in state-plan states. Fire Protection. About 3,174 fire departments will be covered by the proposedrule. All-volunteer fire departments do not come under OSHA's purview andthus are not included in this estimate. (The actual number of stations,however, appears to be roughly 5,232, as many departments operate out ofmore than one station.) Private emergency medical establishments numberabout 500 [Ex. 13, p. I-51]. The potentially exposed workforce is estimated to be 201,749 workers. Theseare mostly career fire fighters plus volunteers who are paid part-timewages. Private rescue services employ 25,550 of these potentially exposedworkers [Ex. 13, p. I-53]. Emergency responders, who are estimated to comprise about 30% of theseemployees, are very often in situations where there is a potential foroccupational exposure. Emergency medical technicians perform invasive proceduresand administer resuscitation. These workers are frequently exposed to blood.Expenditures on fire protection in state plan states is estimated to beapproximately $4.0 billion [Ex. 13, p. I-52]. Correctional Institutions. An estimated 2,333 correctional institutionsare affected by the proposed rule. Of these, 47 facilities are federallyadministered. A reported 65 of the 2,333 facilities identified medicaltreatment or hospitalization as a primary function. (These figures arebased on BJS census information for the years 1983 and 1984). [Ex. 13,p. I-92] The number of state and local custody and security employees estimatedto be at risk is 74,000. Additionally, 12,000 treatment, and educationemployees are estimated to be at risk in state and local facilities. Addingthe 12,000 federal workers at risk yields a total population at risk of98,000 [Ex. 13, p. I-92]. Situations putting correctional employees at risk of blood exposure includeviolence and emergency medical treatment. While exposure to other potentiallyinfectious materials takes place in correctional facilities, such situationsdo not occur on a daily basis. Expenditures for corrections in state plan states is estimated to havereached $6.9 billion in fiscal year 1984-85. Federal government expenditureswere $779 million in 1985. Total expenditures are expected to be $9.9 billionin 1988 [Ex. 13, p. I-92]. Funeral Homes. The number of funeral homes believed to be affected by theproposed rule is 15,051. This is based on the 1982 Census of Service Industries[Ex. 13, p. I-84]. The total number of workers estimated to be at risk in funeral homes is26,407 [Ex. 13, p. I-87]. The majority of these workers are embalmers (about80%) with janitors making up most of those remaining. Procedures placing funeral home workers at risk of exposure are embalming,cleaning, disinfecting, and transporting cadavers. Embalmers are at riskdue to the presence of uncontained blood, and the need to handle variousbody parts and tissues and to suture incisions. According to census data, revenues for all funeral services and crematorieswere $5.5 billion in 1986. Average profit margins were estimated to havebeen 7.1% in 1987, making profit levels for the industry about $390 million[Ex. 13, p. I-84]. Personnel Services. JFA estimates that between 1,301 and 1,615 personnelfirms worked with registered nurses in 1983 [Ex. 13, p. I-88]. For thepurposes of this analysis, OSHA assumes that there are 1,615 affected establishmentsin this sector. BLS estimates that only about one-tenth of all temporary workers work inthe health field. This potentially exposed workforce is approximated at155,844 [Ex. 13, p. I-89]. These workers are primarily nurses and nursingaides. The risk of exposure for temporary nurses and nursing aides is the sameas for permanent nurses. Revenues for personnel supply companies were $10.4 billion in 1986, accordingto the Service Annual Survey. On the assumption that revenues are dividedby establishment share, $2.7 billion is estimated to have been earned bythose personnel service companies affected by the proposed rule. Similarly,pre-tax profits were estimated at $70 million, based on data reported byRobert Morris Associates. Revenues in 1988 are projected to be $3.2 billionwhile profits are projected to be $96 million [Ex. 13, p. I-88]. Medical Equipment Repair. OSHA estimates that 2,967 facilities that repairmedical or dental equipment will be affected by the proposed rule. The1982 Census of Manufactures includes 2,711 of these establishments in themedical instrument industry. Industry sectors included: Surgical and MedicalInstruments (SIC 3841); Surgical Appliances and Supplies (SIC 3842); andDental Equipment and Supplies (SIC 3843). In addition, 256 firms were identifiedwhich exclusively repair and service medical equipment [Ex. 13, p. I-104].The affected workforce, which is estimated to be 1,882 workers [Ex. 13,p. I-107], includes only those workers who unpackage and clean and disinfectthe equipment prior to servicing. The total value of shipments for this sector is estimated to be $18.7 billion,based on Commerce Department data. Assuming profit margins are approximatelyequal to those of 1987, profits for this industry will be $1 billion [Ex.13, p. I-105].c. <T3>Benefits_Introduction.</T3> OSHA's standard to reduce occupationalexposure to bloodborne pathogens, including hepatitis B virus (HBV), non-A,non-B hepatitis virus, and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), includesprovisions applicable to the wide range of occupational settings wherepotential exposure to such bloodborne pathogens exist. This section describeshow the standard will reduce the risk and estimates the expected reductionin HBV cases among the employees affected by the standard. These estimatesare based on data and information provided to OSHA by Jack Faucett Associates,the Centers for Disease Control (CDC), and commenters to the rulemakingrecord. Hazard Abatement. OSHA's standard for reducing worker exposure to bloodbornepathogens includes eight primary categories of control. The standard isbased on the adoption of universal precautions as a method of infectioncontrol. Fundamentally different from traditional procedures that isolateknown infectious individuals and materials in the health care setting,this approach assumes that all human blood and certain body fluids andtissues are potentially infectious for HIV, HBV, and other bloodborne pathogens.The rationale for this approach is that carriers of these diseases arenot always identifiable in the health care giving setting, and that contaminatedmaterials are not always properly labelled. Thus, the exposed worker canbe at great risk without warning. The standard will apply to widely varying workplace settings, includingresearch laboratories, funeral homes, hospitals, prisons and police andfire departments. Hazard abatement measures will be developed by the employerto best suit the workplace setting and accomplish the common objectiveof protecting the worker from contact with blood and other potentiallyinfectious materials. In implementing the standard, employers will first develop an infectioncontrol program that identifies (1) the tasks and work areas that are likelyto present exposures to blood, or other potentially infectious products,(2) the employee positions that are involved, and (3) the controls thatwill be used to reduce the potential risk. All exposed employees must participate in employer provided training, whichis to be accomplished within 90 days of the effective date of the standardor at the time of employment, and at least annually thereafter. The trainingmust include clinical and epidemiologic information about infectious diseases,modes of transmission, and means to reduce risks of exposure. It must designatespecific procedures to be used in the work setting and specific policiesto deal with exposures. In a series of case studies conducted by Jack Faucett Associates, hospitalsreported that one of the most important aspects of employee compliancewith infection control programs was an understanding of the risk. The employeetraining that conveys this risk becomes an indispensable link in hazardabatement.Another requirement of the standard is that employers offer prescreeningand HBV vaccine to those employees who are exposed to blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials on average once or more times per month. HBV vaccinationis a means of achieving substantial reduction in the risk of infectionfor non-immune employees, achieving up to a 98 percent rate of efficacy(Exs. 4-20; 6-45). The standard also requires post exposure evaluation and treatment. Thisincludes testing to determine whether there has been transmission of infection,and follow-up treatment and counseling. In the case of exposure to HBV,follow-up treatment can prevent illness. Thus, procedures for reportingexposures are an important part of the infection control program. Additional controls that employers will use include engineering controls,work practices, personal protective equipment and housekeeping measures.There is a clear understanding that effective hazard abatement in healthcare settings will require a full range of protective measures, with personalprotective clothing being integral to the program. Engineering controlssuch as splash guards and biosafety cabinets will complement work practicesinvolving safe use of centrifuges and housekeeping provisions for disposalof needles and sharps. In one study, approximately 41% of the laboratoryaccidents preceding infection were related to needles and sharps and anadditional 27% were related to spillage and splashes, especially from centrifugeuse (Ex. 13, p. II-79). Collins also reports that 37% of the infected laboratorystaff were not trained. Work practices can also have a substantial impact on hazard abatement byaltering the manner in which a task is performed. Needlesticks, which occurfrequently when recapping contaminated needles, have been identified asa major route of exposure. Indeed, the most commonly reported route ofexposure to blood and other potentially infectious materials is the needlestickor cut with other types of sharps. Health care facilities report an averageof 4 to 16 needlesticks per 100 employees per year (Ex. 6-82; Ex. 4-13),and these figures may underestimate the actual exposure rate by 40 to 50percent (Ex. 13, p. II-16; Ex. 6-100). Maynard and Hollinger have estimatedthat at least 1 percent of hospitalized patients are HBV carriers, andGerberding has estimated a seroconversion rate of 19 to 27 percent forHBV after accidental percutaneous injection of blood serum from patientswho are positive for HBe antigen (highly contagious)(Ex. 6-114). In conjunction with a firmly enforced policy of not recapping needles byhand, adequate and accessible puncture resistant disposal containers mustbe provided in order to substantially reduce these exposures (Ex. 13, p.II-29). Studies suggest that adopting a point-of-use, puncture resistantcontainer system may reduce injuries for housekeeping, medical and nursingstaff (Ex. 13, p. II-30). Under this standard the employer shall make appropriate personal protectiveequipment readily accessible if there is a potential for exposure to bloodor other potentially infectious materials. The equipment shall includegloves, masks, face shields, gowns, and aprons of appropriate material.In addition, emergency ventilation devices shall be used to minimize theneed for mouth-to-mouth resuscitation. The use of personal protective equipment is a direct line of defense forhealth care workers whose exposures occur through contact with infectedpatients. Gowns and gloves, used for many years in surgery and nurseries,are now routinely used by many emergency room and hemodialysis personnelto reduce the risk of infection and disease transmission. The effectivenessof these controls in reducing the incidence of HBV infections is exemplifiedby the experience of a large mid-western hospital, which in the 1970'shad a growing number of infections among its staff. After instituting afull range of infection control practices the hospital reported no knownHBV infection in 1986 and 1987 (Ex. 13, p. 88). In order to evaluate suchprograms, OSHA requests additional public comment on infection controlexperiences of other affected institutions. Since linens or waste products contaminated with blood or other potentiallyinfectious products may present a risk of disease transmission, the proposedstandard establishes procedures for the handling of contaminated linenand waste by housekeeping or laundry staff. The standard provides measuresthat will reduce contact with contaminated linens and waste by requiringclearly labelled, leakproof containers or bags. Under the standard, laboratories producing HIV and HBV for research orlaboratories concentrating these viruses shall conduct procedures accordingto paragraph (e) of the proposed standard. These procedures were derivedfrom the NIH/CDC guidelines for Biosafety Level (BSL) 2 and BSL 3. As documented earlier in this preamble, concentrated HBV and HIV presenta high risk for infection in the laboratory environment, thus emphasizingthe importance of implementing stringent infection control practices inthis facility type. Population-at-Risk. Table VII-3 identifies by SIC code and facility typeOSHA's estimates of the total number of workers at risk of exposure toHBV and HIV. The population-at-risk of HBV infection is a subset of thetotal population at risk of HIV infection because prior exposure or vaccinationmay result in immunity to HBV infection. Quantification of Benefits. Bloodborne pathogens are associated with avariety of diseases among employees exposed to infectious materials, andOSHA has not been able to quantify all of the potential benefits expectedfrom the proposed standard. Most importantly, the relatively short historyof the HIV epidemic has made it difficult to develop a precise projectionof the number of job-related AIDS cases that will be averted. It is knownthat the probability of HIV transmission in most workplace settings islow; only 25 cases of HIV infection associated with occupational exposurehave been documented (see Health Effects). Nonetheless, the prevalenceof AIDS continues to climb rapidly among the general population, and inthe absence of strict infection control, the rate of occupational riskwill grow accordingly. A recent study conducted by CDC found that 37% ofthe reported exposures to the HIV virus could have been prevented if routineprecautions had been followed [Ex. 6-372].<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>3_<T4>Population at Risk: Health Care and Other Employees at Risk by SICand Facility </T4><H1>SIC</H1><H1>Facility name</H1><H1>Total employees</H1> High risk health care workers: <ITAG tagnum="1"> 8060 <D>Hospitals </D><D>2,145,140 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8020 <D>Dental Offices </D><D>322,676 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8010, 1830 <D>Physician's Offices </D><D>536,122 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8070 <D>Medical and Dental Labs </D><D>40,822 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8050 <D>Nursing Homes </D><D>778,375 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8360 <D>Residential Facilities </D><D>80,569 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8080 <D>Outpatient Care Facilities </D><D>370,514 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 8090 <D>Blood Banks and Others </D><D>22,198 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Industrial Clinics </D><D>223,903 </D><ITAG tagnum="1"> 7362 <D>Temporary Workers </D><D>155,844</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total at Risk of HIV<D> </D><D>4,676,163 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total at Risk of HBV, Assuming 23% Of Employees Are Now VaccinatedAnd A 15% To 30% Natural Immunity Rate<D> </D><D>2,320,436-3,021,860</D></ITAG>Other employees at risk: <ITAG tagnum="1"> 7260 <D>Funeral Homes </D><D>26,407 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 9221 <D>Police </D><D>208,693 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 9224 <D>Fire Department </D><D>201,749 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 9223 <D>Correction Workers </D><D>97,945 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> 7391 <D>Research Laboratories </D><D>98,715 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Medical Equipment </D><D>1,882</D><R>n,n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="4">Total at Risk of HIV<D> </D><D>635,391 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total at Risk of HBV, Assuming 0.1% of Employees Are Now Vaccinated,And A 15% To 30% Natural Immunity Rate<D> </D><D>444,202-539,510</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Population At Risk Of HIV<D> </D><D>5,311,554</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Population At Risk Of HBV, Given Vaccinations and Immunity <D> </D><D>2,764,638-3,561,370 </D><F>Source: Office of Regulatory Analysis, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG> In contrast to the limited knowledge concerning the risk of AIDS, the riskof contracting hepatitis B at the workplace has been studied extensivelyfor many years. OSHA therefore has developed quantitative estimates ofthe effect of the proposed standard on the future number of hepatitis Binfection cases among the employees at risk. First, OSHA addressed thevaccine provision by estimating the annual number of cases of each typeof hepatitis B that would be avoided by offering all eligible employeesthe opportunity for vaccination. The basic assumptions for this benefitsanalysis are that 15% to 30% of the workers have acquired lifetime immunityfrom past exposure to HBV, and that 23% of the health care workers and0.1% of the non-health care workers at risk have already received the vaccine(see Preliminary Quantitative Risk Assessment). Of the remaining exposedworkers, OSHA assumes that all of the identified employees, except for70% of the firemen and 90% of the police, are potentially exposed morethan once a month and therefore will be eligible for the vaccination program.OSHA assumes that 50% of these employees will choose to participate and,if found not to be immune, to receive the HBV vaccine. The efficacy ratefor the vaccine is assumed to be 90% (Ex. 4-20; 6-45; Ex. 13, p. II-32).Next, OSHA multiplied estimates of the number of employees at risk by theextent of the excess risk. As developed earlier in this preamble, the annualoccupational risk of contracting HBV infection for these employees is estimatedat from 1.74 to 2.80 per thousand employees. For the employees exposedless often than once a month, OSHA assumed that the excess risk would beone-half as large. The first four columns of Table VII-4 present estimatesof the baseline annual incidence of work-related cases of HBV infectionand the number of these cases that would be avoided annually followingthe implementation of the new vaccination programs. As shown, OSHA estimatesthat the current number of occupationally-related cases is between 5,953and 7,416 per year, of which over 40% would be prevented by offering vaccination.(More cases are predicted for the higher natural immunity rate (30%) because,given the reported number of cases and the fixed background incidence,it implies a proportionately greater risk of occupationally-related diseaseamong employees who are not immune.) The 1.7 to 2.1 million workers at risk who will not be protected by vaccinationmust rely on the other provisions of the standard, including engineeringcontrols, work practices, personal protective equipment, post-exposuremedical evaluation, housekeeping and training. In the midwestern hospitalmentioned earlier, less than 20% of the eligible employees chose to receivethe vaccine, yet this facility was able to reduce its incidence of reportedHBV infection from 160 cases during a 2-year period in the early 1970sto one case in 1985 and none in 1986 and 1987. This was accomplished throughthe establishment of a comprehensive program of infection control practices,including aggressive post-exposure protocol, and supports OSHA's beliefthat although HBV vaccination is a key protective measure, a very highdegree of disease avoidance can be maintained through ancillary infectioncontrol practices. Thus, OSHA has assumed that 75% of the remaining riskwould be prevented by implementing the non-vaccine related provisions ofthe standard.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VIII</T4>-4._<T4>Annual Baseline Cases and Cases Avoided of Occupationally Induced HepatitisB</T4> <H1>  </H1><H1>Baseline cases </H1><H2>15 immune </H2><H2>30 immune </H2><H1>Cases avoided due to vaccine </H1><H2>15 immune </H2><H2>30 immune </H2><H1>Total cases avoided </H1><H2>15 immune </H2><H2>30 immune</H2> <ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Infections <D>5,953 </D><D>7,416 </D><D>2,498 </D><D>3,049 </D><D>5,089 </D><D>6,324</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acute Symptoms <D>1,488 </D><D>1,854 </D><D>624 </D><D>762 </D><D>1,272 </D><D>1,581</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized <D>298 </D><D>371 </D><D>125 </D><D>152 </D><D>254 </D><D>316</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant Death <D>7 </D><D>9 </D><D>3 </D><D>4 </D><D>6 </D><D>8</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Carrier <D>298 </D><D>742 </D><D>125 </D><D>305 </D><D>254 </D><D>632</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB <D>74 </D><D>185 </D><D>31 </D><D>76 </D><D>64 </D><D>158</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death Cirrhosis <D>101 </D><D>126 </D><D>42 </D><D>52 </D><D>87 </D><D>108</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death PHC <D>24 </D><D>30 </D><D>10 </D><D>12 </D><D>20 </D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All Deaths <D>132 </D><D>165 </D><D>56 </D><D>68 </D><D>113 </D><D>141 </D><F>Source: Office of Regulatory Analysis, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG>   In total, considering the full combination of provisions, including vaccination,engineering controls, work practices, protective clothing, housekeeping,and training, OSHA believes that the great majority of HBV cases causedby workplace exposure can be avoided. The final columns of Table VII-4display OSHA's estimate that compliance with the standard will preventfrom between 5,089 and 6,324 cases of occupationally-contracted HBV infectionper year, of which from 1,272 to 1,581 would have resulted in acute symptoms,and from 113 to 141 in death. In addition, a considerable number of non-occupationally induced illnesseswill be prevented. OSHA estimates the background risk of HBV to be 1.74cases per 1000 employees. On this basis, immunizing the 1,210,407 to 1,595,097employees who are estimated to be vaccinated as a result of this standardwill prevent about 1,921 to 2,532 background cases per year. Furthermore,sex partners of those with HBV infections will become infected about 30%of the time (Ex. 6-425; 6-430). As over 60% of the U.S. workforce is married,OSHA assumes that about 70% of the HBV victims could potentially spreadthis disease. Thus, halting its dissemination to the non-occupationallyexposed population will boost the full benefits of the standard by about21% (30% x 70%) per year. These results, which are displayed in Table VII-5,indicate that this standard will prevent from 3,653 to 4,132 cases of non-occupationallyinduced cases of hepatitis B, of which from 81 to 92 would be fatal. TableVII-6 combines the estimates presented in the two previous tables and showsthat OSHA expects the standard, in total, to prevent from 9,221 to 9,977infections and from 205 to 222 deaths per year from both occupational andnon-occupationally-induced cases of hepatitis B.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII</T4>-5._<T4>Annual Cases Avoided of Nonoccupationally Induced Hepatitis B</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Cases avoided due to vaccine</H1><H2>15 percent immune</H2><H2>30 percent immune</H2><H1>Cases avoided by sex partners</H1><H2>15 percent immune</H2><H2>30 percent immune</H2><H1>Total cases avoided</H1><H2>15 percent immune</H2><H2>30 percent immune</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV infections<D>2,532</D><D>1,921</D><D>1,600</D><D>1,732</D><D>4,132</D><D>3,653</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acute Symptoms<D>633</D><D>480</D><D>400</D><D>433</D><D>1,033</D><D>913</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized<D>127</D><D>96</D><D>80</D><D>87</D><D>207</D><D>183</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant Death<D>3</D><D>2</D><D>2</D><D>2</D><D>5</D><D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Carrier<D>253</D><D>192</D><D>160</D><D>173</D><D>413</D><D>365</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB<D>63</D><D>48</D><D>40</D><D>43</D><D>103</D><D>91</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death Cirrhosis<D>43</D><D>33</D><D>27</D><D>29</D><D>70</D><D>62</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death PHC<D>10</D><D>8</D><D>6</D><D>7</D><D>17</D><D>15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All Deaths<D>56</D><D>43</D><D>36</D><D>39</D><D>92</D><D>81</D><F>Source: Office of Regulatory Analysis, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>6._<T4>Annual Number of Occupational and Nonoccupational Hepatitis B CasesAvoided</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Occupational cases avoided</H1><H2>15 percent immune</H2><H2>30 percent immune</H2><H1>Nonoccupational cases avoided</H1><H2>15 percent immune</H2><H2>30 percent immune</H2><H1>Total cases avoided</H1><H2>15 percent immune</H2><H2>30 percent immune</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Infections <D>5,089 </D><D>6,324 </D><D>4,132 </D><D>3,653 </D><D>9,221 </D><D>9,977</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Acute Symptoms <D>1,272 </D><D>1,581 </D><D>1,033 </D><D>913 </D><D>2,305 </D><D>2,494</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitalized <D>254 </D><D>316 </D><D>207 </D><D>183 </D><D>461 </D><D>499</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fulminant Death <D>6 </D><D>8 </D><D>5 </D><D>5 </D><D>12 </D><D>12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HBV Carrier <D>254 </D><D>632 </D><D>413 </D><D>365 </D><D>668 </D><D>998</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chronic HB <D>64 </D><D>158 </D><D>103 </D><D>91 </D><D>167 </D><D>249</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death Cirrhosis <D>87 </D><D>108 </D><D>70 </D><D>62 </D><D>157 </D><D>170</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Death PHC <D>20 </D><D>25 </D><D>17 </D><D>15 </D><D>37 </D><D>40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">All Deaths <D>113 </D><D>141 </D><D>92 </D><D>81 </D><D>205 </D><D>222</D><F>Source: Office of Regulatory Analysis, 1989.</F></ITAG></ITAG>D. <T3>Technological Feasibility.</T3> In this section, the provisions ofthe proposed standard are examined with respect to their role in reducingthe occupational risk faced by workers within the 16 industry sectors identified.Baseline conditions, or the level of current compliance with the provisionsof the proposed rule, will also be discussed and compliance rates, expressedas a percentage of full compliance, are presented. Finally, issues of feasibilityregarding the implementation of the provisions of the proposed standardare addressed. Compliance rates were based on information in the public record, OSHA inspectionfiles, and site visits conducted by Jack Faucett Associates (JFA). Thesesources generally provided one of two different measures of current compliance.The first measure is the extent of partial compliance with a particularprovision, assuming that all affected facilities have instituted a programof infection control. For example, a partial compliance rate of 50% estimatedfor a sector with respect to the post exposure follow-up provision indicatesthat facilities have follow-up programs in place, but that only 50% ofthe workers at risk are in fact offered treatment and counseling. The alternativemeasure provides an estimate of the proportion of facilities in a sectorthat are in full compliance with a particular provision of the proposedrule. For example, a compliance rate of 50% for the post exposure follow-upprovision using this measure of compliance indicates that within a particularsector one-half of the facilities have instituted a program but that allaffected workers within those facilities are offered treatment and counseling.The interpretation given to these respective measures of baseline datais dependent upon the way in which the data are presented. The most appropriateinterpretation is used in each case. The provisions of the proposed rule are expected to make a substantialreduction in the occupational risk of those workers potentially exposedto blood or other infectious materials. The provisions having the greatestimpact on occupational risk are those requiring, at no cost to the employee,the vaccine and post-exposure prophylaxis against the hepatitis B virus(HBV), the use of personal protective equipment, the training and informationprograms, the implementation of engineering controls, and the practicingof safe work procedures. Additional provisions address the use of properprocedures for the handling and disposing of contaminated waste, labeling,and recordkeeping. HBV Vaccination and Post Exposure Follow-up. The most effective methodof infection control against HBV is the hepatitis B vaccine. While thereare two types of vaccine, serum derived and genetically engineered, immunogenicityis reported to be similar for both [Ex. 13, p. II-32]. Evidence indicatesthat HBV vaccine will induce antibody in 85 to 98 percent of healthy youngadults [Exs. 4-20; 6-45]. There do not appear to be any technical obstaclesto this provision. The proposed standard requires that all employees who incur occupationalexposures to blood on average one or more times per month be offered thevaccine. The current rate of employee acceptance in many sectors is onlyabout 30%. However, refusal seems to be in large part linked to concernsregarding the safety of the vaccine [Ex. 4-31]. Thus, following the provisionof new educational programs [Ex. 11-86, p. 15], OSHA expects that at least50% of the unvaccinated employees at risk will participate in the vaccinationprogram. The proposed standard also includes a provision for post-exposure prophylaxisagainst HBV. This prophylaxis consists of the hepatitis B immune globulin(HBIG) injection. This post-exposure treatment appears to be highly effectivein preventing HBV infection when administered shortly aftar the exposureincident [Ex. 6-45]. JFA estimated the levels of baseline compliance withthis provision [Ex. 13, Table III-18]. (Table VII-7 provides a summaryof compliance rates for all provisions, by SIC code). A serious obstacleto the implementation of this requirement, however, is that not all exposuresare reported [Ex. 6-100]. Thus, HBV vaccination and post exposure follow-up can provide effectiveprotection for those exposed employees who are at risk of contracting HBV.The limitations of this provision are that not all workers will participatein the vaccine program, not all exposures will be reported, and, finally,workers will still be at risk for other bloodborne diseases, such as AIDSand non-A, non-B hepatitis.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>VIII-7._<T4>Summary of Current Compliance</T4> <ITAG tagnum="96">[Percent]</ITAG><H1>Industry</H1><H1>PPE</H1><H2>Gloves</H2><H2>Other</H2><H1>Houskeeping</H1><H2>Containers</H2><H2>Waste disposal</H2><H1>Post exposure follow-up</H1><H1>Records</H1><H1>Training</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>60 </D><D>60 </D><D>40 </D><D>39 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>75 </D><D>40 </D><D>50 </D><D>39 </D><D>75 </D><D>0 </D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>50 </D><D>81 </D><D>20 </D><D>0 </D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>90 </D><D>60 </D><D>80 </D><D>81 </D><D>75 </D><D>0 </D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>90 </D><D>90 </D><D>92 </D><D>86 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>90 </D><D>90 </D><D>50 </D><D>39 </D><D>85 </D><D>0 </D><D>75</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>35 </D><D>86 </D><D>80 </D><D>0 </D><D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>50 </D><D>81 </D><D>20 </D><D>0 </D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>N/A </D><D>N/A </D><D>N/A </D><D>N/A </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>100 </D><D>100 </D><D>100 </D><D>39 </D><D>100 </D><D>0 </D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>90 </D><D>90 </D><D>85 </D><D>86 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire andamp; rescue <D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>39 </D><D>50 </D><D>0 </D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>100 </D><D>50 </D><D>100 </D><D>39 </D><D>50 </D><D>0 </D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>39 </D><D>50 </D><D>0 </D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>39 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>86 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>50 </D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis. (Adapted from Ex. 13, Table II-31).</F></ITAG></ITAG>   Personal Protective Equipment. The proposed standard also requires employersto provide personal protective equipment (PPE) to all potentially exposedworkers and to ensure its proper use. This type of equipment will reducerisk from all bloodborne pathogens. Gloves will provide an effective barrieragainst entry of pathogens through non-intact skin and can be worn by virtuallyall workers in all sectors. For example, health care workers performingphlebotomy will be protected in the event that this task results in bloodcontamination of the hands. Laundry workers and janitors who are at riskof exposure from contaminated laundry or waste can substantially reducetheir risk by wearing utility gloves. Other types of PPE include coats or gowns, masks and eye protection (suchas safety glasses or goggles), and face shields. Like gloves, these itemsserve as a barrier between the infectious material and the worker. Notall workers would be expected to require these items, however. Dentistswill need eye and face protection when performing oral surgery or any otherprocedure which may result in the splattering or spraying of blood or salivacontaminated with blood, but this level of protection would seldom be necessaryfor a physician in an outpatient facility. Likewise, protective foot coveringsmay be required to reduce risk in a surgical or autopsy suite but wouldrarely be necessary for a nurse in a residential care facility. Respiratory equipment such as ambubags or pocket respirators are anothertype of PPE. These devices are most useful for emergency responders inreducing risk where the emergency situation requires resuscitation. Estimates of current compliance rates for PPE appear in table VII-7. Nosector is believed to be currently complying at a rate of less than 25%.Limitations in implementing a PPE program include availability, interferencewith the performance of certain tasks, and physical variability of theworkforce. For example, commenters have reported that certain types ofgloves are in short supply [Exs. 11-73; 11-124]. OSHA is aware of thisproblem, but finds that many new sources of supply are being developedand that current producers of the types of gloves that are required bythis proposed rule should have ample time to adjust their production schedulesto meet the required demand. As a great many establishments are alreadyproviding gloves for their employees who are at risk, incremental gloveusage is not expected to be a serious obstacle to implementation by thetime that a final rule is promulgated. Commenters have also asserted that during certain procedures requiringmanual dexterity, such as phlebotomy, glove use will not allow the properperformance of the task [Ex. 11-124]. OSHA recognizes that many workerswho are at risk are performing their duties in the manner that is mostcomfortable for them, and may have been doing so for some time. However,the proposed rule also provides for training in and monitoring of properwork practices (this provision will be discussed more fully below) andemployers shall be expected to instruct workers in a manner that will increasetheir proficiency in performing all tasks while using the appropriate precautions.Finally, some workers may be susceptible to dermititis from frequent handwashing(handwashing is required by the proposed standard whenever  gloves arechanged). Others may be allergic to certain types of gloves or the powderthey contain. OSHA does not believe that the impact of the proposed rulewill be such that an excessive amount of additional handwashing will berequired. Additionally, it is OSHA's understanding that hypoallergenicgloves are available [Ex. 13, p. II-27]. Administrative controls, suchas rotating employees, would also be useful, when possible, to avoid theseinstances. Training and Information Programs. This provision of the proposed ruleis applicable to all workers at risk throughout all industry sectors. Acomprehensive training program is paramount in the implementation of astandard such as this, since protective measures such as PPE and properwork practices will not be effective unless employees are instructed intheir correct use. Training is also an important factor in risk reductionbecause not all employees are aware of the risks that they routinely facein the workplace. As noted above, information programs can increase employeeacceptance of HBV vaccine [Ex. II-86, p. 15]. The provision also requiresemployers to ensure that employees understand the employer's infectioncontrol program. In one hospital, PPE usage increased from 50-75% to 95-98%when proper work practices were explained and enforced [Ex. II-119]. Also,evidence indicates that adherence to established work practice procedurescould reduce needlestick exposures by as much as 40% [Ex. 6-160]. While employers will be required to train all employees at risk, the contentof the training program will not be the same for all occupational categories.For example, registered nurses employed at a hospital will require a moredetailed program than will housekeepers employed at such an establishment.Estimates of the current level of compliance with this provision indicatethat a substantial number of establishments are currently providing somelevel of training to their at-risk employees. Most facilities, then, willonly need to adjust their programs incrementally rather than to constructa training program from the ground up. Limitations of the training requirement are minor. As little informationis available regarding the relative effectiveness of different trainingmethods [Ex. 13, p. II-24], employers may need to ``experiment'' a bituntil they find the method that is best suited for their particular establishmentor worker population. This should not delay, however, the implementationof an initial program of education end information necessary for at-riskemployees, as such a program may subsequently be modified as appropriate.OSHA finds, therefore, that a program of training offered to all at-riskemployees is central to the implementation of the proposed standard andwill significantly contribute to the overall reduction of risk to workerspotentially exposed to infectious materials. No major problems are foreseenfor compliance with this provision. Engineering Controls. The most ubiquitous engineering control requiredby the proposed rule is the puncture-resistant sharps container. The purposeof the container is to eliminate the need for employees to transport needlesand other sharps while looking for a place to dispose of them, and to supportthe prohibition against recapping, bending, breaking, or otherwise manipulatingsharps by hand. Injuries also occur to housekeeping personnel when contaminatedsharps are left on a bed, concealed in linen. It is expected that a numberof unnecessary disposal-related exposures will be prevented by this control[Ex. 13. p. II-30]. Other enqineering controls that will be required are mechanical pipettingdevices, biosafety cabinets, and safety equipment for centrifuges. (Pipettingis a procedure by which fluid is drawn into a narrow tube by suction. Thefluid may then be dispensed as needed.) Risk will be reduced as these controls,like the sharps containers, tend to confine or isolate the infectious materialfrom the worker. While these controls will be necessary only in a laboratoryenvironment, many types of establishments operate laboratories. For example,such controls might be necessary in a police lab or in a physician's office,as well as in a hospital. Baseline information, where available, indicates that most facilities arealready in compliance with the container requirement. (Baseline informationon sharps containers appears under ``Housekeeping'' in Table VII-7). Further,it is assumed that research laboratories involved in biosafety level 2or biosafety level 3 work are equipped with the necessary cabinets andcentrifuge safety equipment. Since mouth pipetting has been discouragedfor some time, it is probable that mechanical pipettes are standard equipmentin most medical and research labs. Affected establishments should not experience difficulty introducing sharpscontainers. One concern noted by industry is the potential for unauthorizedtampering with the sharps containers [Ex. 13, p. II-30]. There are, however,safety features such as locking mechanisms to prevent removal of the containersuntil they are ready to be replaced. Also, containers are now made witha ``mail box'' drop system so that discarded sharps cannot be retrieved.It is clear that engineering controls can reduce risk by confining or isolatinginfectious material. The equipment is readily available and should presentfew difficulties in its implementation. Moreover, a number of new technologiesare being developed, which would effectively eliminate many types of needlestickincidents. OSHA solicits public comment on the progress of these new technologies.Work Practice Controls. Work practice controls are extremely importantin preventing the spread of infection. This provision will reduce riskby requiring employers to ensure that at-risk employees are performingtheir tasks in the safest manner possible, consistent with universal precautions.The forbidding of needle recapping by hand when disposable needles areused is one work practice which should provide significant reductions inneedlestick exposures, as this procedure has been shown to be associatedwith needlestick injury [Ex. 6-350]. In certain circumstances, however,such as where injections are administered in series, some effort may berequired to find the best technology or to develop new procedures. Simplyensuring that disposable needles are used wherever possible will also reducerisk. In any environment where engineering controls are available, workers mustuse such equipment properly. For example, safety cups for use during centifugingwill not be effective if not used correctly. Thus, all training programsshould provide at-risk workers with comprehensive instructions regardingthe safest procedures for performing each employee's respective tasks.OSHA finds that implementing safe work practices will not present significantdifficulty for the great majority of affected workers. In conclusion, the provisions of the proposed rule are expected to reducesubstantially the risk now faced by workers who must come into contactwith blood and other potentially infectious material. The provisions ofthe standard operate in concert, maximizing the rule's effectiveness. Theprovision of PPE will not be effective without comprehensive training andmonitoring of proper work practices. Offering the HBV vaccine will likewisenot be effective unless workers are provided with information on the risksof contracting hepatitis and the safety and efficacy of the vaccine. Manyestablishments are currently complying with much of OSHA's proposed rule,but additional effort must be made to ensure that all workers are protected.Finally, there do not appear to be any major obstacles to implementingthe proposed rule, though certain situations may require sophisticatedapproaches.E. <T3>Costs of Compliance.</T3> This section presents OSHA's estimates oftotal net compliance costs, which are total costs less the amount associatedwith current compliance, for each provision of the proposed standard. Thecosts are based on data collected by Jack Faucett Associates [Ex. 13] andother information in the public record, and are developed in the followingsequence: development of the infection control plan, HBV vaccination andpost exposure follow-up, personal protective equipment (PPE), engineeringcontrols, training, housekeeping (including costs incurred for the disposalof infectious waste), labeling and signs, and recordkeeping. Development of the Infection Control Plan. Costs incurred for this taskare due to the time expended to prepare the written determination of risk,the schedule of implementation for each applicable provision of the proposedrule, and the training program. OSHA believes that much of the requiredinformation is currently compiled and will only need to be restructuredto reflect compliance with the proposed standard. In calculating the incrementalcosts for performing this task, OSHA estimates that the time required willbe 16 hours for large establishments, such as hospitals and nursing homes,8 hours for health maintenance organizations, and 4 hours for all otherfacilities. Assuming a wage rate of $23.26 per hour for the infection controlofficial (this is equivalent to the compensation rate for head nurses)the costs for this provision are computed as:<ITAG tagnum="15">$23.26andmultiply;(time required)</ITAG>It is not likely that this type of documentation has been developed bymany facilities; consequently, incremental costs are estimated to be 100%of total compliance costs except for hospitals, where a 10% baseline wasused for current compliance. Costs were annualized using a five year payback period and a 10% interestrate. (This five year period reflects the need to periodically revise theplan.) Table VII-8 summarizes costs for this provision. Total annual costs for the infection control plan are estimated to be $16.5million. Cost per facility will average about $26.60.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>VII-8._<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Infection Control Plan</T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>4,403,308 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>2,331,528 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>895,707 </D><D>47.83</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>528,647 </D><D>89.60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>299,313 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>745,154 </D><D>25.08</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>16,494 </D><D>25.69</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>1,008,118 </D><D>49.09</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>39,638 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>369,411 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>52,671 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>90,174 </D><D>23.98</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>57,261 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>152,295 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>5,440,167 </D><D>24.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>72,822 </D><D>24.54</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>$16,502,710 </D><D>$26.59</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG>Hepatitis B Vaccination and Post Exposure Follow-Up. Since a portion ofthe cost of both the HBV vaccination and post exposure follow-up provisionswill be incurred as compensation for the time spent by employees in receivingmedical care, data on wage rates were necessary to calculate total annualcosts. Turnover rates were also estimated, since new employees not previouslyvaccinated will be offered the HBV vaccine. Wage data were obtained from BLS national (March, 1987) and hospital (1985)survey data, and wages were updated to 1988 dollars using the BLS EmploymentCost Index. Turnover rates were calculated by JFA using unpublished job tenure datafrom the January, 1987 Current Population Survey of BLS [Ex. 13, p. I-17_21].Annual <T3>job</T3> turnover was estimated as the percentage of workers with oneyear or less tenure with their current employer minus ths rate of industrywide employment growth. Alternatively, annual <T3>occupational</T3> turnover is used as an indicator of how often workerswill be entering health care and other occupations of interest for thefirst time. In assigning turnover and wage rates to occupational categories, workerswere judged to fall into one of seven employment classifications. TableVII-9 provides a summary of occupational classifications and worker populationswithin each of the affected industry sectors. Wage and turnover rates forthe seven classifications are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s25,7,5,5</C> <H1> </H1><H1>Wage rate</H1><H1>Turnover rate (percent)</H1><H2>Job</H2><H2>Occ.</H2> <ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnosing employees<D>$49.06</D><D>13.5</D><D>7.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Treatment employees<D>$16.44</D><D>21.8</D><D>12.9 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Service employees<D>$11.12</D><D>36.3</D><D>22.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitor/cleaner<D>$9.09</D><D>31.6</D><D>19.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Firefighter<D>$14.80</D><D>8.5</D><D>N/A </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Security/custody<D>$11.48</D><D>41.0</D><D>7.75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police officer<D>$14.30</D><D>10.1</D><D>N/A</D></ITAG></ITAG> Cost formulas for the HBV vaccination and post exposure follow-up provisionswere developed separately, as shown below.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>9<T4>_ Employment Classification Scheme</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Offices of physicians </H1><H1>Offices of dentists</H1><H1>Nursing homes</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnosing<D>Physicians and Surgeons; Dentists._Affected Population: 209,380</D><D>Physicians and Surgeons; Dentists._Affected Population: 75,873</D><D>Physicians and Surgeons; Dentists._Affected Population: 2,589.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Treatment a<D>Registered Nurse; Therapists; Dental Hygienists; Lab Technicians; EmergencyMedical Technicians; Surgical Technicians; Other Health Professionals._AffectedPopulation: 141,029</D><D>Registered Nurses; Therapists; Dental Hygienists; Lab Technicians; SurgicalTechnicians; Other Health Professionals._Affected Population: 87,502</D><D>Registered Nurses; Therapists; Dental Hygienists; Lab Technicians; OtherHealth Professionals._Affected Population: 36,755.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Service b<D>Licensed Practical Nurse; Therapy Assistants; Dental Assistants; OtherHealth Service; Physician Assistants, Medical Assistants; Nursing Aids._AffectedPopulation: 156,912</D><D>Licensed Practical Nurse; Dental Assistants; Other Health Service; MedicalAssistants._Affected Population: 150,611</D><D>Licensed Practical Nurse, Dental Assistants; Nursing Aides and Orderlies;Pyschiatric Aides; Other Health Service; Physician Assistants; MecdicalAssistants; Ambulance Drivers._Affected Population: 635,848.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitor/Housekeeper<D>Affected Population: 28,801</D><D>Affected Population: 8,690</D><D>Affected Population: 103,182.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/>Hospitals <D/>Medical and dental labs<D/>Outpatient Care <R/><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnosing<D>Physicians and Surgeons; Dentists._Affected Population: 102,398</D><D>Physicians and Surgeons; Dentists; Life Scientists._Affected Population:5,305</D><D>Pysicians and Surgeons; Dentists._Affected Population: 52,957.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Treatment<D>Registered Nurses; Therapists; Dental Hygienists; Lab Technicians; EmergencyMedical Technicians; Surgical Technicians; Other Health Professionals._AffectedPopulation: 1,078,651</D><D>Registered Nurses; Therapists; Dental Hygienists; Lab Technicians; OtherHealth Professionals._Affected Population: 31,390</D><D>Registered Nurses; Therapists; Dental Hygienists; Lab Technicians; EmergencyMedical Technicians; Surgical Technicians; Other Health Professionals._AffectedPopulation: 188,469.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Service<D>Licensed Practical Nurse; Therapy Assistants; Dental Assistants; NursingAides and Orderlies; Psychiatric Aides; Other Health Service; PhysicianAssistants; Medical Assistants; Ambulance Drivers._Affected Population:772,666</D><D>Licensed Practical Nurse; Dental Assistants; Other Health Service; MedicalAssistants._Affected Population: 2,814</D><D>Therapy Assistants; Licensed Practical Nurse; Dental Assistants; NursingAides, Orderlies, and Psychiatric Aides; Other Health Service; PhysicianAssistants; Medical Assistants; Ambulance Drivers._Affected Population:124,090.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitor/Housekeeper<D>Affected Population: 210,439</D><D>Affected Population: 1,313</D><D>Affected Population: 4,998.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/>Blood/Plasma/Tissue Center<D/>Residential Care <D/>Funeral Services<R/><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnosing<D/><D>Physicians and Surgeons._Affected Population: 579</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Treatment<D>Nurses and Phlebotomists; Lab workers._Affected Population: 21,506</D><D>Registered Nurses; Therapists; Other Health Professionals._AffectedPopulation: 6,922</D><D>Embalmers; Ambulance Drivers and Attendants; Other Health Professionals._AffectedPopulation: 22,032.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Service <D/><D>Licensed Practical Nurse; Nursing Aides and Orderlies; Psychiatric Aides;Other Health Service._Affected Population: 52,142</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitor/Housekeeper<D>Affected Population: 692</D><D>Affected Population: 20,927</D><D>Affected Population: 4,375.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25"/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/>Research Laboratories<D/>Fire and Rescue<D/>Corrections<R/><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnosing <D> </D><D> </D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Treatment<D>Academic Scientists; Technicians; Research Assistants; Laboratory Workers_AffectedPopulation: 95,654. </D>c<D>Emergency Medical Technicians; Other Health Professionals; AmbulanceDrivers and Attendants._Affected Population: 31,234</D><D>Treatment and Education Staff._Affected Population 13,712.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Service<D/><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitor/Housekeeper <D>Affected Population: 3,061</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other <D> </D><D>Fire Fighters._Affected Population: 170,515</D><D>Security and Custody._Affected Population: 84,233.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25"> <D/>Law Enforcement<D/>Industrial Clinics<D/>Medical Equipment Repair<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnosing <D/><D>Physicians._Affected Population: 2,251</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Treatment<D>Crime Laboratory Technicians._Affected Population: 7,820</D><D>Nurses._Affected Population: 8,492_Emergency Medical Personnel._AffectedPopulation: 185,594</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Service<D/><D>Other Health Workers._Affected Population: 27,564</D><D>Unpackagers and Cleaners._Affected Population: 1,882.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitor/Housekeeper<D/><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other <D>Police Officers._Affected Population: 200,872</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25"> <D/>Personnel Services <D/><D/><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Diagnosing<D/><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Treatment<D>Registered Nurses; Therapists; Other Health Professionals._AffectedPopulation: 84,176</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Service <D>Licensed Practical Nurse; Nursing Aides and Orderlies._Affected Population:71,668</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Janitor/Housekeeper<D/><D/><D/><F/>a This employment category may include professionals not at riskof exposure to infectious materials, such as radiologic or orthopedic technicians.The affected population may, therefore, be somewhat overstated.<F/>b Includes persons who assist and work under the direction of physicians,dentists, nurses, therapists, pharmacists, and other health-related professional,paraprofessional, and technical workers. Workers in these occupations provideauxiliary services, such as assisting in the care of patients, relievingnurses of heavier work, preparing treatment rooms, transporting patients,assisting therapists, and mixing pharmaceutical preparations. To the extentthat this employment category may include service personnel not at riskof exposure to infectious materials, the affected population may be somewhatoverstated.<F/>c Includes 14,380 workers in independent labs, 54,050 workers incaptive Labs, and 7,000 workers in federal labs.<F> </F></ITAG></ITAG>HBV vaccination program. OSHA estimates that 23% of the health care workersand 0.1% of the non-health care workers at risk are already vaccinated(this is the rate of prior vaccination), that 50% of the unvaccinated employeeswho are offered the vaccine will enter the program, and that 22% of allthe employees at risk have developed natural immunity. (See Risk Assessmentsection for source of vaccination and immunity rates). Since it is assumedthat the health care workers who are already vaccinated (23%) are distinctfrom the immune employees, OSHA estimates that on average 29% [22%/(100%-23%)]of those health care workers agreeing to participate in the program willhave a natural immunity. For participating non-health care workers, thenatural immunity rate is still estimated at 22%. As a result, it is assumedthat 71% (100%-29%) of those health care workers and 78% of those non-healthcare workers who are tested under the new program will receive the vaccination.The compliance costs are estimated assuming employer pre-screening of allvaccine candidates. That is, it is assumed that each candidate will receivea hepatitis B test to determine antibody status prior to being vaccinatedeven though in some circumstances it may be more cost-effective to administervaccine without testing. Estimates were computed for each of the seven occupational categories,to reflect the effect of varying employee wage and turnover rates. In mostsectors, the time required to take the antibody test is estimated to beabout 5 minutes. However, as noted above, physicians are not typicallylocated at research labs, funeral homes, personnel service offices, firestations, medical equipment repair facilities, or dental offices. In thesesectors, the test is assumed to take 20 minutes of employee time. Wherethe vaccine in indicated, it is assumed that the additional time requiredwill be one quarter hour for the entire three-dose-series in most facilities.For those sectors mentioned above where a physician would not normallybe on the premises, the added employee time is assumed to be one hour.Costs were computed as follows:<ITAG tagnum="26"><T3>Initial</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">[(andplusmin; of workers) andmultiply; (1-prior vaccination rate) andmultiply;(participation rate)] andmultiply; [(antibody test cost + (employee timeandmultiply; wage))+ (non-immunity rate andmultiply; (vaccine cost + (employeetime andmultiply; wage)))] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26"><T3>Recurring</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(initial costs) andmultiply; (occupational turnover rate) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26"><T3>Total Annual Costs</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">[(initial costs) andmultiply; (capital recovery factor)] + (recurringcosts)</ITAG>Initial costs were annualized using a 20-year payback period and 10% interestrate.\1\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Though the initial vaccination could be considered a onetime cost for which annualization should be carried into perpetuity, amore conservative approach is used in this analysis. The cost for the antibody test is reported to be $24.50 [Ex. 13, p. III-27]and the cost for the vaccine series is estimated to be $108 [Ex. 13, p.III-27]. (It should be noted that Smith, Kline, andamp; French  Laboratories(SKF) have applied for Food and Drug Administration approval of a recombinanthepatitis B vaccine [Ex. 6-477]. ln countries where the SKF vaccine hasalready been approved, competition has reportedly reduced the vaccine costby approximately 40%.) For example, the initial costs per facility for the treatment employeesin physicians' offices would be:<ITAG tagnum="24">[141,029andmultiply;0.77andmultiply;0.5]andmultiply;[($24.50+(1/12 hrs.andmultiply;$16.44))+(0.71andmultiply;(108.00+(0.25 hrs.andmultiply;$16.44)))]/179,405=$31.92 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">The recurring costs would be: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">$31.92andmultiply;0.129=$4.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">and the total annual costs would be: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">($31.92andmultiply;0.1175)+$4.12=$7.87 </ITAG>For all sectors, the total annual costs of the HBV vaccination programwill be about $60.4 million. One commenter, Baylor University Medical Center, provided estimates ofthe costs of compliance with the HBV vaccination provision [Ex. 11-210].It is not clear from the information submitted, however, whether thesecosts reflect worker participation rates (estimated by OSHA to be about50%); neither is it clearly stated that their estimates are of incrementalcosts only.Post Exposure Follow-up. Cost formulas for the post exposure follow-upprovision vary due to different follow-up recommendations for possibleexposure to the AIDS virus (HIV) and to HBV. Both costs will depend onthe number of exposure incidents that will occur per year. Exposure estimatesas developed by Jack Faucett Associates are presented in Table VII-10,tabulated by industry and by occupational classification within each industry.These estimates were based on studies primarily of hospital workers andon limited site visit data and take into account the following potentialreductions due to implementation of the proposed standard: needlestickreduction, 50%; mucous membrane exposure reduction, 90%; open wound exposurereduction, 90%; and other sharps injuries reduction, 50%. Costs will alsodepend on the turnover and wage rates presented above. Additional input for these costing formulas included an estimate that onaverage, while an employee will recall the source of the reported exposure,the source patient will agree to be tested only 50% of the time. Seropositivityfor HIV is expected 0.5% of the time, and for HBV 0.42% of the time inall sectors but hospitals, where the HBV rate is estimated to be 1.25%.The reported unit costs are $17.50 for the HIV antibody test [Ex. 13, p.III-30], $24.50 for the HBV antibody test, and $211 for administering immuneglobulin [Ex. 13, p. III-28]. One final input is the wage rate of a counselor, whose services would berequired in those instances where a possible exposure to HIV has occurred.This wage rate is taken to be $16.44, that of a registered nurse. The following cost formulas for post-exposure monitoring and treatmentwere developed to project costs for providing antibody testing and counselingfor potential HIV infection, antibody testing for potential HBV infection,and immune globulin for potential HBV infection. Antibody Testing and Counseling for HIV Infection <ITAG tagnum="26">(1) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;(0.5+(0.5andmultiply;0.005))andmultiply;4andmultiply;[(costof HIV antibody test)+(employee time andmultiply; wage)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The equation above reflects OSHA's estimate that each exposed employeewill wish to learn their HIV antibody status only about 50% of the time.In those instances, a sequence of four HIV antibody tests will be offeredin the 50% of the cases where the source of exposure does not agree tobe tested and for the 0.25% of the cases where the source is tested <T3>and</T3> found to be positive (0.5andmultiply;0.005). (The time requiredfor the HIV antibody testing by employees is assumed to be the same asthat required for the HBV antibody testing used above in the vaccine calculations.)Also, additional costs will be incurred to test all source subjects whoagree to be tested:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(2) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;(0.5)andmultiply;(cost of HIVantibody test)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This equation will tend to overestimate costs to the extent that theHIV status of patients is already known. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Costs will also be incurred for counseling where the possibility ofexposure to HIV exists.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(3) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;(0.5)andmultiply;(0.5+(0.5andmultiply;0.005))andmultiply;2andmultiply;[(employeetimeandmultiply;wage)+(counselor time andmultiply; wage)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This equation reflects costs for two counseling sessions for eachemployee who accepts the offer of HIV testing. It is estimated that approximately15 minutes will be required for each session and that the sessions willtake place during the first and last antibody test periods.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-10</T4><T4>_Estimates of Frequency of Exposure </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Exposures Per Year]</ITAG><H1> </H1><H1>Needlestick</H1><H1>Mucous membrane</H1><H1>Open wound</H1><H1>Other sharps</H1><H1>Total</H1>Physicians' Offices:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>25,368</D><D>2,357</D><D>1,660</D><D>6,784</D><D>36,170</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>17,087</D><D>1,588</D><D>1,118</D><D>4,569</D><D>24,362</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>19,011</D><D>1,767</D><D>1,244</D><D>5,084</D><D>27,106</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>3,490</D><D>324</D><D>228</D><D>933</D><D>4,975</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>64,957</D><D>6,036</D><D>4,251</D><D>17,370</D><D>92,614</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Dentists' Offices:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>9,193</D><D>854</D><D>602</D><D>2,458</D><D>13,107</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>10,602</D><D>985</D><D>694</D><D>2,835</D><D>15,116</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>18,248</D><D>1,696</D><D>1,194</D><D>4,880</D><D>26,018</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>1,053</D><D>98</D><D>69</D><D>282</D><D>1,051</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>39,096</D><D>3,633</D><D>2,559</D><D>10,455</D><D>55,742</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Nursing Homes:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>314</D><D>29</D><D>21</D><D>84</D><D>447</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>4,453</D><D>414</D><D>291</D><D>1,191</D><D>6,349</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>77,039</D><D>7,158</D><D>5,042</D><D>20,601</D><D>109,841</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>12,522</D><D>1,164</D><D>820</D><D>3,349</D><D>17,854</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>94,328</D><D>8,765</D><D>6,174</D><D>25,225</D><D>134,492</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Hospitals:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>12,407</D><D>1,153</D><D>812</D><D>3,318</D><D>17,689</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>130,692</D><D>12,144</D><D>8,554</D><D>34,949</D><D>186,338</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>93,616</D><D>8,699</D><D>6,127</D><D>25,034</D><D>133,477</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>25,497</D><D>2,369</D><D>1,669</D><D>6,818</D><D>36,353</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>262,211</D><D>24,364</D><D>17,162</D><D>70,119</D><D>373,857</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Medical and Dental Labs:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>643</D><D>60</D><D>42</D><D>172</D><D>916</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>3,803</D><D>353</D><D>249</D><D>1,017</D><D>5,423</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>341</D><D>32</D><D>22</D><D>91</D><D>486</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>159</D><D>15</D><D>10</D><D>43</D><D>227</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>4,946</D><D>460</D><D>324</D><D>1,323</D><D>7,052</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Outpatient Care:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>6,416</D><D>594</D><D>418</D><D>1,710</D><D>9,138</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>22,835</D><D>2,122</D><D>1,495</D><D>6,106</D><D>32,558</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>15,035</D><D>1,397</D><D>984</D><D>4,021</D><D>21,436</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>606</D><D>56</D><D>40</D><D>162</D><D>863</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>44,869</D><D>4,169</D><D>2,937</D><D>11,999</D><D>63,974</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Blood Banks:<ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>2,606</D><D>242</D><D>171</D><D>697</D><D>3,715</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>84</D><D>8</D><D>5</D><D>22</D><D>120</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>2,690</D><D>250</D><D>176</D><D>719</D><D>3,835</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Residential Care:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>70</D><D>7</D><D>5</D><D>19</D><D>100</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>839</D><D>78</D><D>55</D><D>224</D><D>1,196</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>6,318</D><D>587</D><D>413</D><D>1,689</D><D>9,007</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>2,536</D><D>236</D><D>166</D><D>678</D><D>3,615</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>9,762</D><D>907</D><D>639</D><D>2,610</D><D>13,918</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Personnel Services:<ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>10,199</D><D>948</D><D>668</D><D>2,727</D><D>14,541</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>8,683</D><D>807</D><D>568</D><D>2,322</D><D>12,381</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>18,882</D><D>1,754</D><D>1,236</D><D>5,049</D><D>26,922</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Funeral Services:<ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>2,669</D><D>248</D><D>175</D><D>714</D><D>3,806</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>530</D><D>49</D><D>35</D><D>142</D><D>756</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>3,199</D><D>297</D><D>209</D><D>856</D><D>4,562</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Research Labs:<ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>11,589</D><D>1,077</D><D>759</D><D>3,099</D><D>16,524</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Housekeeping Personnel</ITAG><D>371</D><D>34</D><D>24</D><D>99</D><D>529</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>11,960</D><D>1,111</D><D>783</D><D>3,198</D><D>17,053</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Fire and Rescue:<ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>3,784</D><D>352</D><D>248</D><D>1,012</D><D>5,396</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Fire Fighting Personnel</ITAG><D>20,660</D><D>1,920</D><D>1,352</D><D>5,525</D><D>29,4565</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>24,444</D><D>2,271</D><D>1,600</D><D>6,537</D><D>34,852</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Corrections:<ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>1,661</D><D>154</D><D>109</D><D>444</D><D>2,369</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Security Personnel</ITAG><D>8,263</D><D>948</D><D>668</D><D>2,729</D><D>12,609</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>11,867</D><D>1,103</D><D>777</D><D>3,173</D><D>16,920</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Police:<ITAG tagnum="3">Police Officers</ITAG><D>2,9%6</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>2,956</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>948</D><D>88</D><D>62</D><D>254</D><D>1,352</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>3,904</D><D>88</D><D>62</D><D>2%4</D><D>4,308</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>Industrial Clinics:<ITAG tagnum="3">Diagnosing Personnel</ITAG><D>273</D><D>25</D><D>18</D><D>73</D><D>389</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Treating Personnel</ITAG><D>1,029</D><D>96</D><D>67</D><D>275</D><D>1,467</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Service Personnel</ITAG><D>3,340</D><D>310</D><D>219</D><D>893</D><D>4,762</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Emergency Personnel</ITAG><D>22,487</D><D>2,089</D><D>1,472</D><D>6,013</D><D>32,061</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>27,128</D><D>2,521</D><D>1,776</D><D>7,254</D><D>38,678</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical Equipment Unpackagers<D>228</D><D>21</D><D>15</D><D>61</D><D>325</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="7">Totals</ITAG><D>624,471</D><D>57,750</D><D>40,679</D><D>166,202</D><D>889,102</D><F>Source: Jack Faucett Associates.</F></ITAG>Antibody tests for potentiaI HBV infection. Table VII-11 displays OSHA'sestimates of the conditional probabilities of the various post-exposureHBV medical evaluation programs. It is assumed that HBV antibody testswill be administered to both source patients and employees at the ratesshown on the chart. For those exposed workers who have previously beenvaccinated, it is estimated that an employee test will be performed 10%of the time. Source testing, which will reflect both the non-response rateof the vaccine (10%) and the rate of acceptance of the sources to be tested(50%), will be performed 0.5% (0.1 andmultiply; 0.1andmultiply;0.5) of thetime. (It is assumed that sources will not be asked to submit to a testunless the exposed, vaccinated employee is found to be a non-responder.)For those cases where workers have not been vaccinated and source patientswill not be tested, it is estimated that exposed employees would agreeto be tested only for the 5% of the exposures that are attributable toa member of a high risk group. Thus, employee tests will be performed 2.5%of the time (0.5andmultiply;0.05) when a source does not agree to testing.When a source agrees to be tested, employee tests were estimated to beperformed at a rate of (0.5andmultiply;rate of source infection), as employeeswould be tested only if the source is found to be HBV positive. The formulasfor calculating total costs for antibody testing are given below. Equation(4) represents employee testing for vaccinated workers and equation (5)represents employee testing for non-vaccinated workers. Equation (6) representssource testing.<ITAG tagnum="26">(4) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;(% vaccinated)andmultiply;[antibodytest cost+ (employee timeandmultiply;wage)]andmultiply;0.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(5) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;(1- % vaccinated)andmultiply;[antibodytest cost+ (employee timeandmultiply;wage)]andmultiply;[(0.5andmultiply;rateof source infection)+((1-0.5)andmultiply;0.05)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(6) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;[(% vaccinated)andmultiply;(0.1andmultiply;0.1andmultiply;0.5)+(1-% vaccinated)andmultiply;(0.5)]andmultiply;(cost of antibody test)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">where: (% vaccinated)=prior vaccination rate+0.5andmultiply;(1- priorvaccination rate)andmultiply;non-immunity rate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M 001 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42"> Insert Illustration(s)244 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68"> BILLING CODE 4510-26-C  </ITAG>Immune globulin for potential HBV infection. Immune globulin (IG) willbe provided at rates estimated as shown in Table VII-11. For all workers,OSHA estimates that IG will be considered whenever a source is tested andfound to be positive or whenever a high risk source refuses to be tested.It is assumed that IG will be offered only to those vaccinated workerswho are found to be non-responders and to those non-vaccinated employeeswho are found not to have natural immunity. Equation (7) represents costsfor IG administration to vaccinated workers (IG is administered in a twodose sequence) and equation (8) represents costs for non-vaccinated workers.This cost is calculated as:<ITAG tagnum="26">(7) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;(% vaccinated)andmultiply;0.1andmultiply;[(IGcost+2andmultiply; (employee timeandmultiply;wage)]andmultiply;[(0.5andmultiply;0.1andmultiply;rateof source infection)+(0.1andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;0.05)]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(8) (andplusmin; of exposures)andmultiply;(1- % vaccinated)andmultiply;[(IGcost+2andmultiply;(employee timeandmultiply;wage)]andmultiply;[(0.5andmultiply;rateof source infection)+((1-0.5)andmultiply; 0.05)]andmultiply;(non-immunity rate)</ITAG>Cost per facility can be obtained for equations (4) through (8) by dividingtotal costs by the number of affected establishments. Continuing the example of the treatment employees in physicians offices,equations (1) through (8) follow:<ITAG tagnum="26">(1) 24,362andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;(0.5+(0.5andmultiply;0.005))andmultiply;4andmultiply;($17.50+\1/12\hr.andmultiply; $16.44)=$462,010;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(2) 24,362andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;$17.50=$213,168;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(3) 24,362andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;(0.5+(0.5andmultiply;0.005))andmultiply;2andmultiply;[(\1/4\hr.andmultiply;$16.44) +(\1/4\ hr.andmultiply;$16.44)]=$100,628;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(4) 24,362andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;($24.50+(\1/12\andmultiply;$16.44))andmultiply;0.1=$31,512;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(5) 24,362andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;($24.50+(\1/12\andmultiply;$16.44))andmultiply;(0.5andmultiply;0.0042+(1^0.5)andmultiply;0.05)=$8,540;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(6) 24,362andmultiply;[0.5andmultiply;(0.1andmultiply;0.1andmultiply;0.5)+(1^0.5)andmultiply;0.5]andmultiply;$24.50=$150,700;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(7) 24,362andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;0.1andmultiply;[($211+2andmultiply;(\1/12\andmultiply;$16.44)]andmultiply;[(0.5andmultiply;0.1andmultiply;0.0042+0.1andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;0.05)]=$706;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(8) 24,362andmultiply;0.5andmultiply;[$211+2andmultiply;(\1/12\andmultiply;$16.44)]andmultiply;[0.5andmultiply;0.0042+(1^0.5)andmultiply;0.05]andmultiply;0.71=$50,095;</ITAG>Summing the totals computed above and dividing by the number of facilitiesyields an annual cost per facility for post exposure treatment for thisemployee category of $5.67. For all sectors, total annual costs of post exposure follow-up were estimatedto be $18 million. Total costs for vaccination and post exposure follow-up, at the facilitylevel and industry wide, can now be computed for the treatment workersin physicians' offices using the appropriate baseline factors:<ITAG tagnum="26">(7.87)+(5.67andmultiply;1.00)=$13.54 per facility;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">13.54andmultiply;179.405=$2.4 million.</ITAG>Applyinq this methodology to all categories of affected workers and factoringin the baseline rates provided above (see Technological Feasibility), incrementalannual costs for vaccination and post exposure follow-up are expected tobe $78.4 million. Cost per facility will average $l27. Costs are summarizedin tables VII-12-A through VII-12-C. Personal Protective Equipment. Costs for personal protective equipment(PPE) include all expenditures for gloves, masks, gowns, goggles, and resuscitationdevices. A typical example of each item was chosen for cost estimationpurposes based on technical adequacy, widespread use in current healthcare practice, and reasonableness of cost [Ex. 13, p. IIl-6]. Costs were calculated using a unit cost for each respective PPE item inconjunction with a rate of use for that item. Rates of utilization variedby industry sector and by occupation and appear in Table VII-13. For six industry sectors, rates of use were based on occupational titles.(Titles are as reported in BLS' Industry-Occupation Matrix). For each title,judgment was used to classify workers as frequent contact personnel (FCP)or occasional contact personnal (OCP). Frequent contact personnel performtasks which bring them into contact regularly with potentially infectiousmaterials. Occasional contact personnel also come into contact with potentiallyinfectious materials regularly, though not as often as FCP. Janitors andhousekeepers are expected to wear utility gloves when working in areaswhere refuse or surfaces may be contaminated with infectious material.Table VII-14 provides a tabular summary of occupational titles, classifiedas either frequent contact or occasional contact for the six industrieswhere this methodology was used. All workers were estimated to work 261days per year. Costs for gloves for those occupations where dexterity is desirable werebased on the cost of 5 mil thickness disposable latex non-sterile gloves,as these gloves are representative of those in current use. The cost ofsuch a pair of gloves is about $0.18 per pair. For occupations where dexteritymay not be critical, such as dental assistant or police officer, costswere based on vinyl gloves at $0.11 per pair [Ex. 13. p. III-14]. For housekeepingand janitorial personnel, costs were based on utility gloves. The costof a pair of utility gloves is about $1.59. The unit cost of a disposablesurgical mouth/nose mask was estimated to be about $0.33 and that of adisposable apron (gown) about $0.36 [Ex. 13, pp. III-18, III-16]. The unitcost for goggles was estimated to be $3.25 while resuscitation deviceswere estimated to cost either $16.95 (ambubag) or $8.00 (pocket resuscitator)[Ex. 13, pp. llI-18-19].<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII</T4>-12-<T4>A._Summary of Compliance Costs_Vaccination Program</T4><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Annualized initial</H1><H1>Recurring costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>2,614,966</D><D>3,092,260</D><D>5,707,226</D><D>31.81</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>1,795,620</D><D>2,403,739</D><D>4,199,358</D><D>44.21</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>3,651,033</D><D>6,747,877</D><D>10,398,911</D><D>555.26</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>10,254,361</D><D>14,621,678</D><D>24,876,040</D><D>4,216.28</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>195,682</D><D>218,173</D><D>413,855</D><D>33.94</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>1,771,400</D><D>2,324,825</D><D>4,096,225</D><D>137.89</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>105,399</D><D>118,099</D><D>223,497</D><D>348.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>377,928</D><D>673,112</D><D>1,051,040</D><D>51.18</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>812,774</D><D>1,194,878</D><D>2,007,651</D><D>1,243.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>193,969</D><D>231,656</D><D>425,625</D><D>28.28</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>731,455</D><D>818,925</D><D>1,550,380</D><D>722.45</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>606,250</D><D>503,655</D><D>1,109,905</D><D>295.19</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>641,830</D><D>465,114</D><D>1,106,943</D><D>474.47</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>184,152</D><D>144,794</D><D>328,946</D><D>53.01</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>1,062,851</D><D>1,789,030</D><D>2,851,881</D><D>12.87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>13,322</D><D>25,619</D><D>38,940</D><D>13.12</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>$25,012,992</D><D>$35,373,432</D><D>$60,386,424</D><D>$99.94</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>12-B._<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Post-Exposure Follow-up</T4><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$4,079,213 </D><D>$22.74</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>677,551 </D><D>7.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>4,366,620 </D><D>233.16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>3,911,667 </D><D>662.99</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>267,346 </D><D>21.92</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>363,039 </D><D>12.22</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>28,806 </D><D>44.87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>413,288 </D><D>20.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>385,633 </D><D>238.78</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>734,847 </D><D>342.43</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire andamp; rescue <D>740,637 </D><D>196.98</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>301,021 </D><D>129.03</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>223,548 </D><D>36.03</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>1,479,666 </D><D>6.68</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>14,773 </D><D>4.98</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Totals <D>17,987,655 </D><D>29.11</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>TABLE VII-</T4>12-C._Summary of Compliance Costs_ Grand Total_Vaccination/Post-ExposureFollow-up<H1>Industry</H1><H1>Annualized initial</H1><H1>Recurring costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$2,614,966 </D><D>$7,171,473 </D><D>$9,786,439 </D><D>$54.55</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>1,795,620 </D><D>3,081,289 </D><D>4,876,909 </D><D>51.34</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>3,651,033 </D><D>11,114,498 </D><D>14,765,531 </D><D>788.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>10,254,361 </D><D>18,533,346 </D><D>28,787,707 </D><D>4,879.27</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>195,682 </D><D>485,519 </D><D>681,200 </D><D>55.86</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>1,771,400 </D><D>2,687,864 </D><D>4,459,264 </D><D>150.11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>105,399 </D><D>146,905 </D><D>252,304 </D><D>393.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>377,928 </D><D>1,086,399 </D><D>1,464,328 </D><D>71.30</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>812,774 </D><D>1,580,511 </D><D>2,393,285 </D><D>1,481.91</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>193,969 </D><D>231,656 </D><D>425,625 </D><D>28.28</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>731,455 </D><D>1,553,772 </D><D>2,285,227 </D><D>1,064.88</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire andamp; rescue <D>606,250 </D><D>1,244,292 </D><D>1,850,542 </D><D>492.17</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>641,830 </D><D>766,134 </D><D>1,407,964 </D><D>603.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>184,152 </D><D>368,341 </D><D>552,494 </D><D>89.04</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>1,062,851 </D><D>3,268,695 </D><D>4,331,546 </D><D>19.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>13,322 </D><D>40,392 </D><D>53,714 </D><D>18.10</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>25,012,992 </D><D>53,361,087 </D><D>78,374,079 </D><D>126.77</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>VII-13._<T4>Rates of Usage of Personal Protective Equipment \1\</T4><H1>  </H1><H1>Offices of physicians </H1><H1>Offices of dentists </H1><H1>Nursing homes</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gloves <D>FCP: It is estimated that 40% of all office visits will require 1 pr.of disposable gloves to be used </D><P>OCP: 2 pr. disposable gloves per day per employee </P><P>Janitors/Housekeepers: 1 pr. utility gloves per month per employee </P><D>FCP: One pr. disposable gloves per visit per employee </D><P>OCP: 2 pr. disposable gloves per day per employee </P><P>Janitors/Housekeepers: 1 pr. utility gloves per month per employee </P><D>30,171 pr. disposable gloves per facility per year.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Masks <D>FCP: It is estimated that 20% of all office visits will require 1 maskto be used </D><P>OCP: 1 mask per day per employee </P><D>FCP: It is assumed that 75% of all office visits will require the useof 1 mask per employee </D><P>OCP: 1 mask per day per employee </P><D>81 masks per facility per year.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gowns <D>FCP: It is estimated that 3.3% of all office visits will require 1 gownto be used </D><P>OCP: 1 gown per employee every other day </P><D>FCP: 1 gown per day per employee </D><P>OCP: 1 gown per day per employee </P><D>3433 gowns per facility per year.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Goggles <D>FCP: 1 pr. of goggles per employee per year </D><P>OCP: 1 pr. of goggles per employee per year </P><D>FCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year</D><P>OCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year </P><D>36 pr. goggles per facility per year.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Resuscitation devices <D>One device per ofc. plus one additional device for every ten employees</D><D>One device per ofc. plus one additional device for every ten employees</D><D>One device per home plus one additional device for every ten employees.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">  <D/>Hospitals <D/>Medical and dental labs <D/>Outpatient care<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gloves <D>600 pr. gloves per inpatient year </D><D>FCP: 4 pr. disposable gloves per employee per day </D><P>OCP: 2 pr. disposable gloves per employee per day </P><P>Janitors/Housekeepers: 1 pr. utility gloves per month per employee </P><D>FCP: 4 pr. disposable gloves per employee per day. </D><P>OCP: 2 pr. disposable gloves per employee per day. </P><P>Janitors/Housekeepers: 1 pr. utility gloves per month per employees.</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Masks <D>69 masks per inpatient year </D><D>FCP: 2 masks per employee per day </D><P>OCP: 1 mask per employee per day </P><D>FCP: 2 masks per employee per day. </D><P>OCP: 1 mask per employee per day.</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gowns <D>39 gowns per inpatient year </D><D>FCP: 2 gowns per employee per day </D><P>OCP: 1 gown per employee per day </P><D>FCP: 2 gowns per employee per day. </D><P>OCP: 1 gown per employee per day.</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Goggles <D>17 pr. goggles per inpatient year </D><D>FCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year </D><P>OCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year </P><D>FCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year. </D><P>OCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year.</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Resuscitation devices <D>One device per facility plus one additional device for every ten employees</D><D>One device per facility plus one additional device for every ten employees</D><D>One device per facility plus one additional device for every ten employees.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">  <D/>Blood banks <D/>Residential care <D/>Funeral services<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gloves <D>FCP: 4 pr. disposable gloves per employee per day </D><P>Janitors/Cleaners: 1 pr. utitlity gloves per month per employee </P><D>3123 pr. disposable gloves per facility per year </D><D>FCP: 2 pr. disposable gloves per employee per necropsy. </D><P>OCP: 1 pr. disposable gloves per employee per necropsy. </P><P>Janitors/Housekeepers: 1 pr. utility gloves per month per employee.</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Masks <D>FCP:\2\ 2 masks per employee per day </D><D>8 masks per facility per year </D><D>FCP: 1 mask per employee per necropsy.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gowns <D>FCP: 2 gowns per employee per day </D><D>355 gowns per facility per year </D><D>FCP: 1 gown per employee per necropsy.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Goggles <D>FCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year </D><D>4 pr. goggles per facility per year </D><D>FCP: 1 pr. goggles per employee per year.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Resuscitation devices <D>One device per facility plus one additional device for every ten employees</D><D>One device per facility plus one additional device for every ten employees</D><D>Resuscitation devices not required.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">  <D/>Research Labs <D/>Fire and Rescue <D/>Corrections<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gloves <D>4 pr. disposable gloves per employee per day </D><D>1 pr. disposable gloves per emergency run </D><D>1 pr. disposable gloves per employee per year.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Masks <D>2 masks per employee per day </D><D>1 mask per employee for every tenth emergency run </D><D>Masks not required.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gowns <D>2 gowns per employee per day </D><D>1 gown per employee for every tenth emergency run </D><D>Gowns not required.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Goggles <D>1 pr. goggles per employee per year </D><D>1 pr. goggles per employee per year </D><D>Goggles not required.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Resuscitation devices <D>One device per facility plus one additional device for every ten employees</D><D>One device per emergency vehicle </D><D>One device per facility plus one additional device for every ten employees.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">  <D/>Law enforcement <D/>Industrial clinics <D/>Medical equipment repair<R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gloves <D>1 pr. disposable gloves per employee per year </D><D>It is estimated that 40% of the visits to health clinics in industrialsettings will require the use of 1 pr. of disposable gloves </D><D>4 pr. gloves per unpackaging employee per day.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Masks <D>Masks not required </D><D>Masks not required </D><D>2 masks per employee per day.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gowns <D>Gowns not required </D><D>Gowns not required </D><D>Gowns not required.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Goggles <D>Goggles not required </D><D>Goggles not required </D><D>1 pr. goggles per employee per year.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Resuscitation devices <D>One device per patrol officer per year </D><D>One device per facility per year </D><D>Device not required.</D><F>\1\ See Table VII-14 for occupational categories included in these classifications.</F><F>\2\ Excludes Nurses and Phlebotomists.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>VII-14._<T4>Occupational classification by frequency of contact with potentiallyinfectious materials</T4><H1> </H1><H1>FCP (frequent contact personnel)</H1><H1>OCP (occasional contact personnel)</H1><H1>Janitors and cleaners</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>Physicians and Surgeons; Registered Nurses; Licensed Practical Nurse;Laboratory Technicians; Emergency Medical Technician; Surgical Technician;Physician Assistant; Medical Assistant</D><P> Affected Population: 491,719</P><D>Therapists; Therapy Assistants; Other Health Professionals \1\; OtherHealth Service \2\; Nursing Aides</D><P> Affected Population: 15,602</P><D>Affected Population: 28,801.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>Dentists; Physicians and Surgeons; Dental Hygienists; Dental Assistants;Laboratory Technicians; Registered Nurses; Medical Assistants; SurgicalTechnicians</D><P> Affected Population: 312,013 (Dentists: 74,679; Hygienists: 84,332;Dental Assistants: 148,556)</P><D>Licensed Practical Nurses; Other Health Professionals \1\; Other HealthService \2\; Therapists</D><P> Affected Population: 1,973</P><D>Affected Population: 8,690</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical and dental laboratories<D>Physicians and Surgeons; Dentists; Registered Nurses; Licensed PracticalNurse; Dental Hygienists, Dental Assistants; Laboratory Technicians; LifeScientists; Medical Assistants; Other Health Professionals/Other HealthService (Phlebotomists, Medical Technologists).</D><P> Affected Population: 39,281</P><D>Therapists</D><P> Affected Population: 228</P><D>Affected Population: 1,313.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>Physicians and Surgeons; Dentists; Registered Nurses; Licensed PracticalNurse; Dental Hygienists; Dental Assistants; Laboratory Technicians; EmergencyMedical Technicians; Nursing Aides; Orderlies; Psychiatric Aides; SurgicalTechnicians; Physician Assts.; Medical Assts.; Ambulance Drivers</D><P> Affected Population: 312,526</P><D>Therapists; Therapy Assistants; Other Health Professionals \1\; OtherHealth Service \2\</D><P> Affected Population: 52,990</P><D>Affected Population: 4,998.</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma tissue centers<D>Nurses; Phlebotomists; Laboratory Workers</D><P> Affected Population: 21,506</P><D/><D>Affected Population: 692.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral homes<D>Embalmers</D><P> Affected Population: 20,921</P><D>Ambulance Drivers andamp; Attendants; Other Health Professionals</D><P> Affected Population: 1,111</P><D>Affected Population: 4,375.</D><F>\1\ This employment category may include professionals not at risk ofexposure to infectious materials, such as orthopedic technicians. The affectedpopulation may, therefore, be somewhat overstated.</F><F>\2\ Includes persons who assist and work under the direction of physicians,dentists, nurses, therapists, pharmacists, other health-related professional,paraprofessional, and technical workers. Workers in these occupations provideauxiliary services, such as assisting in the care of patients, relievingnurses of heavier work, preparing treatment rooms, transporting patients,assisting therapists, and mixing pharmaceutical preparations. To the extentthat this employment category may include professionals not at risk ofexposure to infectious materials, the affected population may be somewhatoverstated.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG>Cost formulas varied by industry sector, as dictated by available data.These formulas are presented below, and represent annual costs. <T3>Offices of Physicians: </T3>There were a reported 520,789,311 patientvisits to physicians' offices in 1985 [Ex. 13, p. III-41]. Using the FCP,OCP, and janitor/housekeeper populations given in Table VII-14, PPE costswere estimated as follows:<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks, and Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of visits)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPE unitcost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP/Lab. Techs.: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(daysworked per year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Janitors/Housekeepers (gloves only): (andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usagerate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><T3>Offices of Dentists: </T3>PPE use for all FCP except hygienists weredetermined based on the average number of visits made to dentists' officesin 1985, reported to be 2,993. Hygienists were reported to see 2,049 patientsthat year. Populations of affected employees are given in Table VII-14.Personnel populations for all categories except dentists were convertedto full time equivalent (FTE) personnel using a factor of 0.6 [Ex. 13,p. III-41]. PPE costs were estimated as follows:<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of visits)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPE unitcost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Janitors/Housekeepers (gloves only): (andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usagerate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">All FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">ALL FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usagerate) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate). </ITAG><T3>Nursing Homes: </T3>Costs for PPE in nursing homes were computed usingunit costs and usage rates developed from site visit data [Ex. 13. p. III-43].<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks, Gowns, Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG>(It is assumed that gloves and gowns are used for protection from bloodonly 67 percent of the time). <T3>Hospitals: </T3>Costs were calculated for this sector based on PPEuse per inpatient-year. Using data obtained from site visits conductedat two hospitals believed to be at nearly full compliance, costs were computedat the facility level using the following formula:<ITAG tagnum="26">(andplusmin; of inpatient-years per facility)andmultiply;(PPE usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin;of facilities)</ITAG>Average inpatient-years per facility were estimated to be 134.8. PPE usewas estimated to be 600 pair of gloves, 39 gowns, 69 masks, and 17 pairof goggles per inpatient year. Costs for resuscitation devices were computedthus:<ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><T3>Medical and Dental Laboratories: </T3>For this industry sector, affectedpopulations were converted to FTE personnel using a factor of 0.856. Costswere calculated as follows:<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks, Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Janitors/Housekeepers (gloves only): (andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usagerate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><T3>Outpatient Care Facilities: </T3>Costs were calculated as follows:<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks, Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Janitors/Housekeepers (gloves only): (andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usagerate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (andplusmin; of OCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><T3>Blood/Plasma/Tissue Centers: </T3>For this industry sector, affectedpopulations were converted to FTE personnel using a factor of 0.856 [Ex.13, p. 111-47]. Costs were calculated as follows:<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks, Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">Janitors/Housekeepers (gloves only): (andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usagerate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><T3>Residential Care: </T3>Costs for these establishments were developedfrom those of nursing homes by using the ratio of the number of affectedemployees in residential care facilities to the number of affected employeesin nursing homes, 0.1035 [Ex. 13, p. III-46].<T3>Funeral Services: </T3>Costs for funeral homes were based on the numberof necropsies performed yearly by such an establishment, 137.34 [Ex. 13,p. III-46]. The number of FCP per necropsy is 1.05 and the number of OCPper necropsy is 0.074.<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (FCP/necropsy)andmultiply;(necropsies)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPEunit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">OCP: (CCP/necropsy)andmultiply;(necropsies)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPEunit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Janitors/Housekeepers: (andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPEunit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (FCP/necropsy)andmultiply;(necropsies)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPEunit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">FCP: (andplusmin; of FCP)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)</ITAG><T3>Research Laboratories: </T3>For this industry sector, affected populationwas converted to FTE personnel using a factor of 0.856 [Ex. 13, p. III-47].Costs for this sector were computed using an affected worker population(all FCP) of 98,715.<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks, Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(days workedper year)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><T3>Fire and Rescue: </T3>Costs for this sector were based on the numberof medically related emergency runs made in 1986, 6,437,500 [Ex. 13. p.III-48]. Costs for resuscitation devices were estimated assuming one devicefor every six emergency medical responders (two per shift, three shifts)and one for every twelve firefighters (four per shift). The number of emergencymedical responders is 25,550 and the number of firefighters is 170,515.<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks, Gowns </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of emerg. runs)andmultiply;(PPEunit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of emergency responders)/6andmultiply;(device cost)+ (andplusmin;of firefighters)/12andmultiply;(device cost)</ITAG><T3>Corrections: </T3>PPE costs for correctional facilities are based onan affected worker population of 97,945.<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(ambubag cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of facilities)</ITAG><T3>Law Enforcement: </T3>Costs for this sector are based on an affectedworker population of 208,693.<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(pocket mask cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><T3>Industrial Clinics: </T3>The costs of PPE usage for this sector arebased on the estimated total number of visits made to these clinics, 18,671,000.<ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of visits)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Resuscitation Devices </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of clinics)</ITAG><T3>Medical Equipment Repair:</T3><ITAG tagnum="26">Gloves, Masks </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(usage rate)andmultiply;(andplusmin; ofdays worked)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Goggles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">(andplusmin; of workers)andmultiply;(PPE unit cost)andmultiply;(usage rate)</ITAG><T3>Personnel Services: </T3>It is expected that PPE will be issued totemporary workers upon arrival at the worksite. Consequently, no costsunder this provision are expected to be incurred by these establishments.Costs for PPE are summarized in Tables VII-15-A through VII-15-F. Totalincremental annual costs for this provision are expected to be $400.7 million.Cost per facility ranges from $15,311 for hospitals to $11.51 for healthunits in industry (excluding personnel services and funeral services, forwhich no costs are expected to be incurred). Commenters to the record also provided estimates of the costs of PPE. Mostof these estimates, unfortunately, are not accompanied by other pertinentinformation such as baseline compliance levels or estimated rates of usage.For example, St. Francis Hospital and Health Center projected costs fordisposable gloves to be $114,000 for 1988 [Ex. 11-119]. While the unitcost is similar to that estimated by OSHA at about $0.19 per pair, incrementalcosts (those costs attributable to the proposed rule) can not be discernedfrom the information provided.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII</T4>-15<T4>A._Summary of Compliance Costs_Personal Protective Equipment </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">Gloves </ITAG><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$17,837,566 </D><D>$99.43</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>29,613,340 </D><D>311.74</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>49,547,344 </D><D>2,645.63</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>48,390,504 </D><D>8,201.78</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/Dental labs <D>315,432 </D><D>25.87</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>5,618,735 </D><D>189.14</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/Plasma/Tissue centers <D>1,735,373 </D><D>2,703.07</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>5,128,150 </D><D>249.70</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>1,587,925 </D><D>739.95</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>579,375 </D><D>154.09</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>10,629 </D><D>1.71</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>672,156 </D><D>3.03</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>108,064 </D><D>36.42</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total <D>$161,144,593 </D><D>$260.65 </D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG>   <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII</T4>-<T4>15</T4>-<T4>B._Summary of Compliance Costs_Personal Protective Equipment </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Masks] </ITAG><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$14,113,190 </D><D>$78.67</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>113,204,411 </D><D>1,191.70</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>361,373 </D><D>19.30</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>22,259,632 </D><D>3,772.82</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>286,928 </D><D>23.53</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>5,769,188 </D><D>194.21</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>1,595,640 </D><D>2,485.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>37,402 </D><D>1.82</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>1,437,954 </D><D>670.06</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>104,931 </D><D>27.91</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>160,132 </D><D>53.97</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>159,330,782 </D><D>257.63 </D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG>   <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>15-C_<T4> Summary of Compliance Costs_Personal Protective Equipment</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Gowns]</ITAG><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>$2,767,984</D><D>$15.43</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>17,556,524</D><D>184.82</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>16,913,721</D><D>903.12</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>12,581,531</D><D>2,132.46</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/Dental labs<D>632,789</D><D>51.89</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>6,370,883</D><D>214.46</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/Plasma/Tissue centers<D>2,636,327</D><D>4,106.43</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>1,750,570</D><D>85.24</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>1,587,925</D><D>739.95</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>115,875</D><D>30.82</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>0</D><D>0.00</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Totals<D>62,914,128</D><D>101.83</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>15-<T4>D._Summary of Compliance Costs_Personal Protective Equipment </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Goggles] </ITAG><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$659,517 </D><D>$3.68</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>425,613 </D><D>4.48</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>1,645,490 </D><D>87.86</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>5,484,257 </D><D>929.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>5,496 </D><D>0.45</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>101,571 </D><D>3.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>44,872 </D><D>69.89</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>170,308 </D><D>8.29</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>27,463 </D><D>12.80</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>327,842 </D><D>87.19</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>3,058 </D><D>1.03</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Totals <D>8,895,488 </D><D>14.39</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>15<T4>-E._Summary of Compliance Costs_Personal Protective Equipment </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Resuscitation Devices] </ITAG><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$1,216,366 </D><D>$6.78</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>966,089 </D><D>10.17</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>1,159,825 </D><D>61.93</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>1,622,590 </D><D>275.02</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/Dental labs <D>10,335 </D><D>0.85</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>100,703 </D><D>3.39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/Plasma/Tissue centers <D>32,646 </D><D>50.85</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>261,077 </D><D>12.71</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>21,825 </D><D>10.17</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>260,434 </D><D>69.26</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>98,861 </D><D>42.38</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>803,492 </D><D>129.49</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>1,878,484 </D><D>8.48</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">   Total <D>8,432,726 </D><D>13.65</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII</T4>-<T4>15</T4>-<T4>F._Summary of Compliance Costs Personal Protective Equipment </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Grand Totals] </ITAG><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$36,594,622 </D><D>$203.98</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>161,765,977 </D><D>1,702.91</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>69,627,753 </D><D>3,717.84</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>90,338,514 </D><D>15,311.61</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>1,250,981 </D><D>102.58</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>17,961,080 </D><D>604.63</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>6,044,858 </D><D>9,415,67</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>7,347,507 </D><D>357.77</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>4,663,091 </D><D>2,172.92</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>1,388,457 </D><D>369.27</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>98,861 </D><D>42.38</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>814,121 </D><D>131.20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>2,550,640 </D><D>11.51</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>271,255 </D><D>91.42</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Total <D>$400,717,716 </D><D>$648.15 </D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG>   Engineering Controls. Available information indicates that those facilitiesfor which engineering controls would be appropriate are currently usingsuch controls [Ex. 13, pp. III-35, 36]. These facilities include researchlabs, medical and dental labs, and labs located in hospital or outpatientmedical establishments. Controls required and believed to be in use includebiosafety cabinets (for biosafety level one and two facilities), centrifugesafety equipment, and mechanical pipetting devices. (Puncture resistantsharps containers are included under the housekeeping provision). Thus, OSHA finds that costs attributable to the proposed provisions forengineering controls will be negligible. Training. Costs for the training provision were calculated based on thesame scheme of occupational classification as was used for medical surveillance,that is, workers were placed into seven different occupational categorieswith respect to appropriate wage and job turnover rates. (Table VII-9 providesthe occupational breakdown into the seven categories along with the affectedworker populations.) Additional input data includes the length and frequencyof training. Length of training is expected to vary with occupational classificationand is expected to depend on whether training is initial or recurrent.Initial training sessions for diagnosing, treating, and service personnel(except equipment repair) are assumed to be 1 hour in duration while recurrentannual sessions are assumed to be one hour. Initial training for housekeepingpersonnel, security personnel, police officers, firefighters, and equipmentrepair personnel are expected to last about 1 hour, with annual sessionsat one-half hour. Initial training costs consist of costs incurred for the time taken bythe trainees and compensation for the trainer. (For firefighters, no costswere estimated for time lost to workers, since training can take placeduring idle hours). Compensation for the trainees and trainer will be paidas follows:<ITAG tagnum="26">(1) (andplusmin; of trainees)andmultiply;(trainee wage rate)andmultiply;(initialsession time) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(2) (trainer wage)andmultiply;(initial session time)andmultiply;(andplusmin;of sessions)</ITAG>In general, OSHA assumes that one 2-hour session and one 1-hour sessionwill be offered initially. (For hospitals, it is estimated that 2 of eachsession will be offered). Compensation for trainers is assumed to be ata rate of $23.26 (head nurse) for sessions with diagnosing and treatingemployees and $16.44 (floor nurse) for sessions with service and housekeepingpersonnel. Equations (1) and (2) summed represent total initial costs.New employees will need to be trained as they are hired. The costs foradditional initial training given during the first year can be estimatedthus:<ITAG tagnum="26">(3) (initial trainee compensation)andmultiply;(job turnover rate) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(4) (trainer wage)andmultiply;(initial session time)andmultiply;(andplusmin;of trainees/group)andmultiply; (job turnover rate).</ITAG>Equation (3) reflects the cost of time needed to train each new hire. Equation(4) represents compensation for the trainer. (For hospitals, nursing homes,temporary services, corrections, law enforcement, and fire fighters, itis assumed that new hires will be trained in groups of five. For all othersectors, new hires are assumed to be trained individually). Thus, totalfirst year costs are represented by the summing of equations (1) through(4), which are performed for each of the seven occupational categoriesacross all industries. Costs for additional training given over all following years will consistof training new hires and tenured employees (in-service). The calculationto estimate the cost of training new hires in these subsequent years isidentical to that described by equations (3) and (4) to represent trainingfor new hires during the first year. Equations (5) and (6), given below,represent costs incurred for training tenured (in-service) employees duringsubsequent years:<ITAG tagnum="26">(5) (andplusmin; of trainees)andmultiply;(1-(job turnover/2))andmultiply;(traineewage)andmultiply; (in-service session time) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">(6) (trainer wage)andmultiply;(in-service session time)andmultiply;(ofsessions)</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Equation (5) reflects the cost of the time taken to train tenuredemployees. The second term of this equation accounts for the employeeswho will quit before being retrained. (Job turnover has been divided bytwo to reflect that, on average, only about one-half of the workers leavingover the course of the year will leave before that year's retraining).Equation (6) represents the compensation to the trainer. These calculationshave been performed for each occupational catagory within each sector.Total cost in each subsequent year (recurring cost) is then the sum ofequations (3), (4), (5). and (6). Total annual costs for this provision are the sum of recurring costs plusthe annualization of the difference between first year costs and recurringcosts. (Annualization was performed using a twenty year payback period).Net costs are summarized in table VII-16. Total annual costs are estimatedto be $162.2 million with average costs per facility at $262. The greatestshare of incremental costs are expected to be borne by offices of physicians(33%) while the greatest cost per facility will be realized by personnelservice establishments, $5,364.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>16.<T4>_Summary of Compliance Costs_Training</T4><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Annualized first year costs \1\</H1><H1>Recurring costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>$300,331</D><D>$53,461,639</D><D>$53,761,970</D><D>$299.67</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>67,231</D><D>10,999,131</D><D>11,066,362</D><D>116.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>129,499</D><D>9,182,353</D><D>9,311,852</D><D>497.22</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>408,298</D><D>30,937,388</D><D>31,345,685</D><D>5,312.83</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>7,529</D><D>1,339,543</D><D>1,347,072</D><D>110.46</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>44,842</D><D>5,577,474</D><D>5,622,316</D><D>189.27</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>7,307</D><D>842,874</D><D>850,181</D><D>1,324.27</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>12,597</D><D>1,870,640</D><D>1,883,237</D><D>91.70</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>284,958</D><D>8,377,986</D><D>8,662,944</D><D>5,364.05</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>3,989</D><D>817,280</D><D>821,269</D><D>54.57</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>16,250</D><D>1,856,487</D><D>1,872,736</D><D>872.66</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>0</D><D>715,333</D><D>715,333</D><D>190.25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>71,156</D><D>1,138,612</D><D>1,209,767</D><D>518.55</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>177,031</D><D>2,042,854</D><D>2,219,885</D><D>357.76</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>108,026</D><D>31,330,520</D><D>31,438,546</D><D>141.84</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>1,930</D><D>20,169</D><D>22,099</D><D>7.45</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>1,640,973</D><D>160,510,282</D><D>162,151,255</D><D>262.42</D><F>\1\ Annualized first year costs (AFYC) were computed as follows: AFYC= (total first year cost ^ recurring cost) andmultiply; capital recoveryfactor.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG>Housekeeping. Costs incurred for housekeeping will arise from five sources:puncture resistant sharps disposal containers; biowaste bags, or ``redbags,'' for the containment of infectious waste; costs of disposal of infectiouswaste; costs for disinfecting surfaces and equipment; and use of foil coverings(offices of dentists only). Costs for sharps disposal containers are based on data obtained from hospitals[Ex. 13, p. III-20]. First, the total cost per bed was multiplied by thenumber of hospital beds nationwide to arrive at a total cost figure forthis sector. Costs were then divided by the overall number of diagnosingand treating workers employed by all hospitals to arrive at a cost perdiagnosing/treating (D/T) employee. This estimate was in turn used to estimatesharps container costs across all other sectors by multiplying the unitcost per diagnosing/treating employee by the number of such employees ineach respective sector. (The affected population of D/T employees for eachsector is shown in Table VIl-9). Input data for sharps containers includedthe following:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p6,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,7 </C>  <H1> </H1><H1/><T3>Cost per D/T employee</T3> <ITAG tagnum="1">Capital costs <D>$56.61 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Annual labor and materials <D>$24.12</D></ITAG></ITAG> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Thus, for each sector, annualized capital costs required for sharpscontainers were calculated using the following formula:<ITAG tagnum="26">(1) (andplusmin; of D/T workers)andmultiply;(unit capital cost per worker)andmultiply;(capitalrecovery factor),</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">where annualization occurs over 5 years and the capital recovery factorequals 0.2638. Recurring annual costs for containers ware calculated as<ITAG tagnum="26">(2) (andplusmin; of D/T workers)andmultiply;(annual cost per worker).</ITAG>Total annual costs for sharps containers were calculated by summing equations(1) and (2) and amount to $28.4 million. The costs by sector are summarizedin Table VII-17-A. For the purchase of biowaste bags, a similar methodology was used to estimatethe added costs for hospitals (though no initial costs will be incurred).Input data included:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p6,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,7 </C>  <H1>  </H1><H1>Cost per D/T employee</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Annual cost <D>$35.13</D></ITAG></ITAG> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Thus, total annual costs for biowaste bags in the hospital sectorwere calculated to be:<ITAG tagnum="26">(3) (andplusmin; of D/T workers)andmultiply;(annual cost per worker).</ITAG>Total annual costs for additional biowaste bags in other sectors were calculatedby estimating approximate bag usage with respect to infectious waste disposal.Assuming each bag contains an average of two pounds of waste at disposal,the unit cost is $0.20 per bag, and the infectious waste generation ratesare those shown in Table VII-17-C, costs were calculated thus:<ITAG tagnum="26">(4) [(pounds of infectious waste generation per year)/2]andmultiply;$0.20</ITAG>Costs for biowaste bags are shown in Table VII-17-B and total $28.3 millionper year. Costs will also be incurred for the disposal of infectious waste, whichis more costly to dispose of than general refuse, to the extent that establishmentsare not currently practicing proper identification of such waste priorto disposal. Costs were determined by developing estimates of waste generation for eachindustry and then multiplying total annual volume by the unit cost of disposal.Rates of infectious waste generation, along with estimates of current complianceand unit costs, which were based largely on a survey of health care establishmentsin King County of Washington State, are presented in Table VII-17-C. Thefollowing formula was used to estimate costs for biowaste disposal:<ITAG tagnum="26">(5) (total annual volume of waste)andmultiply;(unit cost). </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">This total annual cost was then multiplied by the appropriate compliancefactor to determine the incremental cost of $117.2 million. Costs for thiscomponent of housekeeping are summarized in Table VlI-17-D. The provision requiring the disinfecting of surfaces and equipment is notexpected to generate significant cost. First, it is probable that surfacesand equipment are already being disinfected prior to use in almost allinstances if visibly contaminated. The OSHA rule may simply alter the scheduleof this activity so that disinfection takes place sooner. Second, acceptedindustry practice is to disinfect any equipment or instrument which comesinto contact with patients as a means of preventing the spread of infectionfrom patient to patient. Third, disinfectant solutions are inexpensiveand easy to prepare; therefore, any incremental increase in disinfectionpractices will be of insignificant burden.The final cost included for this provision of the standard applies onlyto offices of dentists and is for the use of foil coverings to preventthe contamination of surfaces, switches, etc. Costs are based on the useof fresh foil for every patient at a cost of about $.05 per patient, asshown by the following equation:<ITAG tagnum="26">(6) [(andplusmin; of dentists)andmultiply;(andplusmin; of visits)+(andplusmin;of hygienists)andmultiply; (andplusmin; of visits to hygienists)]andmultiply;0.05.</ITAG>Based on an estimated current compliance level of 25%, total annual costsfor coverings amount to $14.9 million. Costs for leakproof containers to protect workers handling blood in transporthave not been estimated, since OSHA assumes that no significant costs wouldbe realized. If public comment indicates otherwise, costs for these containerswill be estimated. Total costs will be the summation of equations (1) through (6) and arepresented in Table VII-17-E. Total incremental annual costs for this provisionare estimated at $188.9 million. Average cost per facility will be $306.Labelling/Signs. Costs for signs were estimated based on the requirementthat one sign will be posted at each entrance to a research laboratoryor virus production facility that handles concentrated virus. Sign costsare estimated to be $13.75 each (the cost of a 10andmin172;andmin172; x 14andmin172;andmin172;aluminum sign, including $1.00 for mounting materials). Total costs forsigns were estimated for the research lab sector by assuming that eachof the 2,146 facilities identified in the Industry Profile will requiretwo signs, and that one-quarter hour is required for mounting each sign.Signs are expected to be replaced every five years; thus, annualizationwas calculated based on this time period. The costs of signs were computedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="26">[(andplusmin; of signs)andmultiply;[(unit cost)+(0.25 hrs. andmultiply;$9.09)]andmultiply;(annualizationfactor),</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">where $9.09 is the wage rate of maintenance personnel and costs areat the facility level. Total annual costs for signs in research labs are thus estimated at $3,628.Annual costs per facility will be $1.69. Labels are also required by the proposed rule. However, since containersand storage apparatus used for transporting and storing blood and otherinfectious materials would normally have a label affixed to them for thepurposes of identification, it is not anticipated that measurable incrementalcosts will be involved in complying with this requirement. Label style,however, may need to be modified when new labels are ordered.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>17-<T4>A_Summary of Compliance Costs_Housekeeping</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">Sharps Disposal</ITAG><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Annualized initial</H1><H1>Recurring costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>$3,139,746</D><D>$5,071,119</D><D>$8,210,865</D><D>$45.77</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>1,219,898</D><D>1,970,303</D><D>3,190,201</D><D>33.58</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>293,776</D><D>474,489</D><D>768,265</D><D>41.02</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>3,527,491</D><D>5,697,380</D><D>9,224,871</D><D>1,563.54</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>43,839</D><D>70,807</D><D>114,646</D><D>9.40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>1,802,694</D><D>2,911,598</D><D>4,714,291</D><D>158.70</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>208,757</D><D>337,171</D><D>545,928</D><D>850.36</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>56,009</D><D>90,462</D><D>146,471</D><D>7.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>214,270</D><D>346,076</D><D>560,347</D><D>261.11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>233,220</D><D>376,682</D><D>609,902</D><D>162.21</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>58,391</D><D>94,309</D><D>152,700</D><D>24.61</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>80,216</D><D>129,561</D><D>209,777</D><D>0.95</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0.00</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>10,878,307</D><D>17,569,956</D><D>28,448,263</D><D>46.05</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table</T4> VII-17-B._<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Housekeeping </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Biohazard Bags]</ITAG><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>4,214,223</D><D>23.49</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>2,479,343</D><D>26.10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>9,815,338</D><D>524.10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>8,298,050</D><D>1,406.45</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>127,684</D><D>10.47</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>581,495</D><D>19.58</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>564,130</D><D>878.71</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>1,315,251</D><D>64.04</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>578,931</D><D>269.77</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>160,938</D><D>42.80</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>102,051</D><D>16.45</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>110,821</D><D>0.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>0</D><D>0.00</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>28,348,256</D><D>45.88</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>17-<T4>C._Infectious Waste_Waste Generation and Current Compliance Rates </T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Volume of infectious waste generated </H1><H1>Unit disposal costs (dollar) </H1><H1>Baseline rate (percent)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>1.5 LB/office/day </D><D>0.75 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>2 LB/office/day </D><D>0.75 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>0.5 LB/bed/day </D><D>0.44 </D><D>81</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>1 LB/bed/day </D><D>0.44 </D><D>81</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>1.75 LB/employee/day </D><D>0.56 </D><D>86</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>1.5 LB/facility/day </D><D>0.56 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>1.75 LB/employee/day </D><D>0.56 </D><D>86</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>0.5 LB/bed/day </D><D>0.75 </D><D>81</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>N/A </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0.5 LB/necropsy </D><D>0.75 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>1.75 LB/employee/day </D><D>0.56 </D><D>86</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>0.5 LB/emergency </D><D>0 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>1 LB/treating personnel/day </D><D>0.75 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>1 LB/treating personnel/day </D><D>0 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>1 LB/treating personnel/day </D><D>0.75 </D><D>39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>0 </D><D>N/A </D><D>N/A</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis and Jack Faucett Associates.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>17-<T4>D._Summary of Compliance Costs_Housekeeping</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[Disposal of Infectious Waste] </ITAG><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>32,133,454 </D><D>179.11</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>22,685,992 </D><D>238.82</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>16,855,321 </D><D>900.01</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>24,341,572 </D><D>4,125.69</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>1,314,019 </D><D>107.75</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>3,972,773 </D><D>133.74</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>770,113 </D><D>1,199.55</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>8,325,936 </D><D>405.41</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>472,850 </D><D>31.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>3,425,293 </D><D>1,596.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>1,637,316 </D><D>701.81</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>1,282,795 </D><D>5.79</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>0 </D><D>0.00</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>117,217,433 </D><D>189.72</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>VII-17-E_<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Housekeeping Grand Totals</T4><H1>Industry</H1><H1>Annualized initial</H1><H1>Recurring costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs</H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>$3,139,746</D><D>$41,418,796</D><D>$44,558,542</D><D>$248.37</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists \1\<D>1,219,898</D><D>41,998,950</D><D>43,218,848</D><D>454.96</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>293,776</D><D>27,145,148</D><D>27,438,924</D><D>1,465.13</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>3,527,491</D><D>38,337,002</D><D>41,864,493</D><D>7,095.68</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>43,839</D><D>1,512,509</D><D>1,556,349</D><D>127.62</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>1,802,694</D><D>7,465,866</D><D>9,268,560</D><D>312.01</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>208,757</D><D>1,671,414</D><D>1,880,171</D><D>2,928.62</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>56,009</D><D>9,731,649</D><D>9,787,658</D><D>476.59</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>0</D><D>472,850</D><D>472,580</D><D>31.42</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>214,270</D><D>4,350,300</D><D>4,564,571</D><D>2,127.01</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>233,220</D><D>537,620</D><D>770,839</D><D>205.01</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>0</D><D>1,637,316</D><D>1,637,316</D><D>701.81</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>58,391</D><D>196,360</D><D>254,751</D><D>41.06</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>80,216</D><D>1,523,176</D><D>1,603,392</D><D>7.23</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>0.00</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>10,878,307</D><D>177,998,957</D><D>188,877,264</D><D>305.71</D><F>\1\ Recurring costs for dental offices include $14,863,312 for coverings.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG>Recordkeeping. Costs for recordkeeping will be incurred due to the needto keep medical and training records. Initial costs for medical records will be for the establishment of a filefor each employee. It is expected that ten minutes will be required forthis task. The wage rate for the employee preparing this file is takento be that of a service employee at $11.12. Annualized initial costs, computedbased on a 20 year payback period, are then:<ITAG tagnum="26">(andplusmin; of affected workers)andmultiply;\1/6\ hr.andmultiply;11.12andmultiply;(capital recovery factor).</ITAG>Recurring costs for medical records will be:<ITAG tagnum="26">(initial costs)andmultiply;(job turnover rate)+(andplusmin; of exposureincidentsandmultiply;\1/20\andmultiply;11.12),</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">as each new employee will require a file and the records of thoseworkers reporting exposure incidents will require updating, which is assumedto require about 3 minutes per file. Total annual costs for medical records are the sum of annualized initialcosts and recurring annual costs. Although initial costs for establishing a training file will not be substantial,there will be annual recurring costs because the file must be updated subsequentto training sessions. Recurring recordkeeping tasks will include recording will be due to theneed to include the dates, trainers, and attending trainees for each trainingsession. It was estimated that the time required to update the file willaverage about 1 minute per trainee. Thus, costs were estimated by the followingformula.<ITAG tagnum="26">(andplusmin; of trainees)andmultiply;[1+(job turnover/2)]andmultiply;\1/60\hr. andmultiply; $11.12</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(As explained above, job turnover has been divided by two to reflectthat, on average, only about one-half of the workers leaving over the courseof the year will leave before that year's in-service training. Thus, one-halfof the workers eventually leaving will attend one of the sessions provided.)Since the total first year costs will exceed the costs in succeeding years,this difference is annualized to calculate annual costs. Total annual costsfor training records are thus the sum of recurring costs plus the annualizationof the difference between first year costs and recurring costs. Net costs for recordkeeping are summarized in Table VII-18. Annual incrementalcosts attributable to this provision are $5.6 million. Average cost perfacility is expected to be $9.00, ranging from $346 for hospitals to $0.70for medical equipment repair facilities.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>VIII-18._<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Record Keeping </T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Annualized initial </H1><H1>Recurring costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>116,750 </D><D>364,646 </D><D>481,395 </D><D>2.68</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>70,268 </D><D>243,786 </D><D>314,054 </D><D>3.31</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>169,515 </D><D>672,938 </D><D>842,452 </D><D>44.98</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>472,060 </D><D>1,569,104 </D><D>2,041,164 </D><D>345.96</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>8,890 </D><D>40,223 </D><D>49,113 </D><D>4.03</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>80,685 </D><D>257,575 </D><D>338,261 </D><D>11.39</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>4,834 </D><D>14,255 </D><D>19,089 </D><D>29.73</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>17,546 </D><D>130,097 </D><D>147,643 </D><D>7.19</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>33,938 </D><D>370,368 </D><D>404,305 </D><D>250.34</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>5,751 </D><D>26,754 </D><D>32,505 </D><D>2.16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>33,184 </D><D>184,004 </D><D>217,188 </D><D>101.21</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and Rescue <D>43,934 </D><D>89,214 </D><D>133,149 </D><D>35.41</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>21,329 </D><D>91,153 </D><D>112,482 </D><D>48.21</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>45,446 </D><D>82,710 </D><D>128,157 </D><D>20.65</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>59,416 </D><D>231,748 </D><D>291,164 </D><D>1.31</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>410 </D><D>1,678 </D><D>2,088 </D><D>0.70</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Totals <D>$1,183,956 </D><D>$4,370,253 </D><D>$5,554,209 </D><D>$8.99 </D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG>   <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>VII-19-A._<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Grand Totals</T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Annual cost by type of ownership </H1><H2>Private </H2><H2>Federal </H2><H2>State/loc. </H2><H1>Total annual costs </H1><H1>Total annual costs per facility</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$149,586,276 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>$149,586,276 </D><D>$834</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>223,573,678 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>223,573,678 </D><D>2,354</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>118,409,306 </D><D>0 </D><D>$4,472,913 </D><D>122,882,219 </D><D>6,561</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>160,602,717 </D><D>$10,135,123 </D><D>24,168,370 </D><D>194,906,210 </D><D>33,035</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>5,184,028 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>5,184,028 </D><D>425</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>12,708,624 </D><D>14,206,015 </D><D>11,479,996 </D><D>38,394,636 </D><D>1,292</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>9,063,097 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>9,063,097 </D><D>14,117</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>18,457,633 </D><D>0 </D><D>3,180,858 </D><D>21,638,492 </D><D>1,054</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>11,500,173 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>11,500,173 </D><D>7,121</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>2,121,660 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>2,121,660 </D><D>141</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>8,741,832 </D><D>682,956 </D><D>4,234,325 </D><D>13,659,113 </D><D>6,365</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire andamp; rescue <D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>4,948,495 </D><D>4,948,495 </D><D>1,316</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>0 </D><D>438,794 </D><D>4,084,857 </D><D>4,523,651 </D><D>1,939</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>0 </D><D>642,986 </D><D>3,478,717 </D><D>4,121,702 </D><D>664</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>45,655,456 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>45,655,456 </D><D>206</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>421,977 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>421,977 </D><D>142</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Totals <D>766,026,458 </D><D>26,105,873 </D><D>60,048,531 </D><D>852,180,862 </D><D>1,379</D><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnaylsis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII</T4>-19-B._<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Grand Totals</T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Infection control plan </H1><H1>Vaccination/post exposure follow-up </H1><H1>PPE </H1><H1>Training </H1><H1>Housekeeping </H1><H1>Recordkeeping </H1><H1>Totals </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>$4,403,308 </D><D>$9,786,439 </D><D>$36,594,622 </D><D>$53,761,970 </D><D>$44,558,542 </D><D>$481,395 </D><D>$149,586,276</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>2,331,528 </D><D>4,876,909 </D><D>161,765,977 </D><D>11,066,362 </D><D>43,218,848 </D><D>314,054 </D><D>223,573,678</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>895,707 </D><D>14,765,531 </D><D>69,627,753 </D><D>9,311,852 </D><D>27,438,924 </D><D>842,452 </D><D>122,882,219</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>528,647 </D><D>28,787,707 </D><D>90,338,514 </D><D>31,345,685 </D><D>41,864,493 </D><D>2,041,164 </D><D>194,906,210</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>299,313 </D><D>681,200 </D><D>1,250,981 </D><D>1,347,072 </D><D>1,556,349 </D><D>49,113 </D><D>5,184,028</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>745,154 </D><D>4,459,264 </D><D>17,961,080 </D><D>5,622,316 </D><D>9,268,560 </D><D>338,261 </D><D>38,394,636</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>16,494 </D><D>252,304 </D><D>6,044,858 </D><D>850,181 </D><D>1,880,171 </D><D>19,089 </D><D>9,063,097</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>1,008,118 </D><D>1,464,328 </D><D>7,347,507 </D><D>1,883,237 </D><D>9,787,658 </D><D>147,643 </D><D>21,638,492</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>39,638 </D><D>2,393,285 </D><D>0 </D><D>8,662,944 </D><D>0 </D><D>404,305 </D><D>11,500,173</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>369,411 </D><D>425,625 </D><D>0 </D><D>821,269 </D><D>472,850 </D><D>32,505 </D><D>2,121,660</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>52,671 </D><D>2,285,227 </D><D>4,663,091 </D><D>1,872,736 </D><D>4,564,571 </D><D>217,188 </D><D>*13,659,113</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and resuce <D>90,174 </D><D>1,850,542 </D><D>1,388,457 </D><D>715,333 </D><D>770,839 </D><D>133,149 </D><D>4,948,495</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>57,261 </D><D>1,407,964 </D><D>98,861 </D><D>1,209,767 </D><D>1,637,316 </D><D>112,482 </D><D>4,523,651</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>152,295 </D><D>552,494 </D><D>814,121 </D><D>2,219,885 </D><D>254,751 </D><D>128,157 </D><D>4,121,702</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>5,440,167 </D><D>4,331,546 </D><D>2,550,640 </D><D>31,438,546 </D><D>1,603,392 </D><D>291,164 </D><D>45,655,456</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>72,822 </D><D>53,714 </D><D>271,255 </D><D>22,099 </D><D>0 </D><D>2,088 </D><D>421,977</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Totals <D>16,502,710 </D><D>78,374,079 </D><D>400,717,716 </D><D>162,151,255 </D><D>188,877,264 </D><D>5,554,209 </D><D>852,180,862</D><F>*Includes $3,628 for signs.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII</T4>-19-<T4>C._Summary of Compliance Costs_Initial Costs </T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Infection control plan</H1><H1>Vaccination/post exposure follow-up</H1><H1>Training </H1><H1>Housekeeping</H1><H1>Recordkeeping </H1><H1>Totals</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians<D>$16,691,841</D><D>$22,350,137</D><D>$2,566,931</D><D>$11,901,992</D><D>$997,859</D><D>$54,508,760</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists<D>8,838,242</D><D>15,347,175</D><D>574,621</D><D>4,624,329</D><D>600,582</D><D>29,984,949</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes<D>3,395,402</D><D>31,205,412</D><D>1,106,829</D><D>1,113,632</D><D>1,448,844</D><D>38,270,119</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals<D>2,003,970</D><D>87,644,114</D><D>3,489,724</D><D>13,371,837</D><D>4,034,703</D><D>110,544,347</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs<D>1,134,623</D><D>1,672,492</D><D>64,352</D><D>166,184</D><D>75,980</D><D>3,113,630</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care<D>2,824,694</D><D>15,140,174</D><D>383,262</D><D>6,833,563</D><D>689,619</D><D>25,871,312</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers<D>62,523</D><D>900,844</D><D>62,456</D><D>791,346</D><D>41,316</D><D>1,858,484</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care<D>3,821,525</D><D>3,230,157</D><D>107,669</D><D>212,316</D><D>149,963</D><D>7,521,630</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services<D>150,260</D><D>6,946,786</D><D>2,435,538</D><D>0</D><D>290,065</D><D>9,822,648</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services<D>1,400,345</D><D>1,657,855</D><D>34,098</D><D>0</D><D>49,150</D><D>3,141,448</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs<D>199,664</D><D>6,251,753</D><D>138,885</D><D>812,246</D><D>283,627</D><D>*7,745,190</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue<D>341,829</D><D>5,181,625</D><D>0</D><D>884,078</D><D>375,506</D><D>6,783,039</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections<D>217,062</D><D>5,485,724</D><D>608,169</D><D>0</D><D>182,300</D><D>6,493,255</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police<D>577,313</D><D>1,573,951</D><D>1,513,081</D><D>221,345</D><D>388,431</D><D>4,274,121</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry<D>20,622,316</D><D>9,084,197</D><D>923,299</D><D>304,081</D><D>507,830</D><D>31,441,723</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair<D>276,050</D><D>113,860</D><D>16,497</D><D>0</D><D>3,503</D><D>409,909</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>62,557,658</D><D>213,786,256</D><D>14,025,409</D><D>41,236,949</D><D>10,119,278</D><D>341,784,565 </D><F>* Includes $59,015 for signs. </F><F>Source: Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Office of RegulatoryAnalysis.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>19-D._<T4>Summary of Compliance Costs_Recurring Costs</T4><H1>Industry</H1><H1>PPE</H1><H1>Vaccination/post exposure follow-up</H1><H1>Training</H1><H1>Housekeeping</H1><H1>Recordkeeping</H1><H1>Totals</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Office of physicians <D>$36,594,622 </D><D>$7,171,473 </D><D>$53,461,639 </D><D>$41,418,796 </D><D>$364,646 </D><D>$139,011,177</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Office of dentists <D>161,765,977 </D><D>3,081,289 </D><D>10,999,131 </D><D>41,998,950 </D><D>243,786 </D><D>218,089,134</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>69,627,753 </D><D>11,114,498 </D><D>9,182,353 </D><D>27,145,148 </D><D>672,938 </D><D>117,742,689</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>90,338,514 </D><D>18,533,346 </D><D>30,937,388 </D><D>38,337,002 </D><D>1,569,104 </D><D>179,715,353</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>1,250,981 </D><D>485,519 </D><D>1,339,543 </D><D>1,512,509 </D><D>40,223 </D><D>4,628,775</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>17,961,080 </D><D>2,687,864 </D><D>5,577,474 </D><D>7,465,866 </D><D>257,575 </D><D>33,949,860</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>6,044,858 </D><D>146,905 </D><D>842,874 </D><D>1,671,414 </D><D>14,255 </D><D>8,720,306</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>7,347,507 </D><D>1,086,399 </D><D>1,870,640 </D><D>9,731,649 </D><D>130,097 </D><D>20,166,293</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>0 </D><D>1,580,511 </D><D>8,377,986 </D><D>0 </D><D>370,368 </D><D>10,328,865</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>0 </D><D>231,656 </D><D>817,280 </D><D>472,850 </D><D>26,754 </D><D>1,548,540</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>4,663,091 </D><D>1,553,772 </D><D>1,856,487 </D><D>4,350,300 </D><D>184,004 </D><D>*12,610,227</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>1,388,457 </D><D>1,244,292 </D><D>715,333 </D><D>537,620 </D><D>89,214 </D><D>3,974,917</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>98,861 </D><D>766,134 </D><D>1,138,612 </D><D>1,637,316 </D><D>91,153 </D><D>3,732,075</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>814,121 </D><D>368,341 </D><D>2,042,854 </D><D>196,360 </D><D>82,710 </D><D>3,504,387</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>2,550,640 </D><D>3,268,695 </D><D>31,330,520 </D><D>1,523,176 </D><D>231,748 </D><D>38,904,779</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>271,255 </D><D>40,392 </D><D>20,169 </D><D>0 </D><D>1,678 </D><D>333,493</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>400,717,716 </D><D>53,361,087 </D><D>160,510,282 </D><D>177,998,957 </D><D>4,370,253 </D><D>796,960,870</D><F>*Includes $2,573 for signs.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG>Total annual incremental costs for the proposed regulation appear in TablesVII-19-A and VII-19-B. Total costs are expected to be $852 million. Itis estimated that offices of dentists will incur the largest share of thesecosts at $224 million. Medical equipment repair establishments will bearthe smallest share, $422,000. The average cost per facility will be $1,379,ranging from $142 per facility for the medical equipment repair sectorto $33,035 per facility for hospitals. It is estimated that state and localgovernments will bear about 8 percent of the costs of the proposed regulationwhile federally administered facilities will bear about 3 percent. Thecosts of adequate PPE are expected to amount to almost one-half of totalcompliance costs. Tables VII-19-C and VII-19-D provide summaries by sector of initial costsand recurring costs, respectively. Cost Savings. As an offset to these costs, there are several areas of potentialcost savings. First, cost savings attributable to reduced rates of nosocomialinfections are likely after implementation of the OSHA rule. JFA reportsthat average direct charges for nosocomial infections in the U.S. may begreater than $2.5 billion per year [Ex. 13, p. II-47]. Conservative estimatesplace the potential savings of effective infection control programs atabout $250,000 per year for the average U.S. hospital with a patient censusof 250 [Ex. 13, p. II-47]. Though most facilities have certainly institutedsome kind of infection control program, few are estimated to be at 100%compliance with OSHA's proposed rule. Most facilities, therefore, shouldrealize some reduction in costs attributable to nosocomial infections.Other evidence in the record indicates that other cost savings will berealized. In one hospital, the cost to the hospital per needlestick isestimated to be $110 [Ex. 6-160]. One commenter felt that reducing needlesticksby 40% would greatly reduce the employee health costs of such injurieswhich are about $300 per employee [Ex. 11-181, p. 4].F. Economic Impacts. Estimates of the economic impact of the proposed ruleare based on the cost figures presented above and on information containedin the public record. Impacts were computed at the industry level and aresummarized in Table VII-20. The financial information appearing in columnsone and two of the table were obtained from the sources described earlierin the Industry Profile section of this Preliminary Regulatory Impact Analysis.As shown in the table, compliance costs as a percent of sector revenue/budgetsare expected to range up to 0.87% for dentist offices. Estimates of compliancecosts as a percent of profits range up to 12.1%, and 11%, respectively,for firms providing health care personnel services, and dentist offices.The degree to which effected firms will either incur or shift regulatoryburdens depends largely on the competitive environment in which the firmsoperate and on the price elasticity of demand for the firms' products.Where the products offered are not very sensitive to price, affected firmscan successfully raise prices to offset increased costs. This descriptioncharacterizes many health care services because consumers (patients) arefrequently given little choice in medical decisions and are partially insulatedfrom price increases by the health care financing system. Although recentcost-containment policies tend to moderate these institutional factors,OSHA believes that many of the establishments affected by this standardwill eventually pass through a substantial portion of the cost increasesto consumers of health care, government units, and third party payers [Ex.13, p. IV-5]. Based on these data, OSHA preliminarily concludes that noindustry sector will experience severe economic disruption due to the impactof the proposed rule.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table VII-</T4>20.<T4>_Summary of Economic Impacts </T4><H1>Industry </H1><H1>Revenue/budget ($ million) </H1><H1>Profits \1\ ($ million) </H1><H1>Annual costs ($ million) </H1><H1>Costs/revenue (%) </H1><H1>Costs/profits \7\ (%)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of physicians <D>92,900 </D><D>\2\ 6,900 </D><D>149.59 </D><D>0.161 </D><D>2.168</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D>\3\ 57,500 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>0.260</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Offices of dentists <D>25,700 </D><D>\2\ 2,030 </D><D>223.57 </D><D>0.870 </D><D>11.013</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D>\3\ 19,000 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>1.177</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nursing homes <D>30,600 </D><D>961 </D><D>122.88 </D><D>0.402. </D><D>9.339</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hospitals <D>161,000 </D><D>1,589 </D><D>194.91 </D><D>0.121 </D><D>2.576</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical/dental labs <D>7.100 </D><D>475 </D><D>5.18 </D><D>0.073 </D><D>1.091</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Outpatient care <D>33,750 </D><D>\4\ 1,033 </D><D>38.39 </D><D>0.114 </D><D>2.231</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Blood/plasma/tissue centers <D>1,420 </D><D>N/A </D><D>9.06 </D><D>0.638 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Residential care <D>8,700 </D><D>\5\ 254 </D><D>21.64 </D><D>0.249 </D><D>5.784</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel services <D>3,200 </D><D>96 </D><D>11.50 </D><D>0.359 </D><D>11.979</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Funeral services <D>5,500 </D><D>390 </D><D>2.12 </D><D>0.039 </D><D>0.543</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Research labs <D>10,300 </D><D>433 </D><D>13.66 </D><D>0.133 </D><D>2.017</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire and rescue <D>4,000 </D><D>N/A </D><D>4.95 </D><D>0.124 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corrections <D>9,900 </D><D>N/A </D><D>4.52 </D><D>0.046 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Police <D>16,900 </D><D>N/A </D><D>4.12 </D><D>0.024 </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Health units in industry <D>(\8\) </D><D>(\8\) </D><D>45.66 </D><D>N/A </D><D>N/A</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Medical equipment repair <D>18,700 \6\ </D><D>1,000 \6\ </D><D>0.42 </D><D>0.002 </D><D>0.042</D><F>\1\ Profit totals reflect proprietary firms only.</F><F>\2\ Profits exclusive of salary.</F><F>\3\ Profits including salaries.</F><F>\4\ Based on profit margin of ambulatory facilities.</F><F>\5\ Based on profit margin of nursing home sector.</F><F>\6\ Medical equipment supply firms only.</F><F>\7\ Ratio reflects private firms only.</F><F>\8\ Health care budgets not estimated.</F><F/></ITAG></ITAG>Hospitals. As shown in Table VII-20, OSHA estimates the cost of the standardat 0.12 percent of hospital revenues and 2.6 percent of hospital profits.According to JFA [Ex. 13], hospital profit margins have deteriorated noticeablysince 1984, largely due to Medicare's Prospective Payment System (PPS),which sets a predetermined fee for each Diagnostic Rate Group (DRG). Toraise prices for these services, hospitals must rely on organizations,such as Medicare, to approve rate increases. Although the added burdenof the OSHA standard may eventually be reflected in higher rates for DRGs(which, in turn, would require an increase in federal Medicare/Medicaidbudgets), in the short-term, hospitals will bear the cost increases orpass them on to consumers not covered by DRGs. Hospitals which employ temporarynursing personnel may also experience additional cost increases due topersonnel service companies attempting to pass forward compliance costs(see below). Hospitals are now in a period of consolidation, evidenced by increasesin the closing of investor-owned facilities, which accounted for over 43percent of community hospital closures in 1987, and by accelerated growthin the number of hospitals owned or managed by multi-hospital systems [ProspectivePayment Assessment Commission, Report to the Congress, June 1988, pp. 50,51].Nevertheless, JFA concluded that although the costs of the proposed OSHAstandard will increase the financial problems of troubled hospitals, theywill not necessarily lead to hospital closures. They noted that rural hospitals,which have the greatest financial problems, often survive because of strongcommunity support, and that the standard's costs are a relatively minorpart of the expenditures of larger hospitals. JFA also calculated that, in 1988, 54% of hospital revenues were providedby government, 36% by private insurers, and only 8% by direct patient outlays[Ex. 13, p. IV-11]. With so much of the cost of hospital care borne bythird parties, these price increases would not significantly reduce thelong run demand for hospital services. Thus, OSHA expects that the averageadditional cost of $32,000 per facility might support the current consolidationtrend in the hospital sector, but will not substantially alter the generalindustry structure. Physicians Offices. Prospective compliance costs are estimated to be 0.16%of physician office revenues and 2.2% of profits. This latter ratio, however,may not be a meaningful indicator of economic feasibility for this sectorbecause most physician offices are owner-managed, and current tax lawsprovide strong incentives for distributing income as salaries or bonuses.Adjusting this ratio by adding an estimate of average physicians' incometo the reported office profit shows that expected compliance costs areonly 0.3% of total practitioner's income. Although costs of this magnitudewould not bring a marked disruption in this industry even if borne entirelyby these employers, this sector will not bear the full cost burden. JFAestimated that under the current reimbursement system, the direct consumercontribution to physicians office receipts is only about 26%, with privateinsurance and government making up the remainder [Ex. 13, p. IV-11]. Thus,it is probable that physicians will be able to pass through some of theincreased costs by raising fees. Dentist Offices. Dental practices will incur compliance costs averagingalmost $2,400 per facility, about 0.87% of revenues and 11% of reportedprofits. After adjusting this ratio to reflect the average income of dentists,the expected compliance costs amount to 1.2% of the total net income. Severalfactors have reduced dentist incomes in recent years, including fluoridetreated water and better tooth decay prevention and, since the early 1980's,a fall in the number of employees covered by private dental insurance plans.JFA calculates that almost two-thirds of dental revenues are paid by directconsumer outlays [Ex. 13, p. IV-11]. As a result, dentists may be lessable than most other health care providers to pass forward ths costs ofcompliance and may suffer some income decline, and some patients may chooseto defer routine preventive care. Nursing Homes. Compliance costs for nursing homes are estimated at about0.4% of revenue and at 9.3% of profits. These facilities may face the sameproblem as hospitals in passing forward cost increases because state andfederal agencies are developing similar cost control measures. At thistime, however, at least some price increases would be expected becauseapproximately half of nursing home revenues are from government and insuranceprograms. Moreover, future conditions should favor nursing home profitssince the demand for beds is expected to rise sharply as the populationages. Residential Care Facilities. Compliance costs for residential care facilitiesaverage about 0.25% of revenues and 5.8% of profits. Many of these facilities,however, are nonprofit or public institutions. Costs incurred by the non-profitestablishments may or may not be fully passed through, depending on financingsources. JFA found that only about one-half of the revenue of these facilitiesconsist of direct consumer payments, so it is likely that some increasedrates could be supported. Alternatively, The Hospice Association of Americareports that 40% to 100% of hospice funding is derived from donations [Ex.11-202], and that these facilities would have to absorb a large proportionof the costs of compliance. For the facilities that are publicly owned,additional funds would need to be covered by increases in tax rates orby reduced funding to other government programs. Other Health Care Facilities. As shown in Table VIl-20, compliance costsfor the other health care facilites will be less than 1% of revenues. Forthose sectors where profit data were available, the estimated compliancecost-to-profit ratios for the other affected sectors are below 3%. Althougha significant burden within this group may be experienced by some medicaland research laboratories, pharmaceutical companies, in which many of thelarger laboratories are located, generally have strong profits and favorableexpectations for future Randamp;D growth. Health Units in Industry. The national cost total for health units in otherindustries is substantial, but the costs for these units are spread overso many industries that the estimated annual cost per facility is only$204. Since health units are typically found in large businesses, thesecosts will have a negligible impact on market structure. Personnel Service Companies. Compliance costs for personnel firms supplyingmedical care staff are estimated at 0.36% of related revenue and 12.1%of related profits. The impact on this sector is substantial because ofthe large number of affected employees per firm who must be provided withtraining and with medical evaluations. The estimated cost-to-profit ratiomay be overstated, however, because it assumes that profits of firms providinghealth care personnel are similar to profits of firms providing other categoriesof personnel. JFA noted that some of these firms may attempt to defraycosts by giving preference to hiring vaccinated workers [Ex. 13, p. IV-15].In many areas, however, it is likely that the shortage of nursing personnelwill permit these firms to shift compliance costs forward to hospitals.Non-Health Care Facilities. Compliance costs for corrections, police, andfire and rescue operations amount to less than 0.2% of the budgets of suchorganizations. JFA calculates that if these costs were passed on by highertaxes, this would increase the average per capita tax burden by 11 cents[Ex. 13, p. IV-14]. Similarly, the costs of compliance for funeral homeswould not disrupt the industry as they are estimated at less than 0.1%of revenues and at about 0.5% of profits. As noted above, facilities administered by state and local governmentswere estimated to incur about 8 percent of the total costs of complianceand federal facilities were estimated to incur about 3 percent. The totalimpact on government finances, however, will be greater, as some of thecosts passed forward by health care providers will be financed throughgovernment programs such as Medicare. Assuming that the percentage of healthcare costs financed by government programs in 1988 is an approximationof future financing patterns [Ex. 13, p. IV-11], costs to the federal governmentwould be expected to be about $200 million, representing 23.5% of the totalcosts of the rulemaking, and costs to state and local governments wouldbe expected to be about $125 million, representing 14.7% of the total costsof the rulemaking. Regulatory Flexibility Analysis. OSHA finds that the impact of the proposedrule on small businesses will be similar to that found for the affecteduniverse as a whole because the vast majority of businesses affected aresmall. Table VII-21 lists eleven industry sectors (public services, healthunits in industry, and blood banks are omitted) and provides estimatesreported by JFA [Ex. 13, p. IV-17] of the percentage of firms classifiedas small (reporting less than $3.5 million in revenue) and the percentageof total sector revenue earned by those firms. It is evident from the table that for all sectors except hospitals, thehigh percentage of small firms precludes any significant competitive disadvantagebased on size. Thus, for all sectors except hospitals, the impacts developedabove will be borne relatively uniformly throughout each respective sector.As shown in the table, small firms make up about 29% of the hospital sector.These facilities may be at a competitive disadvantage in that small hospitalsmay have lower operating margins than large hospitals [Ex. 13, p. IV-11;Prospective Payment Assessment Commission, Report to the Congress, June1988, p. 50], and thus, cost absorption may not be an option for such facilities.This effect will be offset somewhat as smaller hospitals tend to be locatedin rural areas where there are few competitors. OSHA concludes that the impact of the proposed standard on small businesseswill not differ significantly from that which will be realized by the affecteduniverse as a whole. Also, no differential impact with regard to establishmentsize is expected, though, as noted earlier in the discussion of overallimpacts, the pace of hospital industry consolidation may be accelerated.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp10,i1,6,r30,8,9</C><T4>Table VII-</T4>21.<T4>_Effect of the Standard on Small Business</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[1988]</ITAG><H1>SIC</H1><H1>Facility type</H1><H1>Percent of firms with revenue of less than $3.5 million</H1><H1>Percent of revenue from small business</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">801 andamp; 3<D>Offices of MD's andamp; DO's</D><D>99.32</D><D>88 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">802<D>Offices of Dentists</D><D>99.97</D><D>88 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">805<D>Nursing Homes</D><D>87.47</D><D>48 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">806<D>Hospitals</D><D>28.64</D><D>2 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">807<D>Medical and Dental Labs</D><D>98.59</D><D>58 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">808<D>Outpatient Care</D><D>98.02</D><D>45 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">836<D>Residential Care</D><D>97.60</D><D>75 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7362<D>Personnel Services</D><D>90.54</D><D>34 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">726<D>Funeral Services</D><D>99.61</D><D>90 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7391<D>Research Labs</D><D>91.63</D><D>14 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"> <D>Medical Equip. Repair</D><D> </D><D>NA </D><F>Source: Jack Faucett Associates.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Environmental Impact </ITAG>The provisions of the proposed standard have been reviewed in accordancewith the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of1969 [42 U.S.C. 432, et seq.], the Council on Environmental Quality (CEQ)NEPA regulations [40 CFR Part 1500]. and OSHA's DOL NEPA Procedures [29CFR Part 11]. As a result of this review, OSHA concludes that no evidenceexists to suggest that the proposed rule will have a significant environmentalimpact. Evidence in the public record indicates that the volume of waste handledas infectious will increase somewhat following promulgation of the OSHAbloodborne pathogens standard. This is because not all generators of infectiouswaste are currently packaginq all types of infectious waste (as definedin the standard) in the manner required by the proposed rule [Ex. 13, TablesII-29, -30]. (The proposed regulation requires infectious waste to be packagedin color coded containers or to bear the universal symbol for infectiouswaste). As generators come into compliance, infectious waste previouslyentering the general waste stream will be shifted into one of the majortreatment options used for the disposal of infectious waste, namely incinerationor autoclaving. Any potential environmental impact associated with theproposed rule would be realized via one of these disposal techniques. Tothe extent that infectious waste in the general waste stream is currentlyhandled improperly, the proposed rule may improve environmental qualityas previously mishandled infectious waste is redirected toward preferreddisposal alternatives. The proposed rule will also increase the volume of waste entering the generalwaste stream. This will be due to the increase in the use of disposablepersonal protective equipment. This waste will be disposed of principallyby landfill and incineration. OSHA estimates that an increase in tonnageof approximately 67,000 tons per year will be realized across all sectors.Total U.S. solid waste generation is about 150 million tons per year [1987Stat. Abstract]. Thus, the OSHA proposed regulation is estimated to increasesolid waste tonnage by less than 0.1 percent. It should also be noted that OSHA is aware that the Environmental ProtectionAgency will publish an interim final rule on infectious waste early in1989. When published, the rule will be incorporated into the public recordfor the bloodborne pathogens standard. <ITAG tagnum="84">IX. Summary and Explanation of the Proposed Standard </ITAG>OSHA believes that the proposed requirements set forth in this notice arethose, based on currently available data, which are necessary and appropriateto provide adequate protection to employees exposed to blood and otherpotentially infectious materials. In the development of this proposal,OSHA has carefully considered the comments from interested parties givenin response to the Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking. In addition,numerous guidelines, reference works, journal articles, and other information,accumulated by OSHA since the initiation of this proceeding have been takeninto consideration in the development of this proposed standard. Paragraph (a) Scope and Application The standard applies to all occupational exposures to blood and other potentiallyinfectious materials as defined in paragraph (b) of this standard. Therisk of infection with bloodborne pathogens is dependent on the likelihoodof exposure to blood and other potentially infectious materials whereverthat exposure occurs. Any exposure incident may result in infection andsubsequent illness. The hazard affects employees in many industries andis not dependent on the type of facility in which an employee works. Byconditioning coverage upon exposure potential rather than occupation orindustry segment, OSHA hopes to protect all employees at risk regardlessof their job titles or place of employment. Blood has long been recognized as a potential source of pathogenic microorganismsthat may present a risk to individuals who are exposed during the performanceof their duties. In 1983, the CDC published guidelines for controllinginfections in hospitals (Ex. 6-74). One section, entitled ``Blood and BodyFluid Precautions,'' recommended that certain precautions be taken in handlingthe blood and body fluids of patients who were known or were suspectedof being infected with bloodborne pathogens. Special precautions were recommendedto be followed with these patients. The patients were identified usingspecial placards, and their blood specimens were labeled in order to alertemployees who had contact with the specimens. Under this approach, specimensof blood from patients whose serological status was unknown were collectedand analyzed using no special precautions to protect the employee fromexposure. Although some patients could be identified as infected with HIV or HBV,allowing employees to be alerted to the increased risks present, it soonbecame apparent that many individuals infected with these viruses wereeither undiagnosed or their infection status was not known to the healthcareemployee. Patients being treated for unrelated injuries or illnesses; dentalpatients; trauma victims; and blood donors are all examples of individualswhose infection status may not be known and whose blood may present a riskto the employees who come in contact with it. The possibility of undiagnosedinfection combined with the increasing prevalence of HIV and HBV led manyinfection control practitioners to recommend that blood and certain otherbody fluids from all patients be considered potentially infectious andthat rigorous infection control precautions be taken to minimize the riskof exposure. This approach is called ``universal blood and body fluid precautions''or ``universal precautions,'' and the CDC published this recommendationin its August 1987 guidelines (Ex. 6-153) ``Who is at risk?'' and ``When?'' was the subject of many comments to therecord. Information submitted documents both the occupations at risk andthe specific tasks and procedures that can result in occupational exposure.Risks associated with certain occupations or procedures have also beensingled out by CDC in their guidelines and were mentioned repeatedly bythe commenters to the ANPR. The 1985 CDC guideline recommending HBV vaccination for personnel at riskincluded these examples of occupational groups having frequent exposureto blood: medical technologists; operating room staff; phlebotomists andI.V. therapy nurses; surgeons and pathologists; oncology and dialysis unitstaff; emergency room staff; nursing personnel; and staff physicians. CDCalso cites the need for HBV vaccination of students in schools of medicine,dentistry, nursing, laboratory technology and other allied health professions.This set of recommendations also included healthcare workers based outsidehospitals such as dental professionals, laboratory and blood bank technicians,dialysis center staff, emergency medical technicians and morticians. Abrief discussion follows of some additional types of employees exposedto bloodborne pathogens and the places where they are employed. Individuals who render emergency medical services are clearly at risk forblood exposure incidents. One study has shown that a high percentage (16%)of male trauma victims between the ages of 25 and 34 at an urban hospitalwere infected with HIV (Ex. 6-111). The comments received from the InternationalAssociation of Firefighters included information about a Norwood, Ohiofirefighter/paramedic, who became infected with hepatitis B virus whenresponding to an emergency call. The employee's initial exposure incidentoccurred while he was treating the victim of a drug overdose who was infectedwith hepatitis B. A painful, debilitating illness followed and he eventuallydied of renal and hepatic failure seven years after the initial exposure(Ex. 11-125). Prehospital care is often rendered in a hostile or uncontrolled environment.Conditions beyond the control of the employee, ranging from broken glassand sharp metal at an accident scene, weapons at the scene of a violentcrime, and inclement weather, may complicate the tasks and make them morehazardous. The CDC has recently completed a set of guidelines for publicsafety officers that provides special guidance for emergency medical personnel(Ex. 14).Many of the commenters considered the risk to these providers of emergencymedical service to be substantial (ANA Ex. 11-86, AAOHN Ex. 11-111, Int.Assn. of Firefighters Ex. 11-125, Merck Ex.11-165). Moreover, CDC has issuedguidelines for personnel rendering emergency medical service (Exs. 6-153,6-199, Ex. 15). On the other hand, the American Ambulance Association statedthat although its members are voluntarily following some of the CDC guidelines,the evidence did not show a need for first responders/ambulance transportpersonnel to be included in OSHA rulemaking. They also stated that providingthe HBV vaccine would be prohibitively expensive (Ex. 11-54). Employees who work in clinical or diagnostic laboratories which performa variety of tests to aid in the diagnosis of disease and the managementof treatment are at risk for occupational exposure. Although not all laboratorytasks involve blood or other potentially infectious materials, a relativelyhigh potential for exposure exists for employees who analyze and processthese substances. Several organizations and groups have devised proceduresfor reducing risks in the laboratory and these procedures are part of ourrecord (Ex. 11-159, 11-71, 11-280, 6-153). In addition to the traditionalhospital clinical laboratory, employees in other laboratories are at potentialrisk for exposure as well. These include, but are not limited to, free-standingclinical or diagnostic labs, labs in dentists' or physicians' offices,blood and plasma center labs, and laboratories preparing reagents fromhuman blood or blood components. The housekeeping and laundry workers in healthcare facilities may alsobe at risk of occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens. (Ex. 11-18).Individuals who perform housekeeping duties, particularly in patient careand laboratory areas, are at risk for occupational exposure when they performcertain tasks such as cleaning blood spills and handling infectious wastes.Laundry workers may be exposed to laundry contaminated with blood or tocontaminated sharps inadvertantly left in the laundry. Most recommendationsfor minimizing or eliminating these hazards focus on limiting the riskby minimizing handling of soiled laundry. This practice not only reducesthe likelihood of skin contact with blood contaminated laundry but alsoreduces the likelihood of a puncture wound from a needle or other sharpobject. Dentists, dental hygienists, other dental professionals are continuallyexposed to blood and bloody saliva during almost all dental procedures.Because saliva in dental procedures is so likely to contain blood, theCDC recommends personal protective equipment to practioners for all dentalprocedures (Ex. 6-490). Most commenters who considered this issue agreedthese workers are at risk and supported a standard for dental operations(Exs. 11-162, 11-177, 11-327). The American Dental Association did notquestion the risk but opposed an OSHA standard because they believe dentistsare already taking precautions (Ex. 11-43). The physician's office is commonly the scene of blood collection, treatmentof wounds, and other invasive procedures. Physicians, nurses, nurse practitioners,physician assistants and related healthcare workers may be exposed in thissetting. The office may also contain a laboratory where occupational exposuremay occur as blood is analyzed. Employees who perform these tasks havethe same risk as their hospital-based colleagues. Nursing homes or other long-term care facilities were frequently citedby commenters as places of employment where employees are at risk for bloodand body fluid exposure (Exs. 11-86 ANA, 11-74, 11-172). The American HealthCare Association, which represents more than 9,000 long term care facilitiesand allied health care providers, stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">[L]ong term health care facilities should be included, [in the standard]but we believe that recognition should be given to the differences in bothtype of care and population served in long term care facilities as opposedto acute care facilities. (AHCA Ex. 11-27)</ITAG>The Service Employees International Union urged OSHA not to exclude nursinghomes from the standard:<ITAG tagnum="21">An exclusion of nursing homes based on their current low AIDS populationis inappropriate. Nursing home workers are as likely as other health careworkers to be exposed to HBV. They also face other infectious diseasessuch as TB. Moreover, such a policy would be dangerously short sighted.CDC estimates that more than 1.5 million individuals are today infectedwith the HIV virus. The growing numbers of AIDS patients together withsoaring hospital-based health costs will spur treatment in alternativehealthcare settings like nursing homes and respite homes. (SEIU Ex. 11-61)</ITAG>A hospice is one of several alternative health care programs open to theterminally ill, including terminally ill AIDS patients. Employees provideservices to these patients that place the employee at risk for occupationalexposure. The Hospice Association of America, representing more than 1700hospice programs, noted the risk and requested OSHA to consider their employeesand their volunteers for inclusion in any mandated infection control program(Ex. 11-202). Another alternative to hospital care is home health care. The NationalAssociation for Home Care (Ex. 11-203) expressed the concern that using``health care facility'' to define coverage would lead to misunderstandingand indicated that it is the services being rendered rather than the locationof those services that is connected to the risk. They listed a number oftasks that home health care providers may be expected to perform includingcollecting a blood specimen, cleaning and dressing wounds, and managingintrathecal, epidural, venous and arterial shunts and catheters. Employeeswho perform these tasks are clearly at risk for occupational exposure.In blood banks and plasma centers, the potential for occupational exposurebegins with the initial finger stick of the donor and continues until contaminatedunits are identified and destroyed. The blood and blood products in thesefacilities are regulated by the Food and Drug Administration (FDA), andall plasma and blood collection facilities have extensive written proceduresfor donor requirements, donor room procedures, and laboratory testing ofthe blood with blood components (ABRA Ex. 11-71). However, the FDA doesnot set standards for the health and safety of the employees. The American Blood Resources Association (ABRA) has argued that workersin a plasma center are at a reduced risk of exposure to bloodborne pathogensbecause many plasma donors donate frequently, as often twice a week, andtherefore their antibody status is known (Ex. 11-71). Similarly, the AmericanRed Cross stated that ``its healthy blood donor population does not presentany increased health risks to its employees and volunteers'' (ARC Ex. 11-280).However, despite prescreening, both blood banks and plasma centers havedonors who are infected with HIV, HBV, and other bloodborne pathogens includingnon-A non-B hepatitis. In any discussion of the risk to employees in theprocessing centers, it is important to note that these facilities dedicatea substantial amount of their resources to identifying these contaminatedunits and ensuring that they are not released for distribution or for furthermanufacture. Employees engaged in the collecting and testing of these unitsare at risk for exposure. Another potential source of bloodborne pathogens is human tissue that isremoved for laboratory analysis or for transplantation. The American Associationof Tissue Banks, representing 600 individual and 100 institutional membersstrongly supported the implementation of a standard and recommended includingthe category ``tissue bank personnel'' in the coverage (Ex. 11-50). Although the overwhelming majority of cases of HBV and HIV infections occurin adults, one group of children have a high risk for hepatitis B infection.This group consists of mentally retarded children who are or have beeninstitutionalized. Surveys conducted in large state institutions indicatethat the risk of a child contracting hepatitis B in one of these institutionsranges from 50% to 90% with 5% to 20% of those infected becoming hepatitisB carriers (11-165 p 4). The behavior of these children, including scratching,biting, and self-mutilation, may present a risk to those who teach or otherwisecare for them. Mentally retarded adults who are or have been institutionalizedalso have an increased risk for being infected with HBV. In 1985, the CDCrecommended the hepatitis B vaccine for both the clients and the staffof institutions for the mentally retarded (Ex. 6-199). Many commenters made the point that healthcare is also being provided inindustrial and in educational settings. These facilities often provideservices such as emergency first aid, collection of blood, and cleaningand dressing of wounds, activities that place the healthcare provider atrisk for occupational exposure. Examples of these facilities include occupationalhealth clinics, school health clinics, and first aid stations (Exs. 11-111,11-86, 11-216).Research and production facilities that concentrate or otherwise handleconcentrated virus are also included within the scope of this standard.There are many researchers in academia, government and industry who arestudying HIV and HBV. These individuals may be at even greater risk thanhealth care workers because the concentration of virus is often greaterthan that found in blood or other body fluids. In addition, the generationof aerosols may increase the risk. The OSHA record contains evidence thattwo individuals who work with concentrated HIV have become infected asthe result of occupational exposure. (Ex. 6-187, 6-368, 6-312). Although OSHA is not aware of any documented cases of HBV or HIV infectionassociated with the collection, transportation, and decontamination ofinfectious wastes, the potential for such an exposure prior to decontaminationof the waste is clear. OSHA has recently published a proposed standardentitled ``Hazardous Waste Operations and Emergency Response'' (<T3>Federal Register; </T3>vol. 52; No. 153; 29620). However, employeesdealing with infectious waste are covered under that proposal only if theyare involved in emergency response clean-up, such as would result if atruck hauling infectious waste tipped and spilled, or during clean-up ofa State or Federally-designated hazardous waste site containing infectiouswastes. The Agency proposes, therefore, to extend the scope of the proposedBloodborne Pathogens standard to include those employees contacting infectiouswastes in situations other than emergency response or hazardous waste siteclean-up. The Infectious Waste Council of the National Solid Waste ManagementAssociation supported the use of personal protective clothing and equipment,medical surveillance and training for infectious waste employees. (Ex.11-60) There was a consensus among the commenters that employees of mortuariesare at risk because they are exposed to blood and certain body fluids andshould be covered by the standard (Exs. 11-293, 11-282, 11-240, 11-181,11-169, 11-157, 11-165). For example:<ITAG tagnum="21">Mortuary workers are potentially exposed to large quantities of bloodduring the preparation of cadavers; there is also potential for certainabrasions (SEIU Ex. 11-161). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Embalmers constitute a group of long ignored non-hospital based healthcare workers. During the embalming procedure they often come into contactwith large amounts of uncontainerized blood as the vascular system is drained.Depending on the cause of death and whether an autopsy has been performed,they may be required to handle various body parts and tissues, as wellas to make numerous incisions and subsequently suture the incised tissue.These procedures put them at risk of exposure. (AAOHN Ex. 11-111)</ITAG>Only one commenter, The National Funeral Home Directors, questioned whetherthere was a significant risk of occupational exposure to HBV and HIV inthe industry. Nevertheless, they stated that ``Funeral directors are ** * taking precautions regarding known HBV and HIV cases'' (NFDA 11-164).Several commenters pointed out the potential risk to employees who serviceor repair medical instruments or other types of equipment that may be contaminatedwith blood or body fluids such as dialysis pumps, pacemakers, liquid chromatographs,and centrifuges (Exs. 11-3, 11-43, 11-97, 11-282). These devices are oftencontaminated both externally and internally (Exs. 11-43 ADA, 11-7 YSI).An occupational exposure may occur when the equipment is serviced on site(Ex. 11-282) or at the factory or service center prior to decontamination(Ex. 11-7). Other employees who may be exposed to blood and other potentially infectiousmaterials include firefighters, law enforcement personnel and correctionsofficers. These employees would be covered under the proposed standardif they have occupational exposure to blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials and if they are employed by the private sector, the federal government,or a state or local government in a state that has an OSHA approved stateplan. Employees of state and local governments, including those employedin public hospitals and health clinics, in states without OSHA approvedstate occupational safety and health plans are not covered by OSHA regulations.(For more information on states and territories with OSHA state plans,see section II_Legal Authority.) Many commenters urged OSHA to include firefighters and law enforcementpersonnel, who they considered to be at increased risk. (Exs. 11-86 ANA,11-15 AFSCME, 11-74 NY State Dept. of Health, 11-111 AAOHN, 11-165 Merck,11-125 Int'l. Ass'n. of Firefighters). When these individuals act as emergencyfirst responders their risk is similar to that discussed earlier for emergencymedical services. In addition, the potential for a hostile or uncontrolledenvironment at a fire or crime scene mandates special procedures in devisingan adequate program of protection. The combination of broken glass, jaggedmetal and blood may present a hazard to the public safety officer who isattempting to extricate the victim of a vehicle accident. Even after thevictim has been removed from the scene, the employee may have to remainin a blood contaminated environment while the investigation and cleanupcontinues. For law enforcement officers, weapons (including knives, icepicks and razor blades) and drug paraphernalia (including needles and syringes)may have to be collected as evidence. Also, facilities for personal cleanupcan be inadequate or lacking altogether. OSHA requests specific comments on the protection of employees in the publicsector and any circumstances that may be unique to these individuals. Oneexample would be the need to protect the hands from both blood exposureand from cuts by broken glass and jagged metal during the extrication ofa victim from an automobile accident. There are a number of circumstancesthat place corrections officers at risk of exposure. Some examples arebody cavity searches and exposure as a result of the violent behavior ofthe inmates, a group with a high prevalence because of past and presenthigh risk behavior, for example, intravenous drug use. OSHA's preliminary conclusion is that all employees who have occupationalexposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials [as definedin paragraph (b) of the standard] as the result of performing their dutiesare at risk for infection by bloodborne pathogens. This risk has been mostthoroughly documented in healthcare facilities such as hospitals; however,the risk is not confined to hospitals but is present whenever blood orother potentially infectious materials are present. Exposures do occurin a number of industries outside the healthcare industry and to employeeswho are not necessarily engaged in the direct delivery of healthcare (e.g.medical equipment repair). Therefore, the scope of the standard includesoccupational activities that occur both in healthcare and non-healthcarefacilities and in permanent and temporary worksites. Examples of healthcare facilities include, but are not limited to: hospitals, clinics, dentists'and physicians' offices, blood banks and plasma centers, occupational healthclinics, nursing (long term care) homes, hospices, urgent care centers,clinical laboratories, mortuaries and funeral homes, and institutions forthe mentally retarded. Examples of non-healthcare operations include, butare not limited to the service and repair of equipment, infectious wastedisposal, virus research laboratories and production facilities, and correctionalinstitutions. In addition, examples of mobile (temporary) operations wherethere may be occupational exposure to blood and other potentially infectiousmaterials includes mobile blood banks, crime scenes, and scenes of accidentsor other trauma.OSHA believes that under the proposed scope each employee who has occupationalexposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials will be providedthe necessary protection afforded by the proposed standard. The Agencyrequests comment on the breadth of the scope and application of the standard.Paragraph (b) Definitions ``Assistant Secretary'' means the Assistant Secretary of Labor for OccupationalSafety and Health or a designated representative of the Assistant Secretary.``Blood'' is defined in this standard as human whole blood; human bloodcomponents such as plasma or platelets; and human blood products such asclotting factors. ``Bloodborne Pathogens'' means pathogenic microorganisms that are presentin human blood and that can infect and cause disease in persons who areexposed to blood on other potentially infectious materials containing thesepathogens. In addition to hepatitis B virus (HBV), human immunodeficiencyvirus (HIV), and non-A, non-B hepatitis virus(es), further examples ofsuch microorganisms include, but are not limited to, the pathogens whichcause syphilis, malaria, viral hemorrhagic fever, and babesiosis. ``Clinical Laboratory'' is defined as a workplace where diagnostic proceduresor other screening procedures are performed on blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials. These laboratories may be located within hospitalsand clinics, in medical or dental offices, or may be free-standing facilities.Laboratories that perform antibody and antigen screening, such as laboratoriesin blood and plasma centers, are also considered ``clinical laboratories''.``Director'' means the Director of the National Institute for OccupationalSafety and Health (NIOSH), U.S. Department of Health and Human Services,or a designated representative of the Director. ``Disinfect'' is defined, for the purpose of this standard, as a procedurewhich inactivates virtually all recognized pathogenic microorganisms butnot necessarily all microbial forms (e.g. bacterial endospores) on inanimateobjects. This definition is identical to that found in Chapter 13 of the<T3>Manual of Clinical Microbiology </T3>of the American Society for Microbiology.(Ex. 6-343 ) ``Engineering Controls'' are defined as controls that isolate or removea hazard from a workplace. Biosafety cabinets are examples of engineeringcontrols since they not only remove air contaminants through a local exhaustsystem but provide the added protection of confining the contaminant withinan enclosed cabinet thereby isolating it from the worker. Other examplesof engineering controls are sharps disposal containers which isolate contaminatedneedles or other sharps from employees and plexiglass shields on hematronsto prevent blood spattering into the operator's face during tube segmentation.``Exposure Incident'' means a specific eye, mouth, other mucous membrane,non-intact skin, or parenteral contact with blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials that results from the performance of an employee'sduties. Examples of an exposure incident include blood spattering intothe eyes or splashing into the mouth or an injury involving a blood-contaminatedneedle. ``Infectious Waste'' incorporates those items about which there is someagreement of expert opinion that they may present an exposure risk. InJuly of 1988, the Office of Technology Assessment (OTA) conducted a workshopwith hospital, regulatory, and environmental experts at which the statusof medical waste management nationwide was discussed. The background paperemanating from that meeting, <T3>Issues In Medical Waste Management </T3>notes that Dr. Nelson Slavikstates in his report on the proceedings of the EPA meeting of experts oninfectious wastes held in November 1987:<ITAG tagnum="21">Not withstanding the risk perceptions and anxieties associated withthe fear of contracting AIDS, those categories of infectious wastes thatpossess the greatest potential to transmit disease are contaminated sharps,human blood and blood products, pathological wastes (primarily body fluids),and laboratory wastes (Slavik, 1987)</ITAG>The paper goes on to say that since these wastes are consistently recognizedas presenting a potential hazard of either disease association or accidentalinjection, proper handling and disposal are warranted. (Ex. 6-339). Therefore,OSHA has defined ``Infectious Waste'', to be blood and blood products,contaminated sharps, pathological wastes, and microbiological wastes. ``Occupational exposure'' is one of the key terms upon which this proposedstandard rests. It contains the criteria which trigger application of theprovisions of the proposed standard. As proposed, occupational exposure is:<ITAG tagnum="20">``reasonably anticipated skin, eye, mucous membrane, or parenteralcontact with blood or other potentially infectious materials that may resultfrom the performance of an employee's duties. This definition excludesincidental exposures that may take place on the job, and that are neitherreasonably nor routinely expected and that the worker is not required toincur in the normal course of employment.''</ITAG>Actual contact would be expected during an autopsy or surgery. In thesecases, the blood or other potentially infectious materials come in directcontact with the employee's skin, gloves or other protective clothing.Even though actual exposures may not occur, reasonably anticipated exposuresoccur in procedures where blood or other potentially infectious materialsare an integral part of the task being performed but the procedure doesnot always result in actual contact. Examples of potential contacts includephlebotomy and changing a surgical dressing. The occupational exposure must be reasonably anticipated. For example,the employer would reasonably anticipate that exposure to blood eithermay occur or will occur when an employee is performing dentistry and certainsurgical, medical, or laboratory procedures. On the other hand, the employerwould not reasonably anticipate that exposure to blood would occur whenan employee is processing insurance claims in an office setting.As indicated these are exposures that the employee is required to incurin the performance of the employee's duties. There are many examples ofemployees whose jobs require them to come into contact with blood or otherpotentially infectious materials_most physicians, nurses, dentists, andembalmers. An example of an exposure that an employee is T3not  requiredto incur (i.e., an incidental exposure) happens when an employee takesit upon himself or herself to help another employee, a ``Good SamaritanAct.'' For example, one employee may assist another employee who has anosebleed or who is bleeding as the result of a fall. This would not beconsidered an occupational exposure unless the employee who provides assistanceis a member of a first aid team or is otherwise expected to render assistanceas one of his or her duties. Under the latter circumstance, the exposurewould be considered occupational. OSHA seeks comment on whether this definitionincludes all situations that should be considered occupational exposures.``Other Potentially Infectious Materials'' consists of three primary categoriesof material which have the potential to transmit bloodborne pathogens.OSHA has used the term ``potentially'' to acknowledge that body fluidsand tissues may or may not contain bloodborne pathogens. However, the provisionsof the proposed standard must be followed in any case. Under this definitionOSHA has included the body fluids specified by the CDC in their June 1988update of guidelines to healthcare workers (Ex. 6-316). The fluids coveredby this definition are: semen, vaginal secretions, cerebrospinal fluid,synovial fluid, pleural fluid, peritoneal fluid, pericardial fluid, amnioticfluid, saliva in dental procedures, and any other body fluid that is visiblycontaminated with blood. Semen and vaginal fluid have been shown to transmitHIV and HBV. In support of utilizing universal precautions when contactingother fluids, CDC states:<ITAG tagnum="21">Universal precautions also apply to tissues and to the following fluids:cerebrospinal fluid (CSF), synovial fluid, pleural fluid, peritoneal fluid,pericardial fluid, and amniotic fluid. The risk of transmission of HIVand HBV from these fluids is unknown; epidemiologic studies in the health-careand community setting are currently inadequate to assess the potentialrisk to health-care workers from occupational exposures to them. However,HIV has been isolated from CSF, synovial, and amniotic fluid, and HBsAghas been detected in synovial fluid, amniotic fluid and peritoneal fluid.One case of HIV transmission was reported after a percutaneous exposureto bloody pleural fluid obtained by needle aspiration (12). Whereas asepticprocedures used to obtain these fluids for diagnostic or therapeutic purposesprotect health-care workers from skin exposures, they cannot prevent penetratinginjuries due to contaminated needles or other sharp instruments. (Ex. 6-316)</ITAG>While universal precautions do not generally apply to saliva, exceptionis made in the case of saliva in dentistry. Addressing this situation,the CDC states:<ITAG tagnum="21">Special precautions, however, are recommended for dentistry. Occupationallyacquired infection with HBV in dental workers has been documented, andtwo possible cases of occupationally acquired HIV infection involving dentistshave been reported. During dental procedures, contamination of saliva withblood is predictable, trauma to health-care workers' hands is common, andblood splattering may occur. Infection control precautions for dentistryminimize the potential for nonintact skin and mucous membrane contact ofdental health-care workers to blood-contaminated saliva of patients (Ex.6-316).</ITAG>The CDC guidelines for public safety officers state:<ITAG tagnum="21">The unpredictable and emergent nature of exposures encountered byemergency and public-safety workers may make differentiation between hazardousbody fluids and those which are not hazardous very difficult and oftenimpossible. For example, poor lighting may limit the worker's ability todetect visible blood in vomitus or feces. Therefore, when emergency medicaland public-safety workers encounter body fluids under uncontrolled, emergencycircumstances in which differentiation between fluid types is difficult,if not impossible, they should treat all body fluids as potentially hazardous.</ITAG>OSHA seeks comment on whether the proposed definition of ``other potentiallyinfectious materials,'' should be amended to make it consistent with theguidelines. The second category of ``other potentially infectious materials'' is anyunfixed tissue or organs from a human (living or dead). These pose a riskbecause they may be contaminated with bloodborne pathogens. One exampleis human bone which has transmitted HIV infection as the result of transplantation(Ex. 6-357). In the same document, CDC also notes reported transmissionof HIV through ``transplantation of kidney, liver, heart, pancreas, possiblyby skin, and by artificial insemination * * *''. Although tissues and organsmay contain blood and body fluids, which may be the reason for the transmissionhazard, they are not in reality ``fluids''. Therefore, to avoid confusionOSHA has listed them as a separate category. Since casual contact, includingtouching and hugging, does not pose a risk of transmission, intact skinis not considered to be ``other potentially infectious materials.'' The third group under ``other potentially infectious materials'' relatesto the culture and propagation of HIV and HBV in laboratory cultures andexperimental animals. The group contains HIV- or HBV-containing cell ortissue cultures, organ cultures, and culture medium or other solutions;and blood, organs, or other tissues from experimental animals infectedwith HIV or HBV. This definition applies to research activities and toproduction activities where concentrations of virus can be expected toexceed that in blood. The Case Reports Section of HIV Health Effects inthis document discusses in detail the infection of two workers that resultedfrom occupational exposure to high concentrations of HIV virus in a productionfacility. ``Parenteral'' exposure is exposure which occurs through a break in theskin barrier. Examples of parenteral exposure include self-inoculationthrough an accidental needlestick or a cut with HIV-contaminated glassthat may occur when a laboratory technician is picking up a broken centrifugetube that contained an HIV culture.``Patient'' means any individual (living or deceased) whose blood or otherpotentially infectious materials may be a source of exposure to the employee.This term includes a wide spectrum of people when one considers both theneed for universal precautions and the multitude of healthcare and non-healthcaresettings in which occupational exposure may occur. Examples of such individualsinclude, but are not limited to, hospital and clinic patients; clientsof drug and alcohol treatment facilities; accident, gunshot, stabbing,or other trauma victims; residents of nursing homes or hospices; individualswho donate or sell blood, plasma, or blood components; and human remainsprior to embalming. ``Personal Protective Equipment'' is specialized clothing or equipmentworn by an individual to protect him/her from a hazard. For the purposesof this standard, this term includes, but is not limited to, equipmentsuch as (a) gloves; (b) gowns, fluid-proof aprons, laboratory coats, headand foot coverings; (c) faceshields, protective eyewear and masks; and(d) mouthpieces, resuscitation bags, or other ventilation devices. ``Production Facility'' and ``Research Laboratory'' are derived from CDC's<T3>1988 Agent Summary Statement for Human Immunodeficiency Virus.</T3>(Ex. 6-312) ``Production Facility'' means a facility engaged in activitiessuch as production of industrial-scale, large-volume quantities of HIVor HBV or high concentration and manipulation of concentrated HIV or HBV.In comparison, ``Research Laboratory'' is defined as a facility engagedin activities such as producing research-laboratory-scale amounts of HIVor HBV, manipulating concentrated virus preparations, and conducting proceduresthat may produce aerosols or droplets. ``Sharps'' means any object that can penetrate the skin including, butnot limited to, needles, lancets, scalpels, and broken capillary tubes.``Sterilization'' follows the American Society of Microbiology's definitionfor the term as ``the use of a physical or chemical procedure to destroyall microbial life, including highly resistant bacterial endospores'' (Ex.6-343). ``Universal Precautions'' is a method of infection control in which allhuman blood and certain other potentially infectious materials are consideredinfectious for HIV, HBV, and other bloodborne pathogens. In reference tothe basis for utilization of universal precautions, the CDC states:<ITAG tagnum="21">Since medical history and examination cannot reliably identify allpatients infected with HIV or other bloodborne pathogens, blood and body-fluidprecautions should be consistently used for <T3>all </T3>patients. This approach, previously recommended by CDC, andreferred to as ``universal blood and body-fluid precautions'' or ``universalprecautions'' should be used in the care of <T3>all </T3>patients, especially including those in emergency-care settingsin which the risk of blood exposure is increased and the infection statusof the patient is usually unknown. (Ex. 6-153).</ITAG>Universal precautions may be a part of a broader program of infection control,such as body substance isolation (BSI), designed to prevent the transmissionof many other pathogens in addition to bloodborne pathogens. ``Work Practice Controls'' are controls that reduce the likelihood of exposureby altering the manner in which a task is performed. As they relate tothis standard, examples of some work practice controls include (1) adherenceto the practice of universal precautions in situations of possible exposure;(2) prohibiting the shearing, bending, or breaking of needles and othersharps and not permitting recapping or manipulation of needles or othersharps by hand; and (3) prohibiting pipetting or suctioning by mouth. Ineach of these instances, the possibility for exposure to blood or otherpotentially infectious materials has been eliminated or minimized simplyby altering the way in which the employee performs the task. Paragraph (c) Infection Control Employees incur risk each time they are exposed to bloodborne pathogens.Any exposure incident may result in infection and subsequent illness. Sinceit is possible to become infected from a single exposure incident, exposureincidents must be prevented whenever possible. It is the goal of the proposedstandard to reduce significant risk by minimizing or eliminating exposureincidents. In order to determine what measures can be taken to minimize or eliminateexposure incidents, the employer must know which tasks or procedures involveoccupational exposure. Therefore paragraph (c)(1)(i) requires each employerhaving employees with occupational exposures to identify and document thetasks and procedures where occupational exposures may occur. The requirement to perform an exposure determination is similar to theapproach taken by the DOL/HHS Joint Advisory Notice (JAN) (52 FR 41818,October 30, 1987) which calls for identifying three categories of tasks:those with actual blood exposure (Category I), those with no blood exposure(Category III), and Category II tasks which, by themselves, entail no bloodexposure, though the individual assigned to the task may be called uponto perform an unplanned Category I task. For example, a nurse completingmedical records in an emergency room would be expected to immediately assistin the care of a bleeding accident victim who arrives in the emergencyroom. Therefore, while the paperwork task has no inherent blood exposure,the patient's arrival requires the nurse to perform a Category I task.In addition to categorizing tasks, the JAN calls for development of StandardOperating Procedures (SOPs) for each Category I and II task. These SOPsinclude mandatory work practices and protective equipment for each task.In the proposed standard, the employer is responsible only for identifyingthe tasks equivalent to Category I tasks, and is not required to developSOPs for all tasks equivalent to Categories I and II. Nevertheless, whileSOPs are not required by the proposed standard, some employers may findtheir development beneficial both for use in training employees in performingroutine tasks and procedures in a manner that minimizes or eliminates occupationalexposure and as a reference for unusual or infrequently conducted tasks.The second part of the exposure determination is the identification andthe documentation of the positions whose duties include the tasks identifiedabove. This is necessary in order to assure that the employees who holdthese positions are included in the training programs, are provided withpersonal protective equipment, and where appropriate, are provided withpost-exposure follow-up and are included in the HBV vaccination program.Paragraph (c)(1)(iii) requires the exposure determination be made withouttaking into consideration the use of personal protective clothing or equipment.In other words, a task or procedure that would result in occupational exposureif the employee were not wearing personal protective equipment, must beidentified and documented by the employer for paragraph (c)(1)(i). Thereason for this is that several conditions must be met for personal protectiveequipment to effectively lessen exposures. First, the employee must betrained to use the equipment properly. Second, the personal protectiveequipment must be used each time the task is performed. Third, the equipmentmust be appropriate for the task. Fourth, it must be free of physical flawsthat could compromise safety. If even one of these conditions is not fullymet, protection cannot be assured. For example, if blood covered glovesare not removed correctly, the hands may become contaminated. If utilitygloves are torn or cracked, they will not provide protection. Therefore,these tasks need to be included in the exposure determination so that theworkers who perform them will receive training, HBV vaccination, and otherprovisions that will enhance their safety. The exposure determination mustbe completed within 90 days of the effective date of the standard [seeparagraph (i)(2)]. The Infection Control Plan that would be required by paragraph (c)(2) isa key provision of the proposed standard. It must contain the exposuredetermination discussed above. In addition, it must state when and howthe employer will implement the other provisions of the standard in a mannerappropriate to the circumstances in the employer's workplace. An annotatedcopy of the final standard would be sufficient to meet this requirement.The requirement is in performance language, so that each employer can structurethe plan to cover the circumstances in the employer's workplace. The timeframe for completion of the Infection Control Plan would be within 120days of the effective date of the final standard as required by paragraph(i)(3). OSHA believes this deadline would permit all employees to receivethe benefits of the Infection Control Plan while still allowing employerssuffficient time to put their plans in place.The Exposure Determination must be written. Because infection control mustbe practiced by everyone_employee and employer_it is imperative that employeesbe able to find out what provisions are in place in his or her workplace[see paragraph (g)(2)(iv)(D)]. That the program be in writing is also importantfor enforcement. By reviewing the plan, the OSHA Compliance Officer willbe able to become familiar with the employer's determination of the tasksand procedures that place employees at risk of occupational exposure, theemployees who perform the tasks, and the implementation and revisions tothe Infection Control Plan. The Infection Control Plan would have to be reviewed and updated to reflectsignificant changes in tasks or procedures. The purpose of this proposedrequirement would be to assure that all new tasks and procedures are evaluatedin order to determine whether they will result in occupational exposure.The employer would also have to amend the Infection Control Plan when thereare significant changes in tasks or procedures. For example, if a medicalcenter plans to open an HIV research laboratory where none existed before,then the Infection Control Plan would have to be amended to include theprovisions specified by paragraph (e).Paragraph (d) Methods of Compliance It is generally acknowledged that protection of the employee is most effectivelyattained by elimination or minimization of the hazard at its source, whichengineering controls and work practices are both designed to do. Industrialhygiene doctrine also teaches that control methods which depend upon thevagaries of human behavior are inherently less reliable than well-maintainedmechanical methods. For these reasons, OSHA has preferred engineering andwork practice controls and required they be used where feasible. Nevertheless,OSHA recognizes that in some situations neither of these control methodsis feasible and in these circumstances employee protection must be achievedthrough the use of personal protective equipment. In other situations,personal protective equipment may have to be utilized in conjunction withengineering controls and/or work practices to obtain a further reductionin employee exposure. The need to implement and comply with infection control procedures is recognizedby nearly all the commenters to the ANPR and is illustrated by the epidemiologicstudies on HIV. The CDC has concluded that case reports of healthcare workerswho seroconverted to HIV following parenteral, mucous membrane or non-intactskin exposure to blood or concentrated virus provide strong evidence forthe transmission of HIV from patients to health care workers and that infectioncontrol practices, emphasizing universal precautions, need to be implementedand strictly followed (Ex. 6-365). Marcus and coworkers (Ex. 6-372) andMcCray and co-workers (Ex. 4-39) concluded that approximately 37-40% ofthe exposures in their study cohort would probably not have occurred ifthe workers had followed recommended infection control procedures. Kleinand co-workers (Ex. 6-366) concluded that to minimize the risk of contractingHIV, dental professionals must adhere to recommended infection controlprocedures. Weiss and co-workers (Ex. 6-187) recommended that laboratoriesworking with HIV and related agents promote continuing educational programsfor all employees regarding precautions necessary for working in a laboratory.They concluded that employees must be proficient in and strictly adhereto the recommended infection control procedures and that employee proficiencyand compliance with these precautions should be periodically monitored.Gerberding and coworkers (Ex. 6-375) (Ex. 6-353) concluded that although``special infection-control precautions for HIV-infected patients are notrequired to prevent occupational transmission of HIV * * * it would seemprudent to implement and enforce standard infection-control guidelinesdesigned to reduce exposure to body fluids from all patients, regardlessof the probability of HIV infection, to prevent nosocomial transmissionof blood-borne pathogens.'' Henderson and coworkers (Ex. 6-377) (Ex. 6-352)concluded the risk of occupationally acquiring HIV is very small. Kuhland coworkers (Ex. 6-355) concluded that with the practice of recommendedhospital infection control procedures the risk of healthcare workers occupationallycontracting HIV infection appears low. Ramsey and coworkers (Ex. 6-373)(See CASE REPORTS, CASE 16) concluded that ``almost half of the exposures(41%) were a result of non-compliance with recommended precautions * ** results confirm that needlestick injuries place health-care workers atrisk of acquiring HIV-1 infections.'' One of the most important methods of compliance is the implementation of``universal precautions'' as recommended by CDC. ``Universal precautions''requires the employer and employee to assume that all blood, and otherpotentially infectious materials are, indeed, infectious and must be handledaccordingly. The Centers for Disease Control (CDC) bases the rationaleof universal precautions on the following:<ITAG tagnum="21">Since medical history and examination cannot reliably identify allpatients with HIV or other blood-borne pathogens, blood and body fluidprecautions should be consistently used for all patients. This approach,previously recommended by CDC, and referred to as ``universal blood andbody-fluid precautions'' or ``universal precautions'' should be used inthe care of all patients, especially including those in emergency-caresettings in which the risk of blood exposure is increased and the infectionstatus of the patient is usually unknown. (Ex. 6-153)</ITAG>This approach is advocated by the majority of the ANPR commenters includingthe American Hospital Association (Ex. 11-233), the American Dental Association(Ex. 11-43), and the National Committee for Clinical Laboratory Standards(Ex. 11-159). OSHA agrees that universal precautions is necessary to preventworkers from contacting blood or other materials that may be infectious.As previously stated, universal precautions is a concept of infection controlwhich, in addition to treating blood and other potentially infectious materialsas being infectious, encompasses a variety of associated practices otherthan medical procedures as such, to prevent occupational exposure suchas use of personal protective equipment, disposal of sharps in sharps containers,housekeeping, and so forth. Throughout the Methods of Compliance section,OSHA has taken care to specifically provide flexibility. See, for example,the sections on handwashing (d)(2)(ii), disposable gloves (d)(3)(v)(A),and decontamination (d)(4)(ii)(A). In addition, paragraph (d)(1) of the proposed standard states: ``Universalprecautions shall be observed to prevent contact with blood and other potentiallyinfectious materials, unless those precautions would interfere with theproper delivery of healthcare or public safety services, in a particularcircumstance, or would create a significant risk to the personal safetyof the worker.'' Since flexibility in following the other practices requiredunder universal precautions is specifically addressed elsewhere in paragraph(d), OSHA expects that the exemption to observing universal precautionsstated in the latter portion of paragraph (d)(1), will serve as an exemptionto the use of personal protective equipment in appropriate cases and isnot intended to provide an excuse for complete non-adherence to the overallconcept of universal precautions. The Agency recognizes that on occasion particular circumstances arise inwhich the use of personal protective equipment may interfere with the properdelivery of health care or public safety services or create a significantrisk to the personal safety of the worker. These ``particular circumstances''shall be taken to mean extraordinary situations which are unexpected andthreaten the life or safety of the patient or worker.The following examples illustrate several scenarios to which, OSHA believes,the exemption may apply. (1) A surgeon's glove tears in the midst of critical surgery; (2) A sudden change in patient status such as when an apparently stablepatient unexpectedly begins to hemorrhage profusely, putting the patient'slife in immediate jeopardy; (3) A firefighter rescues an individual who is not breathing from a burningbuilding and discovers that his/her resuscitation equipment is lost/damagedand he/she must administer CPR; and (4) A suspect who is bleeding unexpectedly attacks an officer with a knifethreatening the safety of the officer and/or co-workers. The first three scenarios are examples of situations which may be immediatelylife-threatening to the patient while the latter illustrates circumstancesin which the personal safety of the worker could be placed at significantrisk. In evaluating each of the above situations it may be judged thatthe time required to don personal protective equipment is critical to savingthe patient's life or preventing significant risk to the worker's personalsafety. However, use of the exemption is meant to be limited in extentand time. The employee who takes advantage of this exemption in a particularcircumstance must continue to take steps to reduce his or her risk. Thosepractices associated with universal precautions which can be used are tobe implemented whenever possible. Moreover, as soon as the situation changesas, for example, when a properly-protected co-worker is available to relievethe employee, the criticality of the patient's condition decreases, orthe violent patient/prisoner is subdued, the employee is expected to implementuse of full universal precautions. It is the intent of the Agency that the decision not to utilize personalprotective equipment in these types of situations rests with the employee,<T3>not</T3> the employer. Employees must exercise their professional judgmentin making such a decision and should be aware that they may be asked toexplain the reasons for their course of action. For example, OSHA believesthat disregarding use of personal protective equipment because there isconcern that the appropriate personal protective equipment may be alarmingto the patient or because the patient population is perceived to be ``lowrisk'' are not legitimate reasons. Also, a concern that employees may notbe able to properly perform their jobs because, for instance, gloves dulltheir sense of feeling or goggles become fogged is not considered a legitimatereason to use this exemption for routine procedures. These issues are dealtwith elsewhere in this preamble. While ``interfere with'' may be construed to encompass a broad range ofintrusions into one's task performance, OSHA intends for this term to beinterpreted in the strictest sense, that is, the prevention of proper deliveryof healthcare or public safety services. Therefore, the Agency does notfeel that concerns about appearance, perceived low-risk, or personal perceptionof ``interference'' are acceptable reasons for not using personal protectiveequipment. Some employees may express the concern that gloves, because they do notfit properly, increase their risk of injury. Since the proposed standardrequires that personal protective equipment be provided in ``appropriatesizes,'' the employer would be obligated, under paragraph (d)(3)(ii), toprovide gloves and other equipment that fit. Therefore, a general concernthat the use of gloves, for instance, increases risk to the personal safetyof the worker cannot be a basis for an exemption. It should also be understood that the decision not to use personal protectiveequipment is to be made by the employee on a case-by-case basis. Also,no work area with the potential for occupational exposure would be exemptfrom following universal precautions and its associated practices. Therefore,the employer must assure that proper personal protective equipment is readilyaccessible to employees at all times. In summary, employees may on occasion find themselves in extraordinarycircumstances in which, based upon their professional judgment, they feelthat utilizing personal protective equipment will prevent proper deliveryof healthcare or public safety services or will create a significant riskto their personal safety. The decision not to use personal protective equipmentis to be made by the employee on a case-by-case basis and must be promptedby legitimate and truly extenuating circumstances. In such cases, the employeemay temporarily abandon use of personal protective equipment. However,this does not mean that the circumstances surrounding such a decision shouldnot be scrutinized, and it does not relieve the employer of the responsiblityto assure that personal protective equipment is readily accessible at alltimes. The employer shall not discourage adherance to universal precautionsor the appropriate use of personal protective equipment. OSHA seeks comment on whether the exemption from using universal precautionsis appropriate, and, if so, is it clearly stated? Are there situationswhich require employees to suspend universal precautions as a whole orare the situations that require professional judgment limited to timeswhen personal protective equipment cannot be used? Should the exemptionbe available to all employees or only those in certain professions? Wouldit be more appropriate to state the exemption under paragraph (d)(3)(i)``Provision and Use'' of personal protective equipment? For example, wouldthe limitations of this exemption be made more clear with the followinglanguage:(3) Personal Protective Equipment (i) Provision * * *(ii) Use. The employer shall assure that the employee uses appropriatepersonal protective equipment unless doing so in a specific instance would,in the professional judgment of the employee, prevent the proper deliveryof healthcare or public safety services or pose a greater hazard to thesafety of the employee or co-workers. OSHA believes employees can be fully protected only when the language ofthe exemption is strictly interpreted to limit the instances in which itapplies. Do some of the terms (e.g. ``interfere with,'' ``proper delivery,''``significant risk'') lack precision and clarity? If so, how could theAgency better delineate the particular circumstances? Would substitutionof ``prevent'' for ``interfere with'' or ``greater hazard'' for ``significantrisk'' be more easily understood? Is there a generally accepted definitionfor ``proper'' delivery of healthcare or public safety services? OSHA seekscomment on whether an exemption is needed, to what situations it shouldapply, and how it can best be drafted to afford employees the flexibilitywhich may be necessary while assuring adequate protection against occupationalexposures. Engineering and Work Practice Controls. Engineering controls serve to reduceemployee exposure in the workplace by either removing the hazard or isolatingthe worker from exposure. These controls encompass process or equipmentredesign (e.g. self-sheathing needles), process or equipment enclosure(e.g. biosafety cabinets), and employee isolation. In general, engineeringcontrols act on the source of the hazard and eliminate or reduce employeeexposure without reliance on the employee to take self-protective action.Once implemented, engineering controls protect the employee permanently,subject only, in some cases, to periodic replacement or preventive maintenance.Examples of engineering controls that would protect employees from exposureto bloodborne pathogens include sharps disposal containers, biosafety cabinets,and splashguards, such as might be placed over the segmenting unit of aHematron to prevent blood spattering into the operator's face. Relativeto this, section (d)(2)(i) of the proposed standard requires that engineeringcontrols be examined and maintained or replaced on a regular schedule toensure their effectiveness. Regularly scheduled inspections are requiredto confirm that engineering controls such as protective shields have notbeen removed or broken; that ventilation systems such as those in biosafetycabinets are operating properly; that filters, sharps disposal containers,and so forth are being replaced on a sufficiently frequent interval; andthat any other physical, mechanical, or replacement-dependent controlsare functioning as intended. In comparison, work practice controls reduce the likelihood of exposurethrough alteration of the manner in which a task is performed. While workpractice controls also act on the source of the hazard, the protectionthey provide is based upon employer and employee behavior rather than installationof a physical device such as a protective shield. In many instances thesetwo control methodologies work in tandem as it is often necessary to employwork practice controls to assure effective operation of engineering controls.For example, a sharps disposal container provides no protection if an employeepersists in recapping needles by hand and disposing of them in the wastebasket. Proper work practices and engineering controls must both be utilizedto ensure safe, acceptable sharps disposal. In developing the methods of compliance section for this proposal, OSHArecognized the uniqueness of many of the work environments which have thepotential for producing occupational exposures. Since the source of thehazard is frequently a living person or tissue, typical industrial methodsof reducing or eliminating the hazard at the source are often not feasible.For example, in an industrial operation a process may be entirely enclosedand operated/monitored by an employee at a remote location. Clearly, thisis not possible in patient-care settings, in circumstances of violencein correctional institutions, and so forth. The Agency believes, therefore,that prevention of exposures to blood or other potentially infectious materialscan require use of a combination of control methods to achieve adequateprotection of employees. Returning to the previous example of using a Hematron (a device for segmentingblood-containing tubing in plasmaphoresis centers, blood collection sites,etc.), methods of exposure control could include a plexiglass shield overthe segmenting/sealing unit to prevent blood spattering into the operator'sface_an engineering control; positioning of the employee's face over theshield during operation_a work practice; and use of personal protectiveequipment such as gloves, a lab coat, and/or other personal protectiveequipment depending on where blood could spatter onto the employee. Inthe above example, engineering controls, work practice controls, and personalprotective equipment were necessary to provide proper protection. Eachcontrol method plays a part in reducing and/or protecting against exposure;however, none of them taken singly can be said to eliminate or significantlylessen the need for other methods of control. When dealing with primary hazard sources that are often living persons,transplant tissues, and so forth, use of engineering controls may not alwaysbe feasible. However, OSHA would like to know about situations where engineeringcontrols alone or in combination with work practices will sufficientlyprotect workers so that personal protective equipment would not be necessary.OSHA recognizes that the conditions of exposure to bloodborne pathogensare substantially different from those of exposure to other hazards whichOSHA regulates. Considering the primary hazard sources involved in thisproposal, it is OSHA's belief that combinations of controls (varying greatlyby task) are best used to prevent exposure incidents. OSHA seeks commenton how the Agency can best assure employers institute the appropriate combinationsof controls.In paragraph (d)(2)(ii) OSHA proposes to require employers to assure thatemployees wash their hands immediately or as soon as possible followingactivities that may result in exposure. OSHA has recognized that a majorprecept of infection control is thorough handwashing. A number of commenterssupported the requirement that hands be washed immediately or as soon aspossible 1) after removal of gloves or protective clothing (Exs. 6-153,11-71, 11-159, 11-233(d), 11-280), and 2) after hand contact with bloodor other potentially infectious materials (Exs. 6-153, 6-316, 11-71, 11-111,11-159, 11-233(d)). This frequency of handwashing should minimize the amountof time that blood is in contact with the skin of the hands and potentialroutes of exposure including areas of dermatitis or microcuts in the skin.Several commentors suggested that hands be washed upon leaving the workarea. While this requirement has not been included in the proposal, OSHAseeks comment as to whether there are instances in which an employee wouldnot be wearing gloves in a work area presenting the potential for handcontamination. Will requiring washing of hands upon leaving the work areaserve to reduce contaminant migration and/or better protect employees?Should it be a stated requirement? With regard to managing and further limiting the possible spread of contamination,OSHA proposes to require that all personal protective equipment be removedimmediately upon leaving the work area or as soon as possible if overtlycontaminated (Exs. 6-153, 6-338, 11-159, 11-280). The former requirementwill prevent migration of contamination beyond the work area to such placesas lunchrooms and offices. The latter will limit contact contaminationwithin the work environment and reduce the possibility for contaminantsoak-through which would result in contamination of the employee's underlyinggarments and/or skin. Placement of the contaminated equipment in an appropriately designatedarea or container for storage, washing, decontamination, or disposal willhelp ensure that the potentially contaminated clothing and equipment willonly be handled by employees who have been properly trained in the safehandling of this material. One of the greatest hazards to workers is from needles and other sharpobjects contaminated with blood or other potentially infectious materials.Of the 25 Case Reports presented in the HIV Health Effects section of thisproposal, 15 of the seroconversions are associated with needlestick injuries(Cases 1,2,6,7,9-16,19,22,23). In addition, as stated previously in thehepatitis B Health Effects section, the chance of becoming infected aftera single needlestick from a hepatitis B source patient ranges from 7% to30%. Therefore, handling of needles and sharps must be minimized. The AHAaffirmed this hazard in their statement:<ITAG tagnum="21">As with other blood-borne diseases, the potential for transmissionis greatest when needles and other sharp instruments are used in patientcare (Ex. 6-75)</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In view of this, the AHA and a number of other commenters recommendthat needles and other sharps not be sheared, bent, broken, recapped orresheathed by hand and that needles not be removed from disposable syringes(Exs. 11-71, 11-159, 11-233(d), 11-280). OSHA agrees and is proposing torequire that these restrictions be followed when sharps are handled. While there is no documented evidence showing transmission of HIV by environmentalsurfaces, there is evidence that surface contamination is a mode of HBVtransmission. Therefore, the Agency feels that the following paragraphs,(d)(2)(v) and (d)(2)(vi), are necessary provisions of the proposed standard.In paragraph (d)(2)(v), OSHA proposes to prohibit eating, drinking, smoking,applying cosmetics or lip balm, and handling contact lenses in work areaswhere there is the potential for occupational exposure (Exs. 6-75, 11-159,11-280). This requirement is consistent with other OSHA standards [Cokeoven emissions 29 CFR 1910.1029 (i)(5)(i); Acrylonitrile 29 CFR 1910.1045(f)(4); Asbestos 51 FR 22612] and is simply good industrial hygiene practice.While the first four stipulations have been set by OSHA in previous standards,the last, which refers to prohibiting the handling of contact lenses wassupported by the American Red Cross's comment (Ex. 11-280). OSHA believesthat bloodborne pathogens could be introduced onto the lens through handlingin the work area and the contaminated lens would then be placed and heldin intimate contact with both the eye's surface and the mucous membranesof the eye. Since bloodborne pathogens can infect through mucosal contact(i.e. the eye), it is felt that prohibition of lens handling is a prudentpractice. The rationale for prohibiting these activities is consistentwith the following statement from <T3>Laboratory Safety: Principles and Practices:</T3><ITAG tagnum="21">Hepatitis transmission, especially type B hepatitis, can occur byindirect means via common environmental surfaces in a laboratory, suchas test tubes, laboratory benches, laboratory accessories, and other surfacescontaminated with infective blood, serum, secretions, or excretions whichcan be transferred to the skin or mucous membranes. The probability ofdisease transmission with a single exposure of this type may be remote,but the frequency of such exposures makes this mechanism of transmissionpotentially an efficient one over a long period of time. Activities inlaboratories such as nail biting, smoking, eating, and a variety of hand-to-nose,-mouth, and -eye actions contribute to indirect transmission. (Ex. 6-344).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">CDC/NIH also recommend that these activities be prohibited for all4 Biosafety Levels in their guidelines <T3>Biosafety in Microbiological and Biomedical Laboratories</T3> (Ex.6-338). Consistent with the above, OSHA proposes in paragraph (d)(2)(vi) to prohibitthe storage of food and drink in refrigerators, freezers, or cabinets whereblood or other potentially infectious materials are stored or in otherareas, such as laboratories, where these foodstuffs may become contaminated.While contamination of the mucous membranes of the mouth is of concern,one must also consider that food and beverage containers may also becomecontaminated, resulting in unsuspected contamination of the hands.In addition to being recommended by CDC/NIH laboratory guidelines (Ex.6-338) and by commenters such as the National Committee for Clinical LaboratoryStandards (Ex. 11-159) and the American Red Cross (Ex. 11-280), this requirementis also consistent with the following statement from <T3>Laboratory Safety: Principles and Practice:</T3><ITAG tagnum="21">Because blood tubes can be contaminated on the outside as well ascontain infective blood, they must be handled and stored with care. Ifblood tubes must be refrigerated, they should be capped and placed in adesignated refrigerator or in a designated portion of a refrigerator. Bloodtubes should never be kept in a refrigerator that contains food or beverages.(Ex. 6-344)</ITAG>In paragraph (d)(2)(vii), OSHA proposes to require that all proceduresinvolving blood or other potentially infectious materials be performedin such a manner as to minimize splashing, spraying, and aerosolizationof these substances. This requirement will decrease the chances of directexposure of employees to these substances through means such as sprayinginto the eyes or splashing onto the face or arms, while also reducing generalwork area contamination of benchtops, instruments, and so forth causedby errant splashes, sprays, or aerosols (Exs. 6-75, 6-338, 11-159, 11-280).The American Hospital Association in their recommended precautions forclinical laboratories wrote that:<ITAG tagnum="21">Procedures that have a high potential for creating aerosols or infectiousdroplets, including centrifugation, blending, sonicating, vigorous mixing,and harvesting infected tissue from animals or embryonated eggs, shouldbe carried out in biological safety cabinets (class II). (Ex. 6-75)</ITAG>Minor spattering may be controlled in other ways. For example, the NationalCommittee for Clinical Laboratory Standards states:<ITAG tagnum="21">Removing rubber stoppers from specimen tubes frequently causes minorspattering of blood or serum. This may be minimized by covering the tubewith gauze pad while removing stopper. (Ex. 11-159)</ITAG>It is the responsibility of the employer to evaluate such tasks and institutethe measures necessary to minimize splashing, spraying, and productionof aerosols. In paragraph (d)(2)(viii), OSHA proposes to adopt the good laboratory andinfection control practice of prohibiting pipetting or suctioning by mouth.The use of cotton plugs or other barriers does little to reduce the hazardsof mouth pipetting. Even a technician who is skilled in mouth pipettingmay inadvertently suck blood or other potentially infectious materialsinto the mouth which could result in bloodborne pathogens coming in contactwith the mucous membranes of the mouth as well as any blisters, cuts, abrasionsor other lesions in the mouth or on the lips. Personal Protective Equipment. OSHA's proposed requirements for personalprotective equipment, paragraph (d)(3), have been set to assure adequateprotection based upon the type of exposure expected during task performance.In their response to the ANPR, the National Institute for OccupationalSafety and Health (NIOSH) stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">The purpose of personal protective clothing and equipment is to preventor minimize the entry of materials into the worker's body. This includesentry via apparent or inapparent skin lesions or entry through the membranesof the eye, nose or mouth * * * Appropriate protective clothing and equipmentshould * * * be selected based on the specific work and exposure conditionsthat will be encountered and the anticipated level of risk. (Ex. 11-187)</ITAG>This approach to the selection of protective barriers is echoed by CDCin the statement in their June 1988 guidelines:<ITAG tagnum="21">The type of protective barrier(s) should be appropriate for the procedurebeing performed and the type of exposure anticipated. (Ex. 6-316) </ITAG>The proposed standard requires the employer to provide personal protectiveequipment to employees who have the potential for occupational exposure.Examples of such personal protective equipment are gloves, gowns, fluid-proofaprons, laboratory coats, head and foot coverings, face shields, eye protection,masks, and respiratory ventilation devices such as mouthpieces, pocketmasks, or resuscitation bags. While the reasons for providing protective clothing such as gowns, gloves,and faceshields should be obvious, some question may arise as to the necessityof emergency ventilation devices. OSHA bases this requirement on the possibilityof employee exposure to blood or other potentially infectious materialsin the mouth or in fluids that may be expelled by the patient during resuscitation.As little as one cubic centimeter (cc) of HBsAg positive blood can containone hundred million infectious doses of hepatitis B virus (see HepatitisB Health Effects section). In their August 1987 guidelines, the CDC states:<ITAG tagnum="21">Although saliva has not been implicated in HIV transmission, to minimizethe need for emergency mouth-to-mouth resuscitation, mouthpieces, resuscitationbags, or other ventilation devices should be available for use in areasin which the need for resuscitation is predictable. (Ex. 6-153)</ITAG>The American Federation of State, County, and Municipal Employees (AFSCME)expressed a similar, but more detailed justification in their comments:<ITAG tagnum="21">Resuscitation devices should be included with other types of requiredpersonal protective equipment. Although there is no evidence of transmissionof bloodborne pathogens from administering Cardiopulumonary Resuscitation,such transmission remains a theoretical possibility and other pathogenscan definitely be transmitted in this way. CDC also recommends the useof such devices in its August 1987 document. Resuscitation devices arevery inexpensive, some models well under $10.00. Affected employees shouldbe trained in the use of such equipment and the equipment needs to be strategicallystationed in order to facilitate its use. Prisons, mental health facilities,and public safety occupations are obvious candidates for such equipment.Anywhere a large group of people are housed, or where there is likelihoodthat emergency assistance may have to be rendered should have resuscitationdevices on hand. (Ex. 11-157)</ITAG>OSHA agrees with CDC and AFSCME on the need to minimize mouth-to-mouthresuscitation, and believes the most effective way to do so is to requireventilation devices be provided for resuscitation. In addition, the employer shall assure that appropriate personal protectiveequipment in the appropriate sizes is readily accessible at the worksiteor issued to employees who may be exposed to blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials during performance of their work duties. Resuscitationbags, pocket masks, mouthpieces, and other ventilation devices must bereadily assessible to employees who can reasonably be expected to resuscitatea patient (Exs. 6-153, 11-71, 11-111, 11-157, 11-159, 11-233(d)). Thesedevices are to be readily accessible for use at sites where the need foremergency resuscitation is likely or issued to employees for use at mobilenon-fixed worksites as required by paragraph (d)(3)(ii). It is of greatimportance that personal protective equipment is easily accessible andof proper size. The consistent use of such items hinges, in part, uponthe employee's motivation and acceptance. If access to the equipment isdifficult, its use may be perceived as too time consuming and burdensome.Proper fit of personal protective equipment also plays a major role inits utilization by employees. If it is too large or small it may be uncomfortableor could interfere with proper task performance, resulting in frustrationand non-use. Proper employee protection rests upon utilization of thisequipment, therefore provision of proper sizes and accessibility must bemaintained to ensure and promote their use. The Agency is aware that use of gloves as a protective barrier is a majorpart of this proposal's methods of preventing occupational exposure. Inaddition, it is known that some employees may exhibit an allergic dermalreaction to the gloves normally provided to workers or the powder theycontain. To prevent exacerbation of such allergic dermatitis and therebypermit these individuals to continue working, the proposed standard requiresthat employers make hypoallergenic gloves readily accessible to those employeeswho are allergic to the gloves normally provided. The employer's responsibility to assure accessible personal protectiveequipment for employees at non-fixed worksites, such as emergency medicaltechnicians, cannot be over emphasized. Adequate planning and reinventoryshould assure that the necessary equipment is present on the response vehiclein a portable ``kit'' or on the employee's person. The proposed standard also requires that the employer shall provide forthe cleaning, laundering, or disposal of personal protective equipmentrequired by paragraphs (d) and (e). This is to insure that these itemsremain within the control of the employer and, therefore, will be properlydisposed of, cleaned, or laundered consistent with that employer's infectioncontrol program. This will prevent contamination outside of the work area(e.g. non-work areas such as the employee's home) and insures that onlythose personnel trained in proper work practices will handle potentiallycontaminated equipment during cleaning or disposal. In paragraph (d)(3)(iv), the proposed standard requires that the employerrepair or replace personal protective equipment required by this standardas needed to maintain their effectiveness. The requirement to repair orreplace the protective equipment is needed to insure proper functioningof these items and, thereby, proper employee protection. Moreover, requiringthat the employer be responsible for this activity provides further insurancethat the items will remain under the control of the employer who will makethis a part of his or her infection control program. OSHA proposes to require that the employer assure that the employee weargloves whenever the employee has the potential for direct skin contact(of the hand) with blood or other potentially infectious materials, mucousmembranes or non-intact skin of patients, and when handling items or surfacessoiled with blood or other potentially infectious materials. Glove usein these situations is advocated in whole or in part by a number of commentersand sources including the American Hospital Association (Exs. 6-75, 11-233(d)),the American Dental Association (Ex. 11-43), the National Committee onClinical Laboratory Standards (Ex. 11-159), the American Red Cross (Ex.11-280), and the American Blood Resources Association (Ex. 11-71).Examples of tasks which require the use of gloves include dentistry, surgery,phlebotomy, laboratory analysis of blood or body fluids, clean-up of bloodor body fluid spills, and rendering emergency medical assistance to individualswith traumatic injury. Along with the provisions for glove usage discussed above, certain workpractices are necessary concerning when gloves are to be replaced in orderto assure adequate protection for the employee and limit contamination,[paragraphs (d)(3)(v) (A) and (B)]. Disposable gloves must be changed assoon as possible when they are visibly soiled to reduce inadvertent contaminationof items throughout the work area such a door knobs, telephones, computerkeyboards, and so forth (Ex.6-344). Since the glove acts as the primaryphysical barrier between potentially infectious materials and the employee'sskin, any tear, puncture, or similar defect compromises the integrity ofthis barrier, dictating replacement to insure maintenance of protection(Exs. 6-153, 11-71, 11-280). Disposable gloves, often called surgical or examination gloves, shall notbe washed or disinfected for re-use. The CDC in its June 24, 1988, <T3>Update: Universal Precautions for Prevention of Transmission of HumanImmunodeficiency Virus, Hepatitis B Virus, and Other Bloodborne Pathogensin Health-Care Settings</T3> (Ex. 6-316) states that disinfecting agentsmay cause deterioration of the glove material while washing with surfactantscould result in ``wicking'' or enhanced penetration of liquids into theglove via undetected holes, thereby transporting potentially infectiousmaterials into contact with the hand. Utility gloves, often called ``rubber''gloves, such as those which may be used for housekeeping chores are ofmore substantial construction than surgical or examination gloves. OSHAagrees with CDC's recommendation permitting decontamination and reuse ofutility gloves but requires that they be discarded if they are cracked,peeling, discolored, torn, punctured, or exhibit other signs of deterioration.(Ex. 6-316) Paragraph (d)(3)(vi) of the proposed standard states that masks and eyeprotection or chin-length face shields shall be worn whenever splashes,spray, spatter, or droplets of blood or other potentially infectious materials(e.g. bone chips) may be generated and there is a potential for mucousmembrance (eye, nose, mouth) contamination. If protective eyewear is chosenover use of a faceshield, the eyewear must be worn in conjunction witha face mask since the aim of this requirement is to provide protectionfor the eyes, nose, and mouth. A number of commenters expressed supportfor this requirement (Exs. 6-153, 10, 11-43, 11-71, 11-111, 11-159, 11-233(d),11-280). For example, the American Hospital Association stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">The use of protective eyewear, such as goggles in connection withmasks, is recommended in situations in which splatter with blood, bodysecretions, or body fluids is possible. This is particularly recommendedin the performance of procedures such as endotracheal intubation, bronchoscopy,or GI endoscopy. Precautions during other procedures should be judged onan individual basis. (Ex. 6-75)</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Mucous membrane and skin exposures are recognized routes of transmissionof HBV (see the Hepatitis B Health Effects section) and HIV. In fact, theCDC (Ex. 6-109) has documented a phlebotomist's HIV seroconversion afterblood spattered on her face and in her mouth when the top flew off of a10 ml vaccuum tube of blood. The individual lacked other identified riskfactors and the case is considered the result of occupational exposure.Although she had no open wounds, facial acne was present. While it is uncertainif mouth or skin exposure was the direct route of transmission, facialprotection would have eliminated the hazard of infection via mucous membraneexposure. In paragraph (d)(3)(vii), OSHA proposes to require that appropriate protectiveclothing be worn when the employee has a potential for occupational exposure.The type of clothing (e.g., lab coat, gown, apron) and its associated characteristics(e.g., fluid-resistance) will depend upon the task being performed andthe degree of exposure anticipated (e.g., soiling, splashing, soaking).In this provision, the proposed standard gives the employer flexibilityin complying. Rather than requiring complete barrier protection in allsituations, the proposed standard allows the employer to evaluate the taskand the exposure expected to be associated with its performance and, basedupon this determination, select protective clothing and equipment appropriateto the task. In order to fulfill the requirement of ``appropriate'' forthis standard, the clothing selected shall form an effective barrier underthe anticipated conditions of exposure. In their comment to the ANPR, Kimberly-ClarkCorporation submitted results of their research and development effortsin the area of blood strike-through potential of various types of protectiveclothing materials (Ex. 11-353). Kimberly-Clark emphasized the importanceof design, breathability, and fluid resistance of the garments. The Agencyseeks comment on whether the performance oriented approach will provideadequate protection to employees or whether OSHA should specify characteristicsof construction or fabric for particular tasks. In paragraph (d)(3)(vii)(A), OSHA proposes to require gowns, labcoats,aprons, or similar clothing shall be worn if there is a potential for soilingof clothes with blood or other potentially infectious materials (Exs. 4-25,6-75, 6-338, 11-71, 11-159). These items are commonly made of tightly wovenor fused materials that will prevent the employee's underlying clothingfrom becoming contaminated. The contaminated overgarment can be easilyremoved at the end of the work shift or when access to a non-work areais required and will remain within the work area for cleaning, laundering,or disposal. If splashing or spraying of blood or other potentially infectious liquidsis possible, the proposed standard requires the employee to wear clothingsuch as gowns, aprons, or coveralls that is fluid-resistant (Exs. 4-25,6-153, 11-111, 11-159, 11-233(d)). Since a larger volume of blood and otherpotentially infectious materials (and consequently a greater chance ofsoak-through and skin contact) accompanies these modes of exposure, a moreprotective type of barrier clothing is dictated. If extreme splashing orspattering is anticipated, surgical caps or hoods are required to preventpotentially infectious materials from reaching the scalp (Exs. 6-75, 11-159).In some situations, such as autopsies, there is a possibility of clothingbecoming soaked with blood or other potentially infectious materials. Whena potential for soaking is anticipated, the proposed standard requiresthat fluid-proof clothing such as gowns, aprons, sleeve covers, or coveralls,be worn (Exs. 6-153, 10, 11-159, 11-233(d), 11-280, 11-283). Fluid-proofshoe covers are required to be worn if there is a potential for shoes becomingcontaminated or soaked with blood or other potentially infectious materialsto prevent possible contact exposure of the foot. (Exs. 6-75, 11-159, 11-283).Shoe covers, like all personal protective equipment, must be removed priorto leaving the work area thereby limiting migration of contamination viashoes into other areas. Some employees may feel that personal protective equipment interferes withtheir ability to perform their routine duties. OSHA seeks comments on howthese concerns can be addressed without compromising the safety providedby barrier protection.In paragraph (d)(4)(i), OSHA proposes to require that employers assurethat the worksite is maintained in a clean and sanitary condition. Theterm ``worksite'' refers not only to permanent fixed facilities such ashospitals, dental/medical offices, clinics, and so forth but also coverstemporary non-fixed workplaces. Examples of such facilities include, butare not limited to, ambulances, bloodmobiles, temporary blood collectioncenters, and any other non-fixed worksites which have a reasonable possibilityof becoming contaminated with blood or other potentially infectious materials.OSHA recognizes that different types of surfaces and soiling exist throughouta facility and that the employer is in the best position to evaluate thecondition of his or her facility. Therefore, the standard requires thatthe employer determine and implement the appropriate written schedule ofcleaning and method of disinfection based upon the location within thefacility, type of surface to be cleaned, type of soil present, and tasksor procedures being performed (Exs. 11-283, 11-71, 6-153).The proposed standard also requires that employers ensure that all equipmentand environmental and working surfaces are properly cleaned and disinfectedafter contact with blood or other potentially infectious materials (Exs.11-159, 11-283).Though there exist a broad range of work environments and circumstanceswhere a work surface may become contaminated, OSHA has preliminarily concludedthat there are certain common circumstances where decontamination proceduresmust be implemented to maintain cleanliness and minimize migration of contaminants.Therefore, the proposed standard requires that work surfaces shall be decontaminatedwith an appropriate disinfectant 1) after completion of procedures (Exs.6-338, 11-159,); 2) when surfaces are overtly contaminated (Ex. 11-159);3) immediately after any spill of blood or potentially infectious materials(Exs. 6-153, 6-338) and; 4) at the end of the work day (Exs. 6-153, 6-312,11-159, 11-280). With reference to hepatitis B, these requirements aresupported by the following statement from <T3>Laboratorv Safety: Principles and Practices:</T3><ITAG tagnum="21">The primary mode of transmission is by direct contact with blood andserum specimens and environmental surfaces which are contaminated. Thepresence of blood or serum on hands, whether from direct or indirect sources,can result in the HBV gaining access to the vascular system subcutaneouslyby needle sticks or contamination of lesions or by nasal, oral, or ocularexposure (Ex. 6-344).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The above are minimum requirements and additional decontaminationmay be performed any time that it is deemed necessary.Paragraph (d)(4)(ii)(B) of the proposed standard allows equipment and environmentalsurfaces to be covered with protective coverings such as plastic wrap,aluminum foil, or imperviously-backed absorbent paper (Exs. 6-153, 6-338,9-7(c), 11-43, 11-159). Examples of such an instance would be coveringdental light handles with foil or a dental x-ray unit head with plasticfilm (Ex. 6-153). The standard requires that if these covers are used,they must be removed and replaced when they become overtly contaminatedand at the end of the work shift.The proposed standard also requires that equipment (e.g. blood gas analyzers,mechanical pipetters, suctioning devices, centrifuges, liquid chromatographs)which may become contaminated with blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials shall be checked routinely for contamination and decontaminatedas necessary. The NCCLS (Ex. 11-159) pointed out that automated analyzerswith sampling probes that move rapidly can generate a fine mist which canaccumulate on the equipment, necessitating periodic inspection and decontamination.In their comments, Waters Chromatography Division of Millipore Corporation(Ex. 11-3) and YSI Incorporated (Ex. 11-7), both of whom are involved withinstrument servicing, address the potential for exposure of repair personnel.In addition, several sources recommend the decontamination of instrumentsand equipment before being repaired in the laboratory or shipped to themanufacturer for servicing (Exs. 6-153, 11-71, 11-159). On the basis ofthese recommendations, OSHA has proposed to require that employers checkall equipment which may be contaminated with blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials prior to servicing or shipping and decontaminate asnecessary. OSHA anticipates that this requirement will minimize the possibilityof servicing and shipping personnel becoming exposed due to leakage ofpotentially infectious fluids from the equipment or contact with interior/exteriorcontamination.In some cases bins, pails, cans, and so forth, which are intended for re-usemay be utilized in a manner which presents the potential for their becomingcontaminated with blood or other potentially infectious materials. Forexample, a reuseable metal trash can may be lined with a disposable plasticinfectious waste bag. By virtue of a plastic bag's construction, the possibilityof leakage is inherent and the can could become contaminated. If the canis not cleaned and disinfected the contamination may be spread by leakageor spillage from the can or by fouling the outside of succeeding bags.Therefore, paragraph (d)(4)(ii)(D) of the standard requires that all bins,pails, cans, and similar receptacles intended for re-use and which havethe potential for becoming contaminated with blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials must be inspected, cleaned, and disinfected on a regularlyscheduled basis and cleaned and disinfected immediately or as soon as possibleupon visible contamination. This is consistent with OSHA's current standardregarding maintenance of waste disposal containers 29 CFR 1910.141 (a)(4)(i).The Case Studies portion of the preamble's HIV Health Effects section (Case8) describes the HIV seroconversion of an NIH worker as a result of viralinnoculation through a cut from a broken glass vial containing HIV-infectedblood. This provides an example of the relationship between infection andbreaks in the skin barrier caused by contaminated, broken glass. The Agencyconcludes that broken glass which may be contaminated with infectious bloodbornepathogens shall not be handled directly by employees. In the <T3>1988 Agent Summary Statement for Human Immunodeficiency Virus</T3>,the CDC states:<ITAG tagnum="21">In the laboratory, the skin (especially when scratches, cuts, abrasions,dermatitis, or other lesions are present) and mucous membranes of the eye,nose, mouth, and possibly the respiratory tract should be considered aspotential pathways for entry of virus. Needles, sharp instruments, brokenglass, and other sharp objects must be carefully handled and properly discarded.(Ex. 6-312).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Accordingly, this standard requires that broken glassware which maybe potentially contaminated shall not be cleaned up with the hands. Sincegloves do not provide adequate protection against cuts, OSHA proposes torequire that all clean-ups be accomplished using mechanical means. Variousmechanical means can be used. For example, the Red Cross states that clean-upmay be performed with a brush and dustpan or a vacuum cleaner (Ex. 11-280).Pieces in difficult to reach places, such as sinks, can be removed by usingtongs for large pieces and cotton swabs or forceps for chips and slivers.Several sources made a number of recommendations concerning the handlingof specimens (Exs. 6-75, 6-153, 11-71, 11-159, 11-233(d)). After reviewingthese recommendations in conjunction with the current OSHA regulationson labelling, this proposed standard requires that specimens of blood orother potentially infectious materials shall be placed in a closable, labeledor color-coded, leakproof container prior to being stored or transported.If outside contamination of the container is likely a second closable,labeled or color-coded, leakproof container shall be placed over the outsideof the first and closed to prevent leakage during handling, storage, andtransport. If puncture of the primary container is likely, it shall beplaced within a leakproof puncture-resistant secondary container. Theserequirements serve to warn the employee of the potential hazard and minimizeunintentional worker exposure and migration of contaminants. Reusable equipment, such as glassware and hand instruments, which may becontaminated are required to be decontaminated prior to washing and/orreprocessing. By ridding such items of contamination before they enterthe overall cycle of washing and reprocessing, the number of employeeswho must handle potentially contaminated items can be limited to thoseperforming the decontamination procedures. The Agency has defined infectious waste to be blood and blood products,pathological wastes, microbiological wastes, and contaminated sharps. Thisis identical to CDC's definition as stated in <T3>Recommendations for Prevention of HIV Transmission in Health-Care Settings</T3>(Ex. 6-153). Included under this definition are the wastes of ``other potentiallyinfectious materials'' as defined in paragraph (b) of this section. Thestandard requires that all such wastes destined for disposal shall be placedin closable, labeled or color-coded, leakproof containers or bags. If outsidecontamination of the container or bag is likely to occur then a secondleakproof container or bag which is closable and labeled or color-codedshall be placed over the outside of the first and closed to prevent leakageduring handling, storage, and transport. This requirement is supportedby several sources (Exs. 4-25, 6-35, 11-71, 11-159, 11-283).A leakproof container or bag is required to prevent leakage of the contentsinto the work area while closability is necessary to ensure that the wasteis contained in the event of the container or bag becoming tipped or upended.If outside contamination is anticipated, as would occur if potentiallyinfectious materials were spilled on the exterior of the bag as it is beingfilled, then a second bag placed over the first will contain the contamination.This prevents an employee's handling the contaminated exterior and limitsspread of contamination throughout the work area as the bag is handled,stored, and transported. The outside bag must also be labeled or color-codedto assure that a warning of biohazardous contents is readily observableto employees. The National Solid Wastes Management Association sums up the logic forproper containment of sharps and infectious waste in their statement:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * the essential elements to control the risk posed by this wastestream are to create a physical barrier around the waste until it has beentreated. This includes double-bagging for ``soft'' wastes and containmentin rigid containers for ``sharps'' (Ex. 11-60).</ITAG>It should be remembered that anything which compromises the physical barrier,such as torn bags resulting from rough handling or compaction or puncturescaused by pointed or sharp objects being placed in plastic waste bags,also compromises the benefit which would be gained by proper infectiouswaste handling and increases the chance of employee exposure and work areacontamination.The CDC recommends that facilities which produce the aformentioned wastes,such as hospitals, blood banks, and clinical or research laboratories,develop an infectious waste management plan which includes identification,collection, proper handling, transport, infectious waste pre-treatment,and disposal of the treated infectious waste (Ex. 6-395). While the proposedstandard puts forth minimum requirements for containing potentially infectiouswaste to protect employees against exposure, it is not the intent of theproposal to set rigid regulations regarding infectious waste handling anddisposal. OSHA is aware that additional requirements may apply to thiswaste under the jurisdiction of other governing bodies. Therefore, thestandard requires that disposal of all infectious waste shall be in accordancewith applicable Federal, state, and local regulations (Exs. 4-25, 11-71,11-187, 11-283). Needles and sharps have been documented as a prime mechanical agent ofemployee innoculation with both HIV and HBV. Therefore, their handlingand disposal warrants special attention. Needles and sharps are capableof transferring infectious bloodborne pathogens directly into the bloodstreamthrough accidental injuries such as needlesticks or scratches. The AHAstates in their recommendations <T3> Management of HTLV-III/LAV Infection in the Hospital:</T3><ITAG tagnum="21">As with other bloodborne diseases, the potential for transmissionis greatest when needles and other sharp instruments are used in patientcare. Therefore, needles and syringes should be disposed of in rigid, puncture-resistantcontainers (Ex. 6-75).</ITAG>Several CDC documents also address disposal of sharps and needles (Ex.6-27, 6-153, 6-312) including<T3> The Centers for Disease Control's Recommendations on Infective Waste</T3>which says:<ITAG tagnum="21">Disposable syringes with needles, scalpel blades, and other sharpitems capable of causing injury should be placed intact into puncture-resistantcontainers located as close as is practical to the area in which they wereused. If predisposal autoclaving is performed, the container should maintainits impermeability after autoclaving in order to avoid subsequent physicalinjuries (Ex. 6-395).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In addition, the American Federation of State, County, and MunicipalEmployees (AFSCME) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Currently, one of the most important work practices for preventingneedlesticks is the disposal of uncapped unbroken needles and other sharpsinto puncture resistant needle boxes. In order to facilitate adherenceto this practice, adequate numbers of needle boxes must be supplied inconvenient locations. All patient rooms and other patient care areas whereneedles or other sharps are used should be supplied with needle boxes.In institutions where security is a consideration, such as prisons or mentalhealth facilities, needle boxes may have to be kept on a cart and accompanythe person giving injections (Ex. 11-157).</ITAG>AFSCME, in continuing their comment, raised an important point:<ITAG tagnum="21">Based on our experience from visits to facilities and informationwe receive from members it is apparent that needle boxes are often notwithin easy reach. There may only be one box on a ward or floor, if that,which is usually located at the nurses station. The distance between wherethe needle is used and should be disposed can be very substantial and makeproper disposal very inconvenient. (Ex. 11-157)</ITAG>Disposal boxes must be easily accessible to personnel. When sharps disposalis perceived as inconvenient, then chances are increased that needles andsharps will be left in bed linens, on night stands, or thrown into wastebaskets, making them potential hazards for other staff such as laundryworkers and housekeepers. In addition, the possibility of an accidentalneedlestick is greater if an employee must carry an uncapped needle orsharp to a remote location for disposal. Therefore, paragraph (d)(4)(iii)(B)(1)requires the disposal containers to be located as close as possible tothe point of use to encourage proper disposal and minimize the distancethat uncovered sharps must be transported.  Of equal concern when utilizing sharps disposal containers is that theybe replaced routinely and not allowed to overfill. The reason for thisis twofold. First, a full container necessitates disposal of the sharpin some manner other than in the proper container, again leading to sharpsbeing placed on night stands, thrown into waste baskets, and so forth.Second, the employee may be tempted to get ``just one more'' sharp intothe container by forcing it in by hand. In doing so, the potential foran accidental needlestick increases, particularly if some of the disposedneedles or sharps are pointed toward the mouth of the container. Therefore,replacement of the containers before overfilling occurs reduces the chancefor accidental needlestick by promoting proper sharps handling and disposal.Several stipulations in the proposed standard deal directly with the designof the disposal containers. Paragraph (d)(4)(iii)(B) requires them to bepuncture-resistant to prevent the points of needles or other sharps frompuncturing the container and protruding through the side of the containerwhere they can present a hazard to unsuspecting staff (e.g. nurses, technicians,housekeepers). The containers must also be closable as further requiredby paragraph (d)(4)(iii)(B) in order to assure that contaminated sharpsremain inside the disposal unit while it is being transported and handledprior to terminal disposal. In addition, the containers must be leakproofon the sides and bottom. This requirement is aimed at preventing residualliquids draining from the syringes and pooling in the container from leakingout onto countertops, floors, cart tops, and so forth, thereby spreadingcontamination. It also prevents employee hand contact with liquids whichcould otherwise leak through and contaminate the outside of the container.The design of the tops of a number of sharps disposal containers will permitleakage if the container is tipped on its side or turned upside down. Thisis acceptable if the container meets all other requirements (puncture-resistance,closability, etc.) and will not be tipped or turned over in normal use.If leakage is a possibility during disposal of these containers (i.e. handling,storage, transport) they shall be disposed of as outlined in paragraph(d)(4)(iii)(A). A proper closing will ensure that if the container should become tipped or overturned employees will not be exposed to needles orother sharps which may otherwise spill out. Also, the containers must belabeled or color-coded as described in paragraph (g)(1)(ii) of this proposedstandard. This requirement essentially serves two purposes: (1) it allowsthe containers to be easily identified by employees having needles/sharpsto dispose of by clearly distinguishing the containers from others in thearea, and (2) it gains the attention of other staff, such as housekeepers,by virtue of the readily recognizable label or color thereby warning themof the potential hazard and signaling that special handling precautionsmay be necessitated. A number of commenters and sources made recommendations on disposal ofneedles and sharps which closely follow (or support) OSHA's proposed regulations(Exs. 4-25, 6-35, 6-75, 6-153, 6-316, 6-338, 10, 11-43, 11-71, 11-111,11-157, 11-159, 11-233(d), 11-280, 11-283). In summary, the proposed standardrequires that sharps (e.g., needles, syringes, capillary tubes, scapels)shall be disposed of in closable, leakproof, puncture-resistant, labeledor color-coded, disposable containers immediately after use. These containersshall be easily accessible to personnel; located in the immediate areaof use such as the emergency room, surgery, patient floors, and other settingswhere blood is drawn and needles used; and shall be replaced routinelyand not allowed to overfill. Employees responsible for laundering items that are either contaminatedwith blood or other potentially infectious materials or which may containneedles or other sharps must be protected from potential exposure. Properprotection of these employees depends upon, at a minimum, using safe workpractices when handling these materials and the appropriate containersand personal protective equipment. Based on comments and collected informationthe standard delineates several basic provisions for handling contaminatedlaundry (Exs. 4-25, 6-75, 6-153, 6-312, 11-159, 11-233(d), 11-259, 11-280).Laundry from workplaces with employees covered under paragraph (a) of thissection that is contaminated with blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials or may contain contaminated sharps shall be treated as if itwere contaminated and shall be handled as little as possible with a minimumat agitation. Minimizing handling and agitation of this laundry will notonly reduce contact-acquired contamination of the employee and the workarea but will also decrease mechanical injuries such as needlesticks, cutsand scratches from sharps accidentally left in linens. Paragraph (d)(4)(iv)(A)(1) of the proposed standard requires that all contaminatedlaundry shall be bagged at the location where it was used and shall notbe sorted or rinsed in patient-care areas. Contaminated laundry is requiredby paragraph (d)(4)(iv)(A)(2) to be placed and transported in bags thatare labeled or color-coded as described in paragraph (g)(1)(ii) in orderto indicate contents which are contaminated. Whenever this laundry is wetand presents the potential for soak-through of or leakage from the bag,it shall be placed and transported in leakproof bags (Exs. 4-25, 6-153,6-75). By requiring bagging of laundry at its location of use and prohibitingsorting and rinsing in patient-care areas, the amount of manual handlingof laundry by staff, other than laundry personnel, is limited to only thatwhich is necessary for removal and bagging. Contamination of additionalsurfaces such as sinks and floors is also reduced in comparison to thatwhich may occur if sorting and rinsing were permitted in areas other thanthe laundry. The intent of labeling or color-coding the bags is to inform employeeswho may handle the bags of their contaminated contents and that specialhandling procedures may be in order. This labeling/color-coding systemis supported by the AHA in their recommendations <T3>Management of HIV-III/LAV Infection in the Hospital </T3>which states:<ITAG tagnum="21">Soiled linens and other laundry should be bagged, appropriately labeledor color-coded, and processed according to the hospital's existing policyregarding linens from patients on isolation precautions (Ex. 6-75).</ITAG>In some circumstances, laundry may contain enough blood or potentiallyinfectious materials that soak-through of or leakage from the bag couldoccur. This situation dictates use of a leakproof laundry bag. Bags whichprevent leakage minimize not only environmental migration of contaminantsbut also reduce employee exposure which would occur during handling ofwet or leaking bags. In paragraph (d)(4)(iv)(B) OSHA proposes to require that the employersassure that laundry workers wear protective gloves and other appropriatepersonal protective equipment to prevent occupational exposure during handlingor sorting (Exs. 4-25, 11-18(c)). The Joint Commission on Accreditationof Hospitals, in their 1986 monograph <T3>Managing Hazardous Wastes and Materials, </T3>reported:<ITAG tagnum="21">Other hazards found in soiled sorting could include drugs, drug-contaminatedmaterials, and contamination from ``undiagnosed'' infectious soiling (e.g.,blood from the broken arm of a patient in physical therapy who has as yetundiagnosed infectious hepatitis B). (Ex. 11-18(c))</ITAG>Gloves will not protect against needlesticks, however, they will reducecontact exposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials thatare found in contaminated laundry. Therefore, glove usage to prevent skincontact with contaminated laundry is warranted until the laundry is properlycleaned. At the present time, OSHA is assuming that normal laundering proceduressuccessfully disinfect contaminated linen. Is this assumption correct?Should specific laundering procedures be stated and required? If so, whatare these procedures? In addition, other appropriate personal protective equipment such as fluid-proofaprons, gowns, and protective eyewear may be necessary. For example, ifan employee must handle laundry which is wet with contaminated fluids andthe likelihood for arm and body exposure exists, then a fluid-proof gown,fluid-proof apron and sleeve covers, or similar protective clothing wouldbe necessary. If the potential for spattering to the eyes was present thenprotective eyewear would also be required. Paragraph (e). HIV and HBV Research Laboratories and Production Facilities.This paragraph addresses additional requirements that must be met by researchlaboratories and production facilities engaged in the culture, production,concentration, and manipulation of HIV and HBV. The risks associated withdirect and routine work with pathogens have long been recognized :<ITAG tagnum="21">Microbiology laboratories are special, often unique, work environmentsthat may pose special infectious disease risks to persons in or near them.Personnel have contracted infections in the laboratory throughout the historyof microbiology (Ex. 6-338).</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">HIV and HBV research laboratories and production facilities are noexception, and the risks associated with work in such facilities warrantadditional protective measures. Prior to 1984, no single code of practice, standards, guidelines or otherpublication providing detailed descriptions of techniques or equipmentfor laboratory activities involving pathogens was available. In that year,the Centers for Disease Control (CDC) and the National Institutes of Health(NIH) published guidelines entitled ``Biosafety in Microbiological andBiomedical Laboratories'' (Ex. 6-338). These biosafety guidelines werebased on combinations of standard and special practices, equipment, andfacilities recommended for use when working with various infectious agentsin laboratory settings. The basic format for the biosafety guidelines categorizes infectious agentsand laboratory activities into four classes or levels denoted as biosafetylevels 1 through 4. These biosafety levels (BSL) are comprised of combinationsof laboratory practices and techniques, safety equipment, and laboratoryfacilities appropriate for the operations performed and the hazard posed.The Guidelines indicate the BSL to be used when working with various infectiousagents and infected animals. Recommended BSL for working with HIV werenot included in the orginal biosafety guidelines. In 1988, CDC issued an ``Agent Summary Statement for Human ImmunodeficiencyVirus'' (Ex. 6-312) which outlined biosafety levels for various activitiesinvolving HIV. Activities performed in clinical laboratories were categorizedat BSL 2 which covers standards and practices for handling all clinicalspecimens. For HIV research laboratories and production facilities, AgentSummary statement states:<ITAG tagnum="21">Activities such as producing research-laboratory-scale amounts ofHIV, manipulating concentrated virus preparations, and conducting proceduresthat may produce aerosols or droplets should be performed in a BSL 2 facilitywith the additional practices and containment equipment recommended forBSL 3.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Activities involving industrial-scale, large-volume production orhigh concentration and manipulation of concentrated HIV should be conductedin a BSL 3 facility using BSL 3 practices and equipment (Ex. 6-312).</ITAG>These recommendations with some modifications were adopted by OSHA to coverHIV/HBV research laboratories and production facilities. Accordingly, theGuideline's BSL 3 text for standard microbiological practices, specialpractices, and containment equipment was converted to regulatory languageand comprises paragraph (e)(2) of the standard. Requirements for the facilitiesfor research laboratories [paragraph (e)(3)] were derived from the textfor BSL 2, while those for production facilities [paragraph (e)(4)] werederived from the text for BSL 3.While general training requirements for employees working with pathogensare given in paragraph (g), OSHA feels that additional specialized trainingshould be provided for employees of the research laboratories and productionfacilities covered by paragraph (e). HIV infection of a worker in an HIVproduction facility as a result of ``undetected skin contact with virusculture supernatant'' was attributed to inexperience coupled with ``on-the-jobtraining in a setting in which episodes of contamination may have occurredfrequently'' (Ex. 6-312). Therefore, the training recommendations of theNIH committee convened to investigate the incident were incorporated intoparagraph (g)(2)(v) of this standard as special training requirements.OSHA recognizes the valuable contribution that is being made by researchlaboratories that are studying the human immunodeficiency virus and thehepatitis B virus. The Agency also understands the need to produce extremelyhigh concentrations of these viruses to prepare reagents and other productsneeded for research, diagnosis and, if an HIV vaccine is developed, prevention.The Agency has no desire to impede these efforts. However, there is clearlydocumented risk to individuals working with blood containing HIV and HBV.When the concentration of these viruses is increased as the result of growingvirus in cell culture or artifical concentrate on, then the risk to employeesincreases.The two cases of HIV infection that occurred in HIV production facilitiesare discussed in the Health Effects section of this preamble. The requirementsin paragraph (e) are derived primarily from the CDC/NIH recommendationsfound in ``Biosafety in Microbiological and Biomedical Laboratories'' (Ex.6-338). Only those provisions that relate to the health and safety of theemployee are required by the standard. Since the employer is responsiblefor following the entire standard, requirements stated elsewhere in thestandard (e.g. the prohibition of mouth pipetting) are not repeated. Thespecial training requirements in paragraph (g)(2)(v) are based on the conclusionsand recommendations of an expert team convened by the Director of the NationalInstitutes of Health.This section applies to two types of facilities that we have designated``research laboratories'' and ``production facilities.'' For the purposeof this standard, ``research laboratories'' means a facility in which HIVor HBV is being grown in cell, tissue or organ culture in the laboratoryor manipulation. Although attempts to grow HBV in this manner have notbeen successful in the past, researchers are attempting to culture HBVand the <T3>in vitro </T3>culture of HBV may soon be possible. This proposed standarddoes not require research laboratories such as laboratories using unconcentratedblood or blood components as the source of HIV or HBV to follow these additionalrequirements. However, they must follow the other provisions of the standardand avoid the production of aerosols.For purposes of the standard, facilities that are engaged in the concentrationof large quantities and/or high concentrations of HBV or HIV are called``production facilities''. These facilities reduce many liters of plasmaor culture fluid into a concentrate of a few milliliters. These concentratedpreparations are used for a number of purposes including as testing reagentsand, in the past for HBV and perhaps in the future for HIV, for vaccines.In many cases, the production of concentrated virus is a byproduct of theprocess and not the goal, for example, in the production of HbsAg.Paragraph (e)(2)(i) describes standard microbiological practices, mostof which are found in other provisions of the standard. The single requirementlisted here, the decontamination of infectious liquid or solid waste, isto prevent the accidental exposure of other employees to the concentratedvirus.Paragraph (e)(2)(ii) describes special practices to be followed and paragraph(e)(2)(ii) (A),(C) and (D) serve to further limit access to the laboratoryand would warn of the hazards associated with bloodborne pathogens. Theseparagraphs ensure that unauthorized individuals are not placed at risk,and that they do not distract or otherwise interfere with the activityof the authorized employees. This works in concert with the requirementfor signs in paragraph (g). This ensures that only those individuals whomeet special requirements, such as training, clothing and/or immunization,would enter the area. The requirement proposed in paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(B)that contaminated material removed from the work area be placed in a durable,leakproof container that is closed before being removed from the work areais to assure there are no accidental spills or other contamination thatmay place other employees at risk.The requirement in paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(E) that all activities involvinginfectious materials be conducted in a biological safety cabinet or equivalentcontainment is to ensure that material containing virus will be containedand away from the worker's mucous membranes, unprotected skin, and breathingzone (in the case of aerosols).Paragraphs (e)(2)(ii) (F) and (G) specify personal protective clothingto be worn to prevent contact of the infectious materials with the employee'sskin.The requirements for decontamination of wastes [paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(H)]and the use of HEPA filters and traps on vacuum lines, paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(I),are to prevent the spread of contamination to other work areas.Since needlestick injury is one of the most efficient methods of accidentalinfection, paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(J) requires that the use needles and othersharp objects be kept to a minimum, handled carefully and disposed of incontainers that prevent accidental injury.Exposure incidents must be reported (paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(K)) so that postexposure follow-up required by paragraph (f)(3) can be initiated.The requirement for a biosafety manual, paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(L), ensuresthat any necessary additional procedures are developed to address situationsthat are unique to a particular facility and to provide appropriate protectionto potentially exposed employees.Paragraph (e)(2)(iii) specifies that specific containment equipment (engineeringcontrols) are required to minimize or eliminate exposure to the viruses.Biological safety cabinets must be certified to ensure that they will providethe proper protection. Paragraph (e)(3) contains requirements specific for HIV and HBV researchfacilities. This paragraph requires a sink for hand washing and an autoclave.Handwashing reduces both the likelihood of infection and the contaminantionof environmental surfaces, and the availability of a handwashing sink nearthe work area is essential. The availability of an autoclave is requiredfor inactivating or destroying HIV or HBV in or on a variety of media,including culture fluids, plastic ware, and equipment.The specific requirements for HIV and HBV production facilities are foundin paragraph (e)(4). Paragraph (e)(4)(i) would require that in productionfacilities work areas be separated from other areas by two sets of doors.This reduces the likelihood of accidental entry into the work area andmeans that entry into the area is a deliberate action. This further reducesthe likelihood that untrained individuals will enter the work area as doesthe requirement that the doors be self-closing [paragraph (e)(4)(iv)].The requirement for easy cleaning and decontamination of the work area[paragraph (e)(4)(ii)] is necessary because of the high concentration ofthe virus that may be present and the need to decontaminate the work areato reduce the possibility of infection.The requirement for a handwashing sink [paragraph (e)(4)(iii)] is to allowfor handwashing prior to exiting the work area and to keep environmentalcontamination to a minimum by requiring that the sink be foot, elbow andautomatically operated. The requirement for an autoclave in or very near the work area [paragraph(e)(4)(iv)] is necessitated because of the very high concentration of virusin these facilities. Transporting contaminated fluids, plastic ware andother equipment would result in a high potential for accidental exposureto other employees.The requirement that production facilities have a directional airflow intothe work area [paragraph (e)(4)(vi)] is to ensure air is drawn into thework area in order to maintain the containment of the facility.Paragraph (e)(5) alerts the employees to the special, additional trainingrequirements found in paragraph (g)(3)(v) for employees in research laboratoriesand production facilities.OSHA seeks comments on its designations ``research laboratory'' and ``productionfacility.'' Should there be additional requirements or should any of theproposed requirements be modified? Could alternative provisions provideequivalent protection?Paragraph (f) HBV Vaccination and Post Exposure Follow-upThe provisions in this paragraph of the proposed standard are designedto protect employees from infection caused by bloodborne pathogens by requiringthe employer to (1) make the HBV vaccination available to employees toprevent HBV infection and subsequent illness and death and (2) ensure thatthe employee receives appropriate medical follow-up after an exposure incident.Early intervention, including testing, counseling and appropriate prophylaxiscan reduce the risk of infection, in the case of HBV, and prevent furthertransmission if an infection should occur.The proposed standard calls for a hepatitis B vaccination and post-exposurefollow-up program to be made available to all employees who are coveredby paragraph (a) of this section. Since a single exposure may result inan infection, the Agency believes its coverage is reasonably related toachieving benefits to the health of these employees as well as being technologicallyand economically feasible.The proposed standard requires all medical evaluations and procedures tobe performed by or under the supervision of a licensed physician. Althougha licensed physician must supervise and interpret a medical evaluation(s),certain parts of the evaluation(s) do not necessarily require the physician'sexpertise, and these may be conducted by other suitably qualified healthcare personnel under the supervision of the physician.The proposed standard requires that all laboratory tests be performed byan accredited laboratory. Accreditation by a national accrediting bodyor its state equivalent means that the laboratory has participated in arecognized quality assurance program. This accreditation process is requiredto ensure a measure of quality control so that employees receive accurateinformation concerning their laboratory tests and tends to assure long-termstability and consistency among laboratory test procedures and interpretationsof results.The proposed standard requires all evaluations, procedures, vaccinations,and post-exposure prophylaxis to be provided at a reasonable time and place,and according to standard recommendations for medical practice. In orderto increase the likelihood that employees receive the benefits providedby the standard, the evaluations must be convenient to them and the aboverequirements ensure that they will be. Moreover, OSHA has included thisprovision in other standards (e.g., EtO, 49 FR 25798 (1984) and Asbestos,51 FR 22737 (1986).) The requirement for adherence to standard recommendationsfor medical practice assures that employees are afforded the benefit ofreceiving all procedures according to currently accepted medical standards.The requirements for the hepatitis B vaccination and post exposure follow-upprogram are sufficiently detailed to ensure the employees will receiveappropriate protection from bloodborne pathogens, while affording the treatingphysician flexibility to exercise professional judgment in the managementof particular cases. The physician will be able to determine whether theemployee has any condition that would prevent the employee from receivingthe hepatitis B vaccination and will have access to information such asthe documentation required following an exposure incident in order to evaluate,counsel and provide appropriate prophylaxis to employees who have experiencedan exposure incident. <T3>HBV Vaccination</T3>. The proposed standard requires that the vaccineshall be offered to all employees occupationally exposed on average oneor more times per month unless it has been determined through antibodytesting that an employee is immune or has previously received the vaccine.In addition, the vaccine shall be provided to any such employee who initiallydeclines HBV vaccination but later, while still covered under the standard,decides to accept the HBV vaccine. Should booster dose(s) be recommendedat a future date, they shall be provided. An employee who is exposed topotentially infectious materials such as concentrated preparations of HIVconcentrate, that do not contain HBV and who has no exposure to blood hasno reason, on the basis of employment, to receive HBV vaccine. Therefore,it is not required that HBV vaccine be offered to these employees. In the past, the CDC has published lists of occupations identified by epidemiologicstudies as placing employees at risk for hepatitis B infection and hasrecommended the vaccination of these groups. If this approach were to befollowed for regulatory purposes, some occupations with routine exposureto blood may be excluded because epidemiologic studies may not be availableto quantify the risk. Since this standard seeks to minimize or eliminateexposure to blood and other potentially infectious materials, the mechanismfor occupational transmission of bloodborne pathogens, OSHA proposes tobase HBV vaccination on frequency of exposure rather than occupation. Thisallows greater flexibility and provides protection for those individualswhose occupation may not be included on the recommended list but may nonethelesshave frequent occupational exposure. OSHA is proposing that employers offer the vaccine to those employees whoare occupationally exposed on average one or more times per month. If,for example, once a month or twice every other month, an employee donsgloves to perform a phlebotomy procedure, then for the purpose of paragraph(f)(2)(i) the requisite occupational exposure has occurred and the employeemust be offered the vaccine. Since the basis for specifying the frequencyof this occupational exposure is lifetime risk, an employee who has 12occupational exposures in a day or in a week but has no additional exposuresfor several months is eligible to receive the vaccine. The requirement that the HBV vaccine be administered ``according to standardrecommendations for medical practice'' refers to such considerations asdosage, route, site and technique of immunization (Ex. 6-489). It doesnot refer to any recommendation that conflicts with OSHA's proposed requirementthat the employer make the HBV vaccine available to employees occupationallyexposed on average one or more times per month. Since OSHA is charged with protecting a worker over his or her entire workinglifetime (45 years), an exposure frequency of once a month means that theemployee will have potential exposure to the blood of 540 different individualsover a working lifetime. Although it is not possible to predict exactlyhow many of these exposures involve blood or body fluids from HBV infectedindividuals, estimates of the prevalence of HBV carriers are availablein the literature. For example, approximately 0.2% of the white population,1% of hospital patients, and 13% of immigrants from areas of high endemicityare infected (HBsAg positive) and capable of transmitting the virus (Ex.6-390, 6-427, 6-199). Using these figures, one can estimate that a hospitalemployee who is exposed once a month for 45 years (540 exposures) willbe exposed to the blood of an HBV infected individual approximately 5 to6 times over a working lifetime. The actual number of exposures to bloodor other potentially infectious materials containing HBV could be higherif the contact population consists of individuals from high risk groupsor those with a higher HBV carrier rate. If these exposures are by needlestick,then the probability of infection would be expected to range from 7% to30% for each exposure. Exposure by other routes would have a lower probabilityof infection. For additional estimates of lifetime risk to workers withan average of one exposure per month, see Exhibit 6-491. It is the goal of the standard to minimize or eliminate significant riskusing engineering and work practice controls and personal protective equipment.However, accidents occur, equipment may fail or be defective, the employeemay have unsuspected cuts or may develop dermatitis and infection may followexposure. Therefore, OSHA believes that the risk of infection is sufficientto mandate that the employer make the HBV vaccine available to those employeeswhose exposure occurs an average of once a month or more. Employees withfewer exposures are also at some risk and may not be adequately protectedfrom HBV by the other provisions of the standard. OSHA seeks comment onwhether the group of employees who would receive the vaccine under thisproposal should be expanded and upon what criteria should the expansionbe based? The requirement that employers make the vaccine available to employeeswho initially decline vaccine but who later decide to accept the vaccine,assures that employees who initially are reluctant to accept vaccine butwho later change their minds as the result of information or experienceare accorded the opportunity to receive such vaccine. The signing of awaiver by the employee does not relieve the employer of the requirementto provide the vaccine at a later date if the employee requests the vaccine.This is consistent with OSHA's goal of encouraging employees to be vaccinated.Since the plasma-derived HBV vaccine has been available in the U.S. onlysince 1982, with the recombinant DNA HBV vaccine licensed in 1986, futurefollow-up of vaccinees may demonstrate that HBV antibody levels fall toa level at which they are no longer protective. At that time, booster dosesof vaccine may be recommended to ensure protection. Should such doses berecommended, the provision for booster doses assures that employees willcontinue to be protected.HBV vaccination has been endorsed in an ANPR comment by NIOSH (Ex. 11-187)and recommended by CDC (Ex. 6-200). The Departments of Labor and Healthand Human Services endorsed HBV vaccination in the Joint Advisory Notice(Ex. 10). In addition, the ADA has recommended that all dental health careworkers with possible exposure to blood or direct patient contact obtainHBV vaccination (Ex. 11-43), and AFSCME has recommended that HBV vaccinebe offered (Ex. 11-157). The ANA (Ex. 11-86) and AACN (Ex. 11-117) haveendorsed provision of HBV vaccination by the employer, and the AmericanCollege of Obstetricians and Gynecologists (Ex. 11-158) has recommendedthat health care workers be vaccinated against HBV.The proposed standard requires that HBV antibody testing shall be madeavailable to an employee who desires such testing prior to deciding whetherto receive HBV vaccination. OSHA believes that it is the right of employeesto have such information so that they can make a fully informed choiceregarding HBV vaccination. The manufacturer of the vaccine has stated thatantibody screening prior to vaccine is not warranted (Ex. 11-165). However,the agency believes that employees who are already immune to HBV shouldhave the opportunity to obtain that information so that they can choosewhether or not to be vaccinated based on knowledge of their HBV immunestatus. In addition, if adequate HBV antibody titer is demonstrated inan employee, there is no reason for the employer to offer the HBV vaccineto that employee. In addition, in many cases, the employer will find itcost effective to prescreen prior to vaccination (Ex. 6-199).OSHA seeks to gather additional information related to hepatitis B vaccinationduring the written comment period and the public hearing. Since the employee'sparticipation in the hepatitis B vaccination program is voluntary, OSHAis particularly interested in existing HBV vaccination programs that haveachieved a high degree of voluntary employee compliance. The Agency willattempt to identify those elements that are common to successful programsand will provide this information to all employers. In addition, we arealso seeking information on availability, cost and any potential distributionproblems that may be associated with initiating the vaccination of largenumbers of employees within the 150 day period following the effectivedate of the standard.The Agency intends to designate several days of the Washington, DC hearingto focus on the issues surrounding HBV vaccination. We encourage hearingparticipants who are concerned about this matter or who have pertinentinformation to participate either by requesting to testify on one of thedesignated days or by submitting a statement to be entered into the recordon the days set aside to focus on Hepatitis B vaccination. Specific informationon this matter can be found in Section X. Public Participation.Post Exposure Evaluation and Follow-upFollowing a report of occupational exposure, medical evaluation and monitoringare to be made available to the employee. Such evaluation and monitoring,as well as maintaining the required medical records, are to be done ina manner which protects the confidentiality of the employee's identityand test results. OSHA believes that medical evaluation and monitoringfollowing an exposure incident are necessary to provide appropriate prophylaxisto prevent HBV infection, to take appropriate precautions to prevent possibleperinatal transmission, and to ensure that such employees are able to takenecessary precautions to ensure that sexual contacts are protected frominfection. Post-exposure medical evaluations have been recommended by NIOSH(Ex. 11-187), NCCLS (Ex. 11-159), AHA (Ex. 6-75), NIH/CDC (Ex. 6-312),AAOHN (Ex.11-358), and AFSCME (Ex. 11-157). The ADA has stated that CDCguidelines should be followed (Ex. 11-43).<T3>Determination of and Documentation of exposure incident.</T3> The routeof exposure, the source patient's antibody status (if known), and the circumstancesunder which the exposure occurred are to be documented. Such determinationsenable the employer to discharge further responsibilities in providinginformation to the physician by determining the infection status of thesource patient. In addition, through documentation of such exposure theemployer can receive feedback regarding the most prevalent circumstancesand routes of exposure of employees so that efforts can be focused on decreasingor eliminating the circumstances involved (e.g., providing protective equipmentthat is acceptable to employees and that they will more likely use, increasingtraining efforts regarding certain procedures which seem to be associatedwith exposure incidents). Such determination of and documentation of exposureincidents and circumstances has been recommended by ABRA (Ex. 11-71) andthe Hospital Association of Greater Des Moines (Ex. 11-23). Additionally,NCCLS (Ex. 11-159) and NIH/CDC (Ex. 6-312) have recommended that institutionsdevelop and maintain post-exposure documentation.<T3>Testing of source patient.</T3> If the source patient of an employee'soccupational exposure can be determined, permission for antigen or antibodytesting of the source patient's blood shall be obtained, if possible, andtesting shall be performed to determine HBV and HIV infection status. Inany case, management of the exposed employee shall be according to standardrecommendations for medical practice. OSHA believes that testing of sourcepatient(s) for infection status provides exposed employees with informationthat will assist them in their decisions regarding testing of their ownblood, complying with other elements of post-exposure management, and usingprecautions to prevent possible infection in others. The American Red Crosshas recommended that the employer make an early attempt to evaluate theinfectivity of the implicated material after an employee exposure (Ex.11-280). SEIU has stated that it is the right of workers to know the HIVand HBV status of patients if exposed to their blood or body fluids (Ex.11-161). The need to obtain the consent of the source patient prior totesting is recognized. Many organizations and associations support testingof source patient(s) only after obtaining consent of such patient(s). Theseassociations and groups include CDC (Ex. 6-153), NIOSH (Ex. 11-187), AAOHN(Ex. 11-358), NCCLS (Ex. 11-159), and AHA (Ex. 6-75). The AMA (Ex. 11-163)has endorsed the implementation of CDC recommendations. Consistent withthe opinion expressed by the CDC and the majority of commenters, OSHA proposesthat testing of source patients following an employee exposure be accomplishedafter consent is obtained from the source patient. It is to be expectedthat some patients will not consent to testing, and OSHA does not expectthe employer to test the source patient against his or her wishes.<T3>Blood collection and antibody/antigen testing.</T3> Blood from theexposed employee is to be collected as soon as possible after the exposureincident for the determination of HIV and/or HBV status. Actual antibody/antigentesting of the blood may be done at that time or at a later date if theemployee so requests.By offering blood collection and antibody testing to the exposed employeeas soon as possible after an exposure incident, the employer assures thatthe employee has the opportunity to have antibody testing to serve as abaseline value with which to compare future test results in order to narrowthe point in time at which any infection resulting from exposure was acquired.The option is given to the employee to have the blood tested at a laterdate so that exposed employees will not be forced to decide in a shorttime about whether they desire to know their antibody status at the timeof exposure. OSHA believes that the provision of opportunity for futuretesting rather than a demand for an immediate decision by the employeewill encourage employees to accept blood collection at the time of exposure.The offering to exposed employees of voluntary blood collection and testingfor evidence of infection has been recommended by NIOSH (Ex. 11-187), theHospital Association of Greater Des Moines (Ex. 11-23), Joint AdvisoryNotice (Ex. 10), AAOHN (Ex. 11-358), NCCLS (Ex. 11-159), AHA (Ex. 6-75),ABRA (Ex. 11-71), and SEIU (Ex. 11-161). The American Red Cross has recommendedthat employee blood samples be held until the employee requests testingand that samples not tested be held for at least 5 years (Ex. 11-280).The American Dental Association has recommended that blood of exposed employeesbe tested only if the source patient has AIDS or is HIV infected (Ex. 11-43).OSHA seeks comments on whether this provision will increase the likelihoodthat the employee will be willing to participate in a post exposure follow-upprogram.Further follow-up of the exposed employee includes counseling and illnessreporting. OSHA believes that further follow-up of an exposure incidentis vital to assure that employees are afforded further information andcounseling regarding their condition as a result of exposure. The AmericanBlood Resources Association (Ex. 11-71) has recommended that follow-uptesting be encouraged and that the employee be referred, if a test is positivefor infection, for further evaluation and follow-up. The American Red Cross(Ex. 11-280) has recommended referral to a physician of an exposed employeeif the source material is infectious. The Centers for Disease Control andthe National Institutes of Health (Ex. 6-312) have recommended surveillanceof exposed employees in laboratories and production facilities. The AmericanAssociation of Occupational Health Nurses (Ex. 11-358) has recommendedfollow-up antibody tests at 6 weeks and 6-12 months post exposure. A numberof commenters including NIOSH (Ex.11-187), AFSCME (Ex. 11-157), the HospitalAssociation of Greater Des Moines (Ex. 11-23) and AMA (Ex. 11-163), endorsedCDC current recommendations of follow up antibody testing of exposed employeesat 6 weeks, 12 weeks and 6 months (Ex. 6-153). However, AHA has recommendedthe addition of a 12 month test (Ex. 6-75) to the CDC recommendations,and the NCCLS (Ex. 11-159) has recommended follow-up testing, in additionto 6 weeks, 12 weeks, and 6 months, at 9, 12, and 24 months post exposure.Since follow-up testing is a rapidly changing and developing field, OSHAbelieves that current standard recommendations for medical practice atthe time of exposure offer the best protection for employees covered bysuch a standard at the present time as well as in the future.The requirement for the employer to advise employees to report illnessto the responsible physician assures that such employees will have thebenefit of early medical evaluation and can accept in a timely manner anycurrently recommended treatment of such disease. This illness reportingprovision has been recommended by CDC (Ex. 6-153) and is supported by ABRA(Ex. 11-71), CDC/NIH (Ex. 6-312), AMA (Ex. 11-163), AAOHN (Ex. 11-358),and NCCLS (Ex.11-159).OSHA believes that counseling of exposed employees is a vital componentof the post-exposure follow-up procedures. Counseling concerning the infectionstatus (results and interpretation of all tests) will assist the employeein understanding the potential risk of infection and in making decisionsregarding the protection of personal contacts. Post exposure counselinghas been recommended by CDC (Ex. 6-153), DOL/CDC (Ex. 10), NIOSH (Ex. 11-187),ARC (Ex. 11-280), AAOHN (Ex. 11-358), SEIU (Ex. 11-161), AHA (Ex. 6-75),ABRA (Ex. 11-71), AMA (Ex. 11-163), NCCLS (Ex. 11-159), and AFSCME (Ex.11-157).OSHA believes that it is essential that exposed or infected employees beoffered post-exposure follow-up according to standard recommendations formedical practice. This provision guarantees employees the benefit of currentlyrecommended measures to help prevent infection and disease immediatelyafter occupational exposure. The offering of such measures in a timelymanner assures that maximum effectiveness is achieved. Post exposure follow-upfor exposed employees has been recommended by SEIU (Ex. 11-161). The AmericanFederation of State, County and Municipal Employees (Ex. 11 157) and AAOHN(Ex. 11-111) have endorsed prophylaxis for HBV as recommended by CDC, andthe ACIP has recommended HBIG, along with HBV vaccine, for unvaccinatedexposed employees (Ex. 6-199). In addition to treatment of the exposedemployee, AAOHN has recommended that if a pregnant employee is exposed,the baby should be treated if necessary (Ex. 11-111). <T3>Information Provided to the Physician. </T3>The proposal requires thatthe employer provide the evaluating physician with certain information[paragraph(f)(4)]. This information includes:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) A copy of this regulation and its appendices, and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) A description of the affected employee's duties as they relateto the employee's occupational exposure.</ITAG>The purpose of making this information available to the physician is toinform the physician of the requirements of the standard and to aid thephysician in understanding the employee's assigned duties.Physician's Written Opinion For each evaluation required under this section the employer shall obtainand provide the employee with a copy of the evaluating physician's writtenopinion within 15 working days of the evaluation. The written opinion shallbe limited to the following information:<ITAG tagnum="21">(i) The physician's recommended limitations upon the employee's abilityto receive the HBV vaccination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) A statement that the employee has been informed of the resultsof the medical evaluation and that the employee has been told about anymedical conditions resulting from exposure to blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials which require further evaluation or treatment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Specific findings or diagnoses, which are related to the employee'sability to receive the HBV vaccine. Any other findings and diagnoses shallremain confidential.</ITAG>The purpose of requiring the evaluating physician to supply the employerwith a written opinion is to provide the employer with a documentationof a medical assessment of the employee's ability and need to receive HBVvaccination. The requirement that the employee be provided with a copyof the physician's written opinion within 15 working days ensures thatthe employee is informed in a timely manner of the results of the evaluationand the need for any additional follow-up, and of the receipt by the employerof the information contained in the physician's written opinion. The purposeof limiting the information the employer receives is to encourage employeesto participate in the medical evaluation by removing concern that the employerwill obtain information about their physical condition and specific findingsor diagnoses that are unrelated to the employees ability to receive vaccine.<T3>Hepatitis B Vaccination and Post Exposure Follow-up Recordkeeping.</T3>Medical records shall be maintained in accordance with paragraph (h)(1)of this section. The above notation is included in this discussion so thatthe employer and interested parties reviewing this discussion of the proposedmedical surveillance requirements are made aware that there are requirementsfor medical surveillance recordkeeping elsewhere in the standard. Theserecords must remain confidential.Paragraph (g) Communication of hazards to employeesThis proposed standard includes paragraph (g) entitled: ``Communicationof Hazards to Employees.'' This paragraph addresses the issue of transmittinginformation to employees about the hazards of bloodborne pathogens throughthe use of signs, labels and information and training. This paragraph ofthe proposed standard on bloodborne pathogens would apply to all operationswhere there is potential for exposure to blood and other potentially infectiousmaterials. OSHA's primary intent in this paragraph of the proposed standardis to ensure that employees will receive adequate warning (signs and labels)and training necessary to minimize or eliminate exposure to bloodbornepathogens. <ITAG tagnum="81">Signs and labels</ITAG>Paragraph (g)(1) of the proposed bloodborne pathogens standard providesthe specific labeling and sign requirements that would have to be usedto warn employees of the hazards to which they are exposed. The requirementsfor signs and labels are consistent with Section 6(b)(7) of the OSH Act,which prescribes the use of labels or other appropriate forms of warningto apprise employees of the hazards to which they are exposed. There wasalso strong support in the record for such requirements (see for example,Exs. 11-159, 11-233).The proposed standard would require that the entrance to research laboratoriesor production facilities be posted with signs specifically stating ``Biohazard''and showing the universal biohazard symbol in the color black. Should therebe any additional requirements that relate to the color or contrast ofthese signs? The sign would also have to identify the infectious agentand specify any special requirements for entering the area. For example,if personal protective equipment is required, this information would haveto be included on the sign. In addition, the name and telephone numberof the laboratory director or other responsible person would be displayed.Such warning signs would have to be posted at the entrance to a researchlaboratory or a production facility as defined by paragraph (b) of thisproposed standard. The proposed standard intends that the posting of thesesigns will serve as a warning to employees who may otherwise not know theyare entering a restricted area. Signs would warn employees not to enterthe area unless there is a need, unless the employee has been properlytrained, and unless the employee also meets all other appropriate entrancerequirements listed on the sign.The proposed standard dictates certain wording on the warning signs forregulated areas to assure that appropriate and universally recognized warningis given to employees. The specific requirement to use the word ``Biohazard''and the universal biohazard symbol is considered appropriate because epidemiologicalevidence indicates that HIV and HBV have been transmitted to laboratoryworkers in circumstances where these hazards existed. The universal biohazardsymbol indicates the nature of the hazard in a manner readily recognizedby laboratory workers, and it emphasizes the importance of the messagethat follows. The requirement that the name of the infectious agent belisted on the sign would assure that employees are aware of the specificbiohazard involved. The requirement that any special provisions for entryinto the regulated area be listed on the sign posted at the entry to thework area will assure that authorized individuals who enter the area areproperly protected. The requirement that the name and telephone numberof the laboratory director or other responsible individual be posted onthe sign will ensure that, in the event of an emergency or other unforeseenevent, a trained and knowledgeable individual will be available to provideguidance and ensure that procedures are followed to minimize or eliminateexposure.The provisions for signs in paragraph (g)(1)(i) are virtually identicalto the recommendations for signs found in Special Practices for BiosafetyLevels 2 and 3 in ``Biosafety in Microbiological and Biomedical Laboratories''(Ex. 6-338). The only exception is the additional requirement that theword ``Biohazard'' be used. OSHA has added this requirement because ofthe likelihood that some individuals who are present in the general workarea may be unfamiliar with the meaning of the biohazard symbol.The hazard warning signs are intended to supplement the training whichemployees are to receive under the other provisions of paragraph (g)(2),since even trained employees need to be reminded of the location of regulatedareas and of the precautions to be taken before entering these hazardousareas. Paragraph (g)(1)(ii) would require that labels or other appropriate formsof warning be provided on containers of infectious waste; on refrigeratorsor freezers that are used to store blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials and on other containers used to store or transport either bloodor other potentially infectious materials. The only exception would besubstitution of red bags or red containers for infectious waste and theuse of containers of blood or blood components that are labeled as to theircontents and have been released for distribution. (The reasons for theseexemptions are discussed below.) This is to alert employees of possible exposure since the nature of thematerial or contents will not always be readily identified as blood orother potentially infectious materials. The proposed labeling requirementreads as follows: BIOHAZARD, followed by the universal biohazard symbolin the color black, and any other appropriate designation, e.g., InfectiousWaste. The purpose of the term ``Biohazard'' and the universal biohazardsymbol are as described above for signs. Any ``other appropriate designation''is also required because this would ensure that employees know the contentsof the bag or container without opening it and risking possible exposure.One result of the implementation of universal precautions is that, in mostfacilities, signs and labels that indicate the patient's HIV or HBV infectionstatus are no longer used. Under this method, for example, blood from allpatients is treated as if it contains HBV or HIV, and there is no needfor these particular signs and labels. In addition, the labeling of someblood specimens and not others may set up a dual system in which employeestake fewer precautions with unlabelled specimens than with those labeled``HIV'' or ``HBV.'' On the other hand, some employees may feel that ifthey are required to provide care to a patient who is known to be infectedwith HIV or HBV, the employee has a right to know that the patient is infected.The proposed standard would neither require nor prohibit the posting ofsigns or labeling of specimens to specify the patients's HIV or HBV infectionstatus as long as the employer has implemented universal precautions. ShouldOSHA continue to leave the decision to use labels and signs designatingthe patient's infection status to the employer? Should OSHA <T3>prohibit</T3> the use of signs and labels stating the patient's HIVor HBV infection status? Should OSHA <T3>require</T3> the use of these particular signs and labels? The proposal would require labels to be fluorescent orange, orange-redor predominantly so with lettering or symbols in a contrasting color. Thisrequirement would ensure that the label attracts the attention of the employeeand that the letters and symbols are legible. The color requirement isidentical to that contained in Appendix A of OSHA's standard for accidentprevention tags (29 CFR 1910.145(f)). OSHA seeks comment on this colorrequirement. The proposed standard would allow the substitution of red bags for labelson bags or containers of infectious wastes. OSHA recognizes the acceptedcurrent practice of ``red bagging'' infectious wastes. Paragraph (g)(2)(iv)(k)of the proposed standard would require that employees be trained to understandthe meaning of all symbols used on signs and labels. This would includeinformation on the meaning of red bags, thus assuring that OSHA's intent,to inform employees of hazards present at their worksite, would be achievedby the use of red bags. Although some products are available that have biohazard labels as an integralpart of the container, the proposed standard would allow a label to beaffixed to the container. This flexibility is particularly important sinceobjects, such as refrigerators or freezers, would have to be labeled undercertain circumstances. The proposed standard would exempt containers of blood and blood components,labeled as to their contents and released for distribution, from the labelingprovision of this standard. This exemption is justified because the standardwould require the implementation of universal precautions (as defined inparagraph (b)) so that containers bearing a specific label which identifiesblood or blood components would provide sufficient information to ensurethat employees will know to take appropriate infection control measures.For example, the labeling requirements of the Food and Drug Administrationfor blood and blood products provide sufficient warning for a trained employeeso that no additional labeling would be necessary. The Agency specificallyseeks additional comments from the public on the appropriateness of thisexemption. Employee Information and Training According to paragraph (g), the employer would be required to provide allemployees exposed to bloodborne pathogens with training about the hazardsassociated with blood, and potentially infectious materials and the protectivemeasures to be taken to minimize the risk of occupational exposure. Effectivetraining is a critical element of any overall infection control program.It will ensure that employees understand hazards associated with bloodbornepathogens, the modes of transmission, the infection control plan, and theuse of engineering controls, work practices, and personal protective clothing.Employees would also be trained in the appropriate actions to take in anemergency, and they would be informed of the reasons that they should participatein medical surveillance programs. This training would help reduce the riskof occupational exposure, consequently reducing exposure-related infection,illness, and death.The proposed standard would require the employer to provide an explanationof the contents of the final standard on bloodborne pathogens includingappendices. This ensures the employee will know the standard exists andwill become familiar with its provisions. The proposed provisions for employee training are performance oriented,listing categories of information that must be provided to employees. Thisensures that important information is communicated to employees while allowingemployers the most flexible approach to providing training. Training of employees would have to be accomplished at the time of initialassignment or within 150 days of the effective date of the final standardfor bloodborne pathogens, whichever comes later. Employee training wouldbe repeated and updated at least annually thereafter. It is OSHA's position, in general, that it is essential for employees tounderstand the nature of the hazards they may face in the course of theiremployment and the procedures to follow to minimize or eliminate the risksassociated with their exposure to these hazards. This is particularly importantin the case of bloodborne pathogens because a single exposure incidentmay result in an infection, illness or death. Because of the severity ofthe diseases and the potential to contact them from a single event, itis also important to retrain workers exposed to bloodborne pathogens onan annual basis. Annual retraining reinforces initial training and providesan opportunity to present new information that had not been available atthe time of initial training. In the November 27, 1987 ANPR, OSHA requested public comment and otherpertinent information on how employees are currently informed of the occupationalhazards associated with HBV and HIV; how employees should be trained toensure that they understand the nature of HIV and HBV infections and theways to reduce the likelihood of occupational exposure to these viruses;the number of employees who already have received training; how often trainingshould be repeated; any model training programs available and whether employeetraining should address occupational exposures only or whether it shouldaddress personal behavior that increases risks as well. The more than 350comments OSHA received comprise a record that strongly supports the needfor employee training programs and endorses the conclusion that employeetraining should be mandated as an integral part of OSHA's standard on bloodbornepathogens. The comments also provided many suggestions regarding the typesof information that should be included in a specific requirement for training,and OSHA has relied heavily on these comments in developing the proposedtraining requirements listed below. (See, for example, Exs. 11-1, 11-7,11-51, 11-57, 11-58, 11-86, 11-111, 11-156, 11-161, 11-165, 11-169, 11-187,11-233, 11-280, 11-327.) Typical of the comments received is that of the American Federation ofState, County and Municipal Employees (AFSCME) (Ex. 11-157) which addressesthe need for training as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">A critically important part of preventing injuries or illnesses inthe workplace is training workers about potential hazards and safe workingconditions. Workers shall have the same right to know about communicabledisease hazards to their health that they now have for chemical hazards(Ex. 11-157).</ITAG>The American Dental Association (ADA) noted that such training is alreadyreceived as part of a dental education. ``Dental professionals are trainedand educated in the delivery of quality dental care. Training and educationinclude infection control practices'' (Ex. 11-43). Like the proposed requirements for signs and labels, OSHA's proposal foremployee training is based on the conclusion that workers potentially exposedto bloodborne pathogens should follow universal precautions. The CDC (Ex.6-316) noted the need for training health care workers in ``the routineuse of universal blood and body-fluid precautions for all patients.'' Inaddition, the majority of commenters to the ANPR considered ``universalprecaution'' to be the correct approach for reducing occupational exposureto bloodborne pathogens. For example, the Hospital Association of Greater Des Moines (Ex. 11-23)commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">An aggressive program of * * * education and enforcement of universaland specific infection control precautions is vitally important to assurethe effectiveness of the safeguards.</ITAG>The American Occupational Medicine Association (AAOM) (Ex. 11-111) citeda specific example of employee training in universal precautions, commentingthat:<ITAG tagnum="21">Employee education in the proper use and disposal of needles combinedwith proper placement of disposable equipment is the most effective approachto minimizing needlestick injuries.</ITAG>The proposed standard would require training material to be of professionalquality that is appropriate in content and vocabulary to education level,literacy and language background of employees. This would ensure that allemployees, regardless of their cultural or education background, will receiveadequate training on infection control procedures. Many commenters suggestedsuch a provision, as seen in the citations below:<ITAG tagnum="21">Training materials shall be of professional quality and may involvea variety of media (Merck, Sharpe andamp; Dohme, Ex. 11-165). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Education must be appropriate to education level, literacy and culturalor language background * * * clarify materials to workers at all levelswith varying cultural, ethnic and literacy backgrounds (American Associationof Occupational Health Nurses (AAOHN), Ex. 11-111). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Program depth, content and frequency might vary widely depending onaudience characteristics (such as prior training, educational background,job duties, nature and degree of risk) (American Hospital Association (AHA),Ex. 11-233).</ITAG>The Service Employees International Union (SEIU) provided similar suggestionsin recommending that the following factors be taken into considerationfor training employees exposed to bloodborne pathogens:<ITAG tagnum="21">[Employee] attitudes and knowledge about these diseases; educationallevel of workers and potential barriers to training (i.e., language difficultiesof non-English speaking workers, limited literacy on the part of some workers* * *) (Ex. 11-161).</ITAG>The proposed standard would require that the training program include anexplanation of the epidemiology, symptomatology, and modes of transmissionof the diseases. This ensures a basic understanding of the diseases andthe need to observe precautions to prevent disease transmission. Thereis general agreement in the record that such information would be neededin a training program for bloodborne pathogens. For example, the SEIU envisioneda training program where ``there will be sessions on the general epidemiologyof diseases as well as a clinical explanation of the disease'' (Ex. 11-161).As a more general statement of the same principle, the National Instituteof Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) commented that ''[w]orkers requirecomplete understanding of the modes of transmission of HBV and HIV to observeproperly the protective measures required of them'' (Ex. 11-187). Similarly,the State of Maryland (Ex. 11-283), AFSCME (Ex. 11-157), and the AmericanRed Cross (ARC) (Ex. 11-280) endorsed the need for training workers tounderstand the diseases that could be transmitted by exposure. Certain individuals, for example, infection control practitioners and somevirologists, might be expected to be thoroughly familiar with some of thematerial in the training program. Is it appropriate to substitute somemeasure of competency in leiu of training for these individuals? OSHA seekscomment on this matter.OSHA believes that it is important for each worker to recognize how heor she specifically might be occupationally exposed to bloodborne pathogensand under which circumstances infection control precautions will be necessary.The proposed standard, therefore, would require employee training to includean explanation of the infection control program and of the appropriatemethods for recognizing tasks that may involve exposure to blood, and otherpotentially infectious materials. Several groups who have commented to OSHA's record on bloodborne pathogensstressed the need for workers to be able to recognize when they may beat risk of exposure. For example, the ARC (Ex. 11-280) commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Descriptions of staff duties must indicate whether duties routinelyinvolve potential for exposure to infectious agents * * * whether suchexposure might occasionally occur due to extra-ordinary circumstances ** * or whether duties do not include potential for exposure.</ITAG>Likewise, AFSCME (Ex. 11-157) pointed out that ``[t]raining should ensurethat all workers * * * can identify tasks that may involve exposure toblood or other potentially infectious body fluids.'' In suggesting a specifictraining program, the SEIU (Ex. 11-161) proposed that ``* * * workers willlearn the exposure associated with specific occupations and tasks in healthcare facilities.'' The proposed standard would require that employees be provided informationon appropriate methods for recognizing tasks and other activities thatcould involve exposure to blood or potentially infectious materials. Thiswould ensure that workers will be prepared for unusual or extraordinarycircumstances that include the potential for exposure to bloodborne pathogens.Typical of the support in the record for this provision is the followingcomment from the ARC (Ex. 11-280):<ITAG tagnum="21">Staff must understand * * * actions to be taken when confronted witha situation of potential exposure that had not been anticipated by theemployee. Such training might include knowledge of the existence of safetyprocedures applicable to the situation and the availability of assistance.</ITAG>To ensure that employees will be able to identify and implement methodsof reducing or preventing occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens,the proposed training requirements would require an explanation of theuse and limitations of appropriate engineering controls, work practicecontrols, and personal protective equipment. The proposed standard would require that employees be provided informationon the types, proper use, location, removal, handling, decontaminationand/or disposal of personal protective equipment as well as an explanationof the basis for selection and limitations of protective equipment andclothing. This would ensure that employees are knowledgeable about theproper use of personal protective equipment to achieve appropriate barrierprotection. Comments in the record support inclusion of information on personal protectiveequipment and clothing in the training program for employees. For example,AFSCME (Ex. 11-157) suggested the following:<ITAG tagnum="21">Training should ensure that all workers * * * know where all protectiveequipment is kept, how to remove, handle, decontaminate, maintain and disposeof contaminated equipment.</ITAG>The ARC (Ex. 11-280) noted that:<ITAG tagnum="21">Staff must understand * * * protective clothing and equipment (is)available and their proper use * * * all proper practices and pertinentStandard Operating Procedures, including handling, decontamination, anddisposal of contaminated clothing and equipment.</ITAG>NIOSH (Ex. 11-187) stressed the need for employee training on measuresto control exposure to bloodborne pathogens, recommending that ``[a]llworkers * * * receive detailed training on engineering controls, personalprotective clothing and equipment and work practices required for theirduties.'' According to NIOSH, this training would have to cover not onlythe proper use of protective devices, but also the inherent limitationsof those devices. The proposed standard would require that employees be provided with informationon the hepatitis B vaccine to ensure that they are aware of its efficacyand safety as well as its benefits. The vaccine is the best available meansof preventing HBV in the vast majority of workers. Nevertheless, a disappointinglylarge percentage of employees at risk remain unvaccinated, many becauseof a lack of knowledge about the vaccine including an unfounded fear ofcontracting HBV or HIV from the vaccine. According to the vaccine's manufacturer,a number of studies on worker acceptance attribute the ``underutilizationof the vaccine'' to a ``lack of information about the disease and the vaccinesafety and effectiveness'' (Ex. 11-165). In fact, a study conducted atthree teaching hospitals found that ``the amount of information receivedconcerning the need for and safety of the vaccine correlated significantlywith the level of vaccination among employees. Approximately 50% of employeeswho reported receiving adequate information were vaccinated, whereas fewerthan 20% who indicated they did not receive adequate information requestedthe vaccine (Ex. 11-165).'' Merck (Ex. 11-165) concluded that successfulvaccination programs combined ``proper education about the disease andthe vaccine, [with] * * * active support for employee vaccinations fromthe managerial staff, and * * * vaccine(s) without cost to the employees.''OSHA believes informing employees about the HBV vaccine is a critical componentof any training program. The Agency seeks comment on how this can bestbe achieved and requests interested parties to inform OSHA of specificmethods that have proven successful in encouraging employees to acceptthe vaccine. It is important that employees understand the actions to be taken if anoccupational exposure does occur as well as what medical follow-up is availablefor exposed individuals to ensure that they seek appropriate medical treatment,prophylaxis and/or post-exposure follow-up. Therefore, the proposed standardwould require an explanation of the procedure to follow if an occupationalexposure to bloodborne pathogens occurs, including the method of reportingthe incident and a description of the medical follow-up that would be madeavailable.Support for including training about exposure reporting and post-exposurefollow-up after an exposure incident was given by several commenters tothe record, such as the ARC (Ex. 11-280) who stressed that ``[s]taff mustunderstand * * * proper procedures to be followed in case of an accidentor exposure.'' Elaborating on this position, AFSCME (Ex. 11-157) stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">Training should ensure that all workers * * * know the correctiveactions to take in the event of * * * personal exposure to fluids or tissues,the appropriate reporting procedures and the medical monitoring recommendedin cases of suspected parenteral exposure.</ITAG>The AAOHN (Ex. 11-111) took an even more explicit position regarding trainingon the need for follow-up medical care in stating that:<ITAG tagnum="21">All health care workers should receive education about the counselingof occupationally exposed individuals, monitoring and surveillance activities,current management of the disease process and legal, ethical issues.</ITAG>The proposed standard would require an explanation of the required signsand labels, including color codings and ``red bagging'', to ensure thatemployees understand the warning messages presented and the need for appropriateinfection control procedures. Employees in HIV/HBV research laboratories and HIV/HBV production facilitiesmay be at especially high risk of infection following occupational exposurebecause they handle concentrated preparations of these viruses. OSHA hasconcluded that the risk is sufficiently high to warrant a requirement foradditional training in the handling of HIV/HBV. The proposed standard,therefore, would require that employees in such facilities who have occupationalexposures be trained in and demonstrate proficiency in standard microbiologicalpractices and techniques and in the practices and operations specific tothe facility <T3>before</T3> being allowed to work with HIV/HBV. The proposal would also require employees in HIV/HBV research laboratoriesand HIV/HBV production facilities to be experienced in the handling ofhuman pathogens or tissue cultures prior to working with HIV or HBV. Employeeswith no prior experience in handling human pathogens would have to participatein an on-the-job training program where initial work activities would notinclude the handling of infectious agents. A progression of work activitieswould be permitted as techniques are learned and proficiency is developed.An employee would be permitted to participate in work activities involvinginfectious agents only after proficiency has been demonstrated to ensurethat the worker is able to handle HIV or HBV as safely as possible, therebyminimizing the risk of occupationally related infection and illness. OSHA's provisions proposing to require additional training for employeesin HIV/HBV research laboratories and HIV/HBV production facilities arepatterned after the recommendations made by an expert team convened bythe Director of the National Institutes of Health (Ex. 6-312). This expertteam made the following recommendations to help assure a safe and healthfulwork environment for employees who handle concentrated preparations ofHIV: A. Strictly adhere to standard microbiologic practices and techniques:<ITAG tagnum="21">The most important recommendation is to adhere strictly to standardmicrobiologic practices and techniques. Persons working with HIV must beaware of potential hazards and must be trained and proficient in practiceand techniques necessary for self-protection. Employees must be informedthat parenteral exposure is the most serious potential hazard for causinga laboratory-acquired infection. They must be able to recognize how suchexposures occur and how they can be prevented. Although on-the-job trainingis an acceptable approach for learning techniques and practices, it isimperative that proficiency be obtained before virus is actually handled.Initial work activities should not include the handling of virus. A progressionof work activities should be assigned as techniques are learned and proficiencyis developed.</ITAG>B. Assure that workers are proficient in virus-handling techniques:<ITAG tagnum="21">Selection criteria for employees who will work in production operationsor with concentrated preparations of HIV should require experience in thehandling of human pathogens or tissue cultures. If an employee has nothad such experience, s/he should participate in carefully structured, well-supervisedon-the-job training programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The director or person in charge of the laboratory or production facilitymust ensure that personnel are appropriately trained and are proficientin practices and techniques necessary for self-protection. Initial workactivities should not include the handling of virus. A progression of workactivities should be assigned as techniques are learned and proficiencyis developed. Virus should only be introduced into the work activitiesafter the supervisor is confident it can be handled safely. </ITAG>Paragraph (h) Recordkeeping The proposed rule would require that employers maintain records relatedto hepatitis B vaccination and post exposure follow-up and training. Theserequirements are in accordance with section 8(c) of the Act which authorizesthe promulgation of regulations requiring an employer to keep necessaryand appropriate records regarding activities to permit the enforcementof the Act, or to develop information regarding the causes and preventionof occupational illnesses. OSHA has determined that, in this context, requiringemployers to maintain medical and training records is necessary and appropriate.In addition, medical records are necessary for the proper evaluation ofthe employee's immune status and for proper medical management followingan exposure incident. The proposed standard would require employers to maintain medical recordswhich include: (1) The name and social security number of the employee;(2) a copy of the employee's hepatitis B vaccination records and medicalrecords relative to the employee's ability to receive the HBV vaccine orthe circumstances of an exposure incident; (3) a copy of all results ofphysical examinations, medical testing and follow-up procedures as theyrelate to the employee's ability to receive vaccination or to post-exposureevaluation following an exposure incident; (4) the employer's copy of thephysician's written opinion; and (5) a copy of the information providedto the physician as required by paragraph (f) of this proposed standard.The proposed standard requires that the employer keep the employee's medicalrecord confidential. OSHA has attempted to reduce barriers to exposurereporting by requiring that medical records, including all test results,be kept confidential except as otherwise required by law. Fear that coworkersor others may see test results may discourage the reporting of exposureincidents and seeking follow-up care. OSHA recognizes the sensitive natureof HIV testing and the possible repercussions should that test be positive.Unfortunately, some individuals have suffered the loss of their jobs, homes,medical and life insurance, and have been otherwise stigmatized as a resultof testing positive for antibody to HIV. This provision would assure thattesting results would not be disclosed and would encourage exposure reporting.The time period for retention of medical records is the duration of employmentplus thirty years which is consistent with 29 CFR 1910.20. The transferof employee medical records is to be in accordance with the provisionsof paragraph (h) of 29 CFR 1910.20. If an employer ceases to do businessand there is no successor employer, the employer is to notify NIOSH atleast three months prior to the disposal of the records and to transmitthem to the Director for retention, if requested. The employer may ceaseto do business before or during this time period. However, the recordsmust be retained for at least 3 months after NIOSH is notified. The proposed rule would require employers to maintain training recordswhich include: (1) The dates of the training sessions; (2) the contentsor a summary of the training session; (3) the names of the persons conductingthe training; and (4) the names of all persons attending the training sessions.The time period for retention of training records is five years. Maintainingthese training records for five years will facilitate review of the content,consistency, and completeness of the training program by OSHA and the employer.The transfer of training records is to be in accordance with the provisionsof paragraph (h) of 29 CFR 1910.20. OSHA believes that these records arenecessary and appropriate to the enforcement of the standard. The access provisions of this proposed standard are consistent with 29CFR 1910.20. Employees and their designated representatives are, in general,allowed unrestricted access to training records. Access to medical recordsis also provided for employees and, if the employee has given specificwritten consent, for the employee's designated representative. OSHA retainsunrestricted access to both these medical and training records, but theAgency's access to personally identifiable medical records is subject toregulations designed to protect privacy which have been published at 29CFR 1913.10 (see 45 FR 35584). Paragraph (i). Dates As proposed, the final rule would become effective thirty (30) days afterpublication in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>This will allow time for public distributionand give employers time to familiarize themselves with the standard. Thevarious provisions have phased-in effective dates. The employers initial duty under the standard is the exposure determinationrequired by paragraph (c)(1) of this section and would have to be completedwithin ninety days of the effective date of the standard. The employerwould then have an additional 30 days (120 days after the effective date)to complete the infection control plan required by paragraph (c)(2). Thirty days later, 150 days after the effective date of the standard, paragraphs(d)(2) engineering controls and work practice controls, (d)(3) personalprotective equipment, (d)(4) housekeeping, (e) HIV and HBV research laboratoriesand production facilities, (f) hepatitis B vaccination and post-exposurefollow-up, (g) communication of hazards to the employee, and (h) recordkeepingwould take effect. Since many employers have many of these provisions already in effect throughcurrent infection control plans and the implementation of universal precautions,OSHA believes that these dates provide adequate time for compliance.<ITAG tagnum="84">X. Public Participation_Notice of Hearing </ITAG>Pursuant to section 6(b)(3) of the Act, an opportunity to submit oral testimonyconcerning the issues raised by the proposed standard including economicand environmental impacts, will be provided at three informal public hearingsscheduled to begin at 10:00 a.m. at places and on dates as follows: Washington, DC: September 12, 1989. The Auditorium, Frances Perkins Departmentof Labor Building, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210.Chicago, IL: October 17, 1989. Parlor A, Palmer House, 17 East Monroe Street,Chicago, IL 60603. San Francisco, CA: October 24, 1989. The Crystal Ballroom, San FranciscanHotel, 1231 Market Street, San Francisco, CA 94103. Notice of Intention to Appear All persons desiring to participate at the hearing must file in quadruplicatea Notice of Intention to Appear, postmarked on or before August 14, 1989,addressed to Mr. Tom Hall, OSHA Division of Consumer Affairs, Docket H-370,Room N-3647, U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington,DC 20210; telephone (202) 523-8615. A Notice of Intention to Appear alsomay be transmitted by facsimile to (202) 523-5046 or (for FTS) to 8-523-5046,provided the original and 4 copies of the Notice are sent to the aboveaddress thereafter. The Notices of Intention to Appear, which will be available for inspectionand copying at the OSHA Technical Data Center Docket Office, Room N-2625,200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington DC 20210, telephone (202) 523-7894,must contain the following information: (1) The name, address, and telephone number of each person to appear; (2) The capacity in which the person will appear; (3) The approximate amount of time requested for the presentation; (4) The specific issues that will be addressed; (5) A statement of the position that will be taken with respect to eachissue addressed; (6) Whether the party intends to submit documentary evidence, and if so,a brief summary of that evidence; and (7) Whether the party wishes to testify on the days set aside to focuson hepatitis B vaccination. (8) At which hearing or hearings the party wishes to testify. Filing of Testimony and Evidence Before Hearing Any party requesting more than 10 minutes for a presentation at the hearing,or who will submit documentary evidence, must provide in quadruplicatethe complete text of his testimony, including any documentary evidenceto be presented at the hearing, to the OSHA Division of Consumer Affairs.This material must be received by August 31, 1989, for the Washington,DC hearing and September 29, 1989, for the Chicago, IL and San Fransisco,CA hearings, and it will be available for inspection and copying at theTechnical Data Center Docket Office. Each such submission will be reviewedin light of the amount of time requested in the Notice of Intention toAppear. In those instances where the information contained in the submissiondoes not justify the amount of time requested, a more appropriate amountof time will be allocated and the participant will be notified of thatfact. Any party who has not substantially complied with this requirement maybe limited to a 10-minute presentation. Any party who has not filed a Noticeof Intention to Appear may be allowed to testify, as time permits, at thediscretion of the Administrative Law Judge. OSHA emphasizes that the hearing is open to the public, and that interestedpersons are welcome to attend. However, only persons who have filed propernotices of intention to appear at the hearing will be entitled to ask questionsand otherwise participate fully in the proceeding. Conduct and Nature of Hearing The hearing will commence at 10 a.m., on September 12, 1989. At that timeany procedural matters relating to the proceeding will be resolved. The nature of the informal rule making hearings to be held is establishedin the legislative history of section 6 of the Act and is reflected bythe OSHA hearing regulations (see 29 CFR 1911.15(a)). Although the presidingofficer is an Administrative Law Judge and questioning by interested personsis allowed on crucial issues, it is clear that the proceeding shall remaininformal and legislative in type. The essential intent is to provide anopportunity for effective oral presentation by interested persons whichcan be carried out expeditiously and in the absence of rigid procedureswhich might unduly impede or protract the rulemaking process. The hearings will be conducted in accordance with 29 CFR Part 1911. Thehearing will be presided over by an Administrative Law Judge who will haveall the powers necessary and appropriate to conduct a full and fair informalhearing as provided in 29 CFR 1911 including the powers: (1) To regulate the course of the proceedings; (2) To dispose of procedural requests, objections and comparable matters;(3) To confine the presentation to the matters pertinent to the issuesraised;(4) To regulate the conduct of those present at the hearing by appropriatemeans; (5) In the Judge's discretion, to question and permit the questioning ofany witness and to limit the time for questioning; and (6) In the Judge's discretion, to keep the record open for a reasonable,stated time to receive written information and additional data, views,and arguments from any person who has participated in the oral proceedings.Written Comments Interested persons are invited to submit written comments on the issuesraised in the proposal and summarized in this notice. Written commentsmust be postmarked on or before August 14, 1989, and submitted in quadruplicateto the Docket Office, Docket Number H-370, Room N-2625, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Ave. NW., Washington, DC 20210. The telephonenumber of the Docket Office is (202) 523-7894, and its hours of operationare 8:15 a.m. to 4:45 p.m. Monday through Friday except Federal holidays.Comments limited to 10 pages or less in length may also be transmittedby facsimile to (202) 523-5046 or (for FTS) to 8-523-5046, provided theoriginal and 4 copies of the comment are sent to the Docket Officer thereafter.Written submissions must clearly identify the provisions of the proposalwhich are addressed and the position taken on each issue. All materials submitted will be available for inspection and copying atthis address. All timely submissions will be part of the record of theproceeding. Information on Hepatitis B Vaccination Issues for the Public Hearing OSHA seeks to gather additional information related to hepatitis B vaccinationduring the written comment period and the public hearing. Since the employee'sparticipation in the hepatitis B vaccination program is voluntary, OSHAis particularly interested in existing HBV vaccination programs that haveachieved a high degree of voluntary employee compliance. The Agency willattempt to identify those elements that are common to successful programsand will provide this information to all employers. In addition, we arealso seeking information on other issues including availability, cost andany potential distribution problems that are associated with initiatingthe vaccination of large numbers of employees within the 150 day periodfollowing the effective date of the standard. The Agency intends to designate several days of the Washington, DC hearingto focus on the issues surrounding HBV vaccination. We encourage hearingparticipants whose primary testimony will involve hepatitis B vaccinationto indicate this in their Notice of Intention To Appear, and OSHA willattempt to schedule these participants on the days of the hearing thatare set aside to focus on Hepatitis B vaccination. Other participants whosetestimony will not be primarily on HBV vaccination issues but who wishto address HBV vaccination will be scheduled on another day, but they mayenter a separate statement in the record during this period. In any case,participants are free to discuss hepatitis B vaccination or any other issuerelated to this standard whenever they present their testimony. Certification of Record and Final Determination After Hearing Following the close of the hearing, the presiding Administrative Law Judgewill certify the record of the hearing to the Assistant Secretary of Laborfor Occupational Safety and Health. The Administrative Law Judge does notmake or recommend any decisions as to the content of the final standard.The proposed standard will be reviewed in light of all testimony and writtensubmissions received as part of the record, and a standard will be issued,based on the entire record of the proceeding, including the written commentsand data received from the public. <ITAG tagnum="84">XI. Authority and Signature </ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of Alan C. McMillan, ActingAssistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington, DC 20210. Accordingly, pursuant to sections 6(b), 8(c) and 8(g) of the OccupationalSafety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 655, 657), 29 CFR Part 1911 andSecretary of Labor's Order No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736), 29 CFR Part 1910 isproposed to be amended as set forth below. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1910 </ITAG>AIDS, Hepatitis B, Human Immunodeficiency Virus, Blood, Blood diseases,Communicable disease, Health, Healthcare, Health professions, Hospitals,Protective equipment, Immunization, Medical research, Occupational safetyand health.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC on this 19th day of May, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Alan C. McMillan, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Assistant Secretary of Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">XII. The Proposed Standard</ITAG>General IndustryParts 1910 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations are proposedto be amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1910_[AMENDED]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart Z_[Amended]</ITAG>1. The general authority citation for Subpart Z of 29 CFR Part 1910 continuesto read as follows and a new citation for andSection; 1910.1030 is added:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 6 and 8, Occupational Safety and Health Act,29 U.S.C. 655, 657, Secretary of Labor's Orders Nos. 12-71 (36 FR 8754),8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48 FR 35736), as applicable; and 29 CFR Part1911.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 1910.1030 also issued under 29 U.S.C. 653.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>2. Section 1910.1030 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1910.1030</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bloodborne pathogens. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope and application.</T3> This section applies to all occupationalexposure to blood or other potentially infectious materials as definedby paragraph (b) of this section. (b) <T3>Definitions.</T3> For purposes of this section, the following shallapply: ``Assistant Secretary'' means the Assistant Secretary of Labor for OccupationalSafety and Health, or designated representative. ``Blood'' means human blood, human blood components and products made fromhuman blood. ``Bloodborne Pathogens'' means pathogenic microorganisms that are presentin human blood and can cause disease in humans. These pathogens include,but are not limited to, hepatitis B virus (HBV) and human immunodeficiencyvirus (HIV). ``Clinical Laboratory'' means a workplace where diagnostic or other screeningprocedures are performed on blood or other potentially infectious materials.``Director'' means the Director of the National Institute for OccupationalSafety and Health, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, or designatedrepresentative. ``Disinfect'' means to inactivate virtually all recognized pathogenic microorganismsbut not necessarily all microbial forms (e.g. bacterial endospores) oninanimate objects. ``Engineering Controls'' means controls that isolate or remove the hazardfrom the workplace. ``Exposure Incident'' means a specific eye, mouth, other mucous membrane,non-intact skin, or parenteral contact with blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials that results from the performance of an employee'sduties. ``Infectious Waste'' means blood and blood products, contaminated sharps,pathological wastes, and microbiological wastes. ``Occupational Exposure'' means reasonably anticipated skin, eye, mucousmembrane, or parenteral contact with blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials that may result from the performance of an employee's duties.This definition excludes incidental exposures that may take place on thejob, and that are neither reasonably nor routinely expected and that theworker is not required to incur in the normal course of employment. ``Other Potentially Infectious Materials'' means (1) The following body fluids: semen, vaginal secretions, cerebrospinalfluid, synovial fluid, pleural fluid, pericardial fluid, peritoneal fluid, amniotic fluid, saliva in dental procedures, and any body fluid thatis visibly contaminated with blood. (2) Any unfixed tissue or organ (other than intact skin) from a human (livingor dead) and (3) HIV- or HBV-containing cell or tissue cultures, organ cultures, andculture medium or other solutions; and blood, organs or other tissues fromexperimental animals infected with HIV or HBV. ``Parenteral'' means exposure occurring as a result of piercing the skinbarrier (e.g. subcutaneous, intramuscular, intravenous routes). ``Patient'' means any individual, living or dead, whose blood, body fluids,tissues, or organs may be a source of exposure to the employee. Examplesinclude, but are not limited to, hospital and clinic patients; clientsin institutions for the mentally retarded; trauma victims; clients of drugand alcohol treatment facilities; residents of hospices and nursing homes;human remains prior to embalming; and individuals who donate or sell bloodor blood components.``Personal Protective Equipment'' is specialized clothing or equipmentworn by an employee to protect him/her from a hazard. ``Production Facility'' means a facility engaged in industrial-scale, large-volumeproduction of HIV or HBV or in high concentration production of HIV orHBV. ``Research Laboratory'' means a laboratory producing research-laboratory-scaleamounts of HIV or HBV. ``Sharps'' means any object that can penetrate the skin including, butnot limited to, needles, scalpels, and broken capillary tubes. ``Sterilize'' means the use of a physical or chemical procedure to destroyall microbial life including highly resistant bacterial endospores. ``Universal precautions'' is a method of infection control in which allhuman blood and certain human body fluids are treated as if known to beinfectious for HIV, HBV and other bloodborne pathogens. ``Work Practice Controls'' means controls that reduce the likelihood ofexposure by altering the manner in which a task is performed. (c) <T3>Infection control</T3>_ (1) <T3>Exposure Determination</T3>. (i) Each employer who has employees withoccupational exposure as defined by paragraph (b) of this section shallidentify and document those tasks and procedures where occupational exposuresmay take place. (ii) Each employer shall identify and document all positions with occupationalexposure. (iii) This exposure determination shall be made without regard to the useof personal protective equipment. (2) <T3>Infection Control Plan</T3>. (i) Each employer having employees whosereasonably anticipated duties may result in occupational exposure shallestablish a written infection control plan designed to minimize or eliminateemployee exposure. (ii) This infection control plan shall contain the following as a minimum:(A) The exposure determination required by paragraph (c)(1) and (B) The schedule and method of implementation for each of the applicableparagraphs of this standard. (iii) This infection control plan shall be reviewed and updated as necessaryto reflect significant changes in tasks or procedures. (iv) The infection control plan shall be made available to the AssistantSecretary and the Director for examination and copying. (d) <T3>Methods of Compliance</T3>_ (1) <T3>General</T3>. Universal precautions shall be observed to prevent contactwith blood and other potentially infectious materials, unless those precautionswould interfere with the proper delivery of health care or public safetyservices in a particular circumstance, or would create a significant riskto the personal safety of the worker. (2) <T3>Engineering and work practice controls</T3>. (i) Engineering controlsshall be examined and maintained or replaced on a regular schedule to ensuretheir effectiveness. (ii) Employees shall wash their hands immediately or as soon as possibleafter removal of gloves or other personal protective equipment and afterhand contact with blood or other potentially infectious materials. (iii) All personal protective equipment shall be removed immediately uponleaving the work area or as soon as possible if overtly contaminated andplaced in an appropriately designated area or container for storage, washing,decontamination or disposal. (iv) Used needles and other sharps shall not be sheared, bent, broken,recapped, or resheathed by hand. Used needles shall not be removed fromdisposable syringes. (v) Eating, drinking, smoking, applying cosmetics or lip balm, and handlingcontact lenses are prohibited in work areas where there is a potentialfor occupational exposure. (vi) Food and drink shall not be stored in refrigerators, freezers, orcabinets where blood or other potentially infectious materials are storedor in other areas of possible contamination. (vii) All procedures involving blood or other potentially infectious materialsshall be performed in such a manner as to minimize splashing, spraying,and aerosolization of these substances. (viii) Mouth pipetting/suctioning is prohibited. (3) <T3>Personal protective equipment</T3>_ (i) <T3>Provision and Use</T3>. When there is a potential for occupationalexposure, the employer shall provide and assure that the employee usesappropriate personal protective equipment such as, but not limited to,gloves; gowns, fluid-proof aprons, laboratory coats, and head and footcoverings; face shields or masks and eye protection; and mouthpieces, resuscitationbags, pocket masks, or other ventilation devices.(ii) <T3>Accessibility. </T3>The employer shall assure that appropriate personalprotective equipment in the appropriate sizes is readily accessible atthe worksite or issued to employees. Hypoallergenic gloves shall be readilyaccessible to those employees who are allergic to the gloves normally provided.(iii) <T3>Cleaning. </T3>The employer shall provide for the cleaning, launderingor disposal of personal protective equipment required by paragraphs (d)and (e) of this standard. (iv) <T3>Repair and replacement. </T3>The employer shall repair or replace requiredpersonal protective equipment as needed to maintain its effectiveness.(v) <T3>Gloves. </T3>Gloves shall be worn when the employee has the potentialfor the hands to have direct skin contact with blood, other potentiallyinfectious materials, mucous membranes, non-intact skin, and when handlingitems or surfaces soiled with blood or other potentially infectious materials.(A) Disposable (single use) gloves, such as surgical or examination gloves,shall be replaced as soon as possible when visibly soiled, torn, punctured,or when their ability to function as a barrier is compromised. They shallnot be washed or disinfected for re-use. (B) Utility gloves may be disinfected for re-use if the integrity of theglove is not compromised, however they must be discarded if they are cracked,peeling, discolored, torn, punctured, or exhibit other signs of deterioration.(vi) <T3>Masks, Eye Protection, and Face Shields. </T3>Masks and eye protectionor chin-length face shields shall be worn whenever splashes, spray, spatter,droplets, or aerosols of blood or other potentially infectious materialsmay be generated and there is a potential for eye, nose, or mouth contamination.(vii) <T3>Gowns, Aprons, and Other Protective Body Clothing. </T3>Appropriateprotective clothing shall be worn when the employee has a potential foroccupational exposure. The type and characteristics will depend upon thetask and degree of exposure anticipated; however, the clothing selectedshall form an effective barrier. (A) Gowns, lab coats, aprons, or similar clothing shall be worn if thereis a potential for soiling of clothes with blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials. (B) Fluid-resistant clothing shall be worn if there is a potential forsplashing or spraying of blood or other potentially infectious materials.(C) Surgical caps or hoods shall be worn if there is a potential for splashingor splattering of blood or other potentially infectious materials on thehead. (D) Fluid-proof clothing shall be worn if there is a potential for clothingbecoming soaked with blood or other potentially infectious materials. (E) Fluid-proof shoe covers shall be worn if there is a potential for shoesto become contaminated and/or soaked with blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials. (4) <T3>Housekeeping_</T3>(i) <T3>General. </T3>Employers shall assure that the worksite is maintainedin a clean and sanitary condition. The employer shall determine and implementthe appropriate written schedule for cleaning and method of disinfectionbased upon the location within the facility, type of surface to be cleaned,type of soil present, and tasks or procedures being performed. (ii) <T3>Cleaning and Disinfection. </T3>All equipment and environmental andworking surfaces shall be properly cleaned and disinfected after contactwith blood or other potentially infectious materials. (A) Work surfaces shall be decontaminated with an appropriate disinfectantafter completion of procedures; when surfaces are overtly contaminated;immediately after any spill of blood or other potentially infectious materials;and at the end of the work shift. (B) Protective coverings such as plastic wrap, aluminum foil, or imperviously-backedabsorbent paper may be used to cover equipment and environmental surfaces.These coverings shall be removed and replaced at the end of the work shiftor when they become overtly contaminated. (C) Equipment which may become contaminated with blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials shall be checked routinely and prior to servicingor shipping and shall be decontaminated as necessary. (D) All bins, pails, cans, and similar receptacles intended for reuse whichhave a potential for becoming contaminated with blood or other potentiallyinfectious materials shall be inspected, cleaned, and disinfected on aregularly scheduled basis and cleaned and disinfected immediately or assoon as possible upon visible contamination. (E) Broken glassware which may be contaminated shall not be picked up directlywith the hands. It shall be cleaned up using mechanical means, such asa brush and dust pan, a vacuum cleaner, tongs, cotton swabs or forceps.(F) Specimens of blood or other potentially infectious materials shallbe placed in a closable, leakproof container labeled or color-coded accordingto paragraph (g)(1)(ii) prior to being stored or transported. If outsidecontamination of the primary container is likely, then a second leakproofcontainer that is labeled or color-coded according to paragraph (g)(1)(ii)shall be placed over the outside of the first and closed to prevent leakageduring handling, storage, or transport. If puncture of the primary containeris likely, it shall be placed within a leakproof, puncture-resistant secondarycontainer. (G) Reusable items contaminated with blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials shall be decontaminated prior to washing and/or reprocessing.(iii) <T3>Infectious Waste Disposal. </T3>(A) All infectious waste destined fordisposal shall be placed in closable, leakproof containers or bags thatare color coded or labeled as required by paragraph (g)(1)(ii) of thisstandard. (<T3>1</T3>) If outside contamination of the container or bag is likelyto occur then a second leakproof container or bag which is closable andlabeled or color-coded as described in paragraph (g)(1)(ii) shall be placedover the outside of the first and closed to prevent leakage during handling,storage, and transport. (<T3>2</T3>) Disposal of all infectious waste shall be in accordance withapplicable Federal, state, and local regulations. (B) Immediately after use, sharps shall be disposed of in closable, punctureresistant, disposable containers which are leakproof on the sides and bottomand that are labeled or color-coded according to paragraph (g)(1)(ii).(<T3>1</T3>) These containers shall be easily accessible to personnel andlocated in the immediate area of use. (<T3>2</T3>) These containers shall be replaced routinely and not allowedto overfill. (iv) <T3>Laundry. </T3>(A) Laundry from workplaces with employees covered underparagraph (a) of this section that is contaminated with blood or otherpotentially infectious materials or may contain contaminated sharps shallbe treated as if it were contaminated and shall be handled as little aspossible and with a minimum of agitation. (<T3>1</T3>) Contaminated laundry shall be bagged at the location whereit was used and shall not be sorted or rinsed in patient-care areas. (<T3>2</T3>) Contaminated laundry shall be placed and transported in bagsthat are labeled or color-coded as described in paragraph (g)(1)(ii). Wheneverthis laundry is wet and presents the potential for soak-through of or leakagefrom the bag, it shall be placed and transported in leakproof bags. (B) The employer shall ensure that laundry workers wear protective glovesand other appropriate personal protective equipment to prevent occupationalexposure during handling or sorting. (e) <T3>HIV and HBV Research Laboratories and Production Facilities. </T3>(1)This paragraph applies to research laboratories and production facilitiesengaged in the culture, production, concentration, and manipulation ofHIV and HBV. It does not apply to clinical or diagnostic laboratories engagedsolely in the analysis of blood, tissues, or organs. These requirementsapply in addition to the other requirements of the standard. (2) Research laboratories and production facilities shall meet the followingcriteria: (i) <T3>Standard microbiological practices. </T3>All infectious liquid or solidwaste shall be decontaminated before being disposed of. (ii) <T3>Special practices. </T3>(A) Laboratory doors shall be kept closed whenwork involving HIV or HBV is in progress. (B) Contaminated materials that are to be decontaminated at a site awayfrom the work area shall be placed in a durable, leakproof container thatis closed before being removed from the work area. (C) Access to the work area shall be limited to authorized persons only.Policies and procedures shall be established whereby only persons who havebeen advised of the potential biohazard, who meet any specific entry requirements,and who comply with all entry and exit procedures shall be allowed to enterthe work areas and animal rooms. (D) When potentially infectious materials or infected animals are presentin the work area or containment module, a hazard warning sign incorporatingthe universal biohazard symbol shall be posted on all access doors. Thehazard warning sign shall comply with the provisions outlined in paragraph(g)(1)(i) of this standard. (E) All activities involving potentially infectious materials shall beconducted in biological safety cabinets or other physical-containment deviceswithin the containment module. No work shall be conducted in open vesselson the open bench.(F) Laboratory coats, gowns, smocks, uniforms, or other appropriate protectiveclothing shall be used in the work area and animal rooms. Protective clothingshall not be worn outside of the work area and shall be decontaminatedbefore being laundered. (G) Special care shall be taken to avoid skin contamination with potentiallyinfectious materials. Gloves shall be worn when handling infected animalsand when making hand contact with potentially infectious materials is unavoidable.(H) All waste from work areas including animal rooms shall be decontaminatedbefore disposal. (I) Vacuum lines shall be protected with high-efficiency particulate air(HEPA) filters and liquid disinfectant traps. (J) Hypodermic needles and syringes shall be used only for parenteral injectionand aspiration of fluids from laboratory animals and diaphragm bottles.Only needle-locking syringes or disposable syringe-needle units (i.e.,the needle is integral to the syringe) shall be used for the injectionor aspiration of potentially infectious fluids. Extreme caution shall beused when handling needles and syringes to avoid autoinoculation and thegeneration of aerosols during use and disposal. A needle shall not be bent,sheared, replaced in the sheath or guard, or removed from the syringe followinguse. The needle and syringe shall be promptly placed in a puncture-resistantcontainer and decontaminated, preferably by autoclaving, before being discardedor reused. (K) Spills and accidents that result in overt exposures of employees topotentially infectious materials shall be immediately reported to the laboratorydirector or other responsible person. (L) A biosafety manual shall be prepared or adopted. Personnel shall beadvised of potential hazards, shall be required to read instructions onpractices and procedures, and shall be required to follow them. (iii) <T3>Containment equipment. </T3>(A) Certified biological safety cabinets(Class I, II, or III) or other appropriate combinations of personal protectionor physical containment devices, such as special protective clothing, respirators,centrifuge safety cups, sealed centrifuge rotors, and containment cagingfor animals, shall be used for all activities with potentially infectiousmaterials that pose a threat of exposure to droplets, splashes, spills,or aerosols. (B) Biological safety cabinets shall be certified when installed, wheneverthey are moved and at least annually. (3) HIV and HBV research laboratories shall meet the following criteria:(i) Each laboratory shall contain a sink for hand washing. (ii) An autoclave for decontamination of infectious laboratory waste shallbe available. (4) HIV and HBV production facilities shall meet the following criteria:(i) The work areas shall be separated from areas that are open to unrestrictedtraffic flow within the building. Passage through two sets of doors shallbe the basic requirement for entry into the work area from access corridorsor other contiguous areas. Physical separation of the high-containmentwork area from access corridors or other areas or activities may also beprovided by a double-doored clothes-change room (showers may be included),airlock, or other access facility that requires passing through two setsof doors before entering the work area. (ii) The interior surfaces of walls, floors and ceilings shall be waterresistant so that they can be easily cleaned. Penetrations in these surfacesshall be sealed or capable of being sealed to facilitate decontaminationof the work area. (iii) Each work area shall contain a sink for washing hands. The sink shallbe foot, elbow, or automatically operated and shall be located near theexit door of the work area.(iv) Access doors to the work area or containment module shall be self-closing.(v) An autoclave for decontamination of infectious waste shall be availablewithin or as near as possible to the work area. (vi) A ducted exhaust-air ventilation system shall be provided. This systemshall create directional airflow that draws air into the work area throughthe entry area. The exhaust air shall not be recirculated to any otherarea of the building, shall be discharged to the outside, and shall bedispersed away from occupied areas and air intakes. The proper directionof the airflow shall be verified (i.e., into the work area). (5) Training requirements. Additional training requirements for employeesin HIV and HBV research laboratories and HIV and HBV production facilitiesare specified in paragraph (g)(2)(v). <T3>(f) Hepatitis B Vaccination and Post Exposure Follow-up</T3>_(1) <T3>General</T3>. (i) The employer shall make available hepatitis B vaccinationto all employees who have occupational exposure on average one or moretimes per month and post-exposure follow-up for all employees with an occupationalexposure incident. (ii) The employer shall assure that all medical evaluations and proceduresare performed by or under the supervision of a licensed physician and thatall laboratory tests are conducted by an accredited laboratory. (iii) The employer shall assure that all evaluations, procedures, vaccinations,and post-exposure management are provided to the employee at a reasonabletime and place, and according to standard recommendations for medical practice.(2) <T3>HBV Vaccination</T3>. (i) HBV vaccination shall be offered to all employeesoccupationally exposed on an average of one or more times per month toblood or other potentially infectious materials, unless the employee hasa previous HBV vaccination or unless antibody testing has revealed thatthe employee is immune. If the employee initially declines HBV vaccinationbut at a later date while still covered under the standard decides to acceptthe HBV vaccine, the employer shall provide the vaccine at that time. Shoulda booster dose(s) be recommended at a future date, such booster dose(s)shall be provided according to standard recommendations for medical practice.(ii) HBV antibody testing shall be made available to an employee who desiressuch testing prior to deciding whether or not to receive HBV vaccination.If the employee is found to be immune to HBV by virtue of adequate antibodytiter, then the employer is not required to offer the HBV vaccine to thatemployee. (3) <T3>Post exposure evaluation and follow-up. </T3>Following a report ofan exposure incident, the employer shall make available to each employeecovered by paragraph (a) a confidential medical evaluation and follow-up,including at least the following elements: (i) Documentation of the route(s) of exposure, HBV and HIV antibody statusof the source patient(s) (if known), and the circumstances under whichthe exposure occurred.(ii) If the source patient can be determined and permission is obtained,collection of and testing of the source patient's blood to determine thepresence of HIV or HBV infection. (iii) Collection of blood from the exposed employee as soon as possibleafter the exposure incident for the determination of HIV and/or HBV status.Actual antibody or antigen testing of the blood or serum sample may bedone at that time or at a later date if the employee so requests. (iv) Follow-up of the exposed employee including antibody or antigen testing,counseling, illness reporting, and safe and effective post-exposure prophylaxis,according to standard recommendations for medical practice. (4) <T3>Information provided to the physician.</T3> The employer shall providethe following information to the evaluating physician: (i) A copy of this regulation and its appendices and (ii) A description of the affected employee's duties as they relate tothe employee's occupational exposure. (5) <T3>Physician's written opinion.</T3> For each evaluation under this section,the employer shall obtain and provide the employee with a copy of the evaluatingphysician's written opinion within 15 working days of the completion ofthe evaluation. The written opinion shall be limited to the following information:(i) The physician's recommended limitations upon the employee's abilityto receive hepatitis B vaccination. (ii) A statement that the employee has been informed of the results ofthe medical evaluation and that the employee has been told about any medicalconditions resulting from exposure to blood or other potentially infectiousmaterials which require further evaluation or treatment. (iii) Specific findings or diagnoses, which are related to the employee'sability to receive HBV vaccination. Any other findings and diagnoses shallremain confidential. (6) <T3>Medical recordkeeping.</T3> Medical records required by this standardshall be maintained in accordance with paragraph (h)(1) of this section.(g) <T3>Communication of Hazards to Employees</T3>_(1) <T3>Signs and Labels</T3>_(i) <T3>Signs.</T3> The employer shall post signs at the entrance to work areasspecified in paragraph (e) of this standard which shall bear the followinglegend:<G/><ITAG tagnum="91">insert illus 469A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="92"/><ITAG tagnum="15">[Name of the Infectious Agent] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">[Special requirements for entering the area] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">[Name, telephone number of the laboratory director or other responsibleperson.] </ITAG>(ii) <T3>Labels.</T3> (A) Warning labels shall be affixed to containers of infectiouswaste; refrigerators and freezers containing blood and other potentiallyinfectious materials; and other containers used to store or transport bloodor other potentially infectious materials except as provided in paragraph(g)(1)(ii) (E) and (F). (B) Labels required by this section shall include the following legend:<G/><ITAG tagnum="91">insert illus 470A</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="92"/>(C) These labels shall be fluorescent orange or orange-red or predominantlyso, with lettering or symbols in a contrasting color. (D) Labels required by paragraph (g)(1)(ii) shall either be an integralpart of the container or shall be affixed as close as safely possible tothe container by string, wire, adhesive, or other method that preventstheir loss or unintentional removal. (E) Red bags or red containers may be substituted for labels on containersof infectious waste. (F) Containers of blood or blood components that are labeled as to theircontents and have been released for distribution are exempted from thelabeling requirements of paragraph (g). (2) <T3>Information and Training</T3>. (i) Employers shall ensure that allemployees with occupational exposure participate in a training program.(ii) Training shall be provided at the time of initial employment or within90 days after the effective date of this standard and at least annuallythereafter. (iii) Material appropriate in content and vocabulary to educational level,literacy, and language background of employees shall be used. (iv) The training program shall contain the following elements: (A) A copy of this standard and an explanation of its contents; (B) A general explanation of the epidemiology and symptoms of bloodbornediseases; (C) An explanation of the modes of transmission of bloodborne pathogens;(D) An explanation of the employer's infection control program. (E) An explanation of the appropriate methods for recognizing tasks andother activities that may involve exposure to blood and other potentiallyinfectious materials; (F) An explanation of the use and limitations of practices that will preventor reduce exposure including appropriate engineering controls, work practices,and personal protective equipment; (G) Information on the types, proper use, location, removal, handling,decontamination and/or disposal of personal protective equipment; (H) An explanation of the basis for selection of personal protective equipment;(I) Information on the hepatitis B vaccine, including information on itsefficacy, safety, and the benefits of being vaccinated. (J) Information on the appropriate actions to take and persons to contactin an emergency; (K) An explanation of the procedure to follow if an exposure incident occurs,including the method of reporting the incident and the medical follow-upthat will be made available. Also information on the medical counselingthat the employer is providing for exposed individuals; and (L) An explanation of the signs and labels and/or color coding requiredby paragraph (g)(1). (v) Additional training. Employees in HIV or HBV research laboratoriesand HIV or HBV production facilities shall receive the following trainingin addition to the above training requirements: (A) Employees shall be trained in and demonstrate proficiency in standardmicrobiological practices and techniques and in the practices and operationsspecific to the facility before being allowed to work with HIV or HBV.(B) Employees shall be experienced in the handling of human pathogens ortissue cultures prior to working with HIV or HBV. (C) A training program shall be provided to employees who have no priorexperience in handling human pathogens. Initial work activities shall notinclude the handling of infectious agents. A progression of work activitiesshall be assigned as techniques are learned and proficiency is developed.The employee shall participate in work activities involving infectiousagents only after proficiency has been demonstrated. (h) <T3>Recordkeeping</T3>_(1) <T3>Medical records</T3>. (i) The employer shall establish and maintainan accurate record for each employee subject to paragraph (f) of this section,in accordance with 29 CFR 1910.20. (ii) This record shall include: (A) The name and social security number of the employee;(B) A copy of the employee's hepatitis B vaccination records and medicalrecords relative to the employee's ability to receive vaccination or thecircumstances of an exposure incident; (C) A copy of all results of physical examinations, medical testing, andfollow-up procedures as they relate to the employee's ability to receivevaccination or to post exposure evaluation following an exposure incident;(D) The employer's copy of the physician's written opinion; and (E) A copy of the information provided to the physician as required byparagraphs (f)(4). (iii) Confidentiality. The employer shall assure that employee medicalrecords required by paragraph (f) are: (A) Kept confidential; and (B) Are not disclosed or reported to any person within or outside the workplaceexcept as required by this section or as may be required by law. (iv) The employer shall maintain this record for at least the durationof employment plus 30 years in accordance with 29 CFR 1910.20. (2) <T3>Training Records. </T3>(i) Training records shall include the followinginformation: (A) The dates of the training sessions; (B) The contents or a summary of the training sessions; (C) The names of persons conducting the training; and (D) The names of all persons attending the training sessions. (ii) These records shall be maintained for 5 years. (3) <T3>Availability. </T3>(i) The employer shall assure that all records requiredto be maintained by this section shall be made available upon request tothe Assistant Secretary and the Director for examination and copying. (ii) Employee training records required by this paragraph shall be providedupon request for examination and copying to employees, employee representatives,and the Assistant Secretary in accordance with 29 CFR 1910.20. (iii) Employee medical and training records required by this paragraphshall be provided upon request for examination and copying to the subjectemployee, to anyone having written consent of the subject employee, andto the Assistant Secretary in accordance with 29 CFR 1910.20. (4) <T3>Transfer of records. </T3>(i) The employer shall comply with the requirementsinvolving transfer of records set forth in 29 CFR 1910.20(h). (ii) If the employer ceases to do business and there is no successor employerto receive and retain the records for the prescribed period, the employershall notify the Director, at least three months prior to their disposaland transmit them to the Director if required by the Director to do sowithin that three month period. (i) <T3>Dates_</T3>(1) Effective Date. The standard shall become effectiveon [Insert date 30 days after publication in the<T4> Federal Register</T4>]. (2) Exposure Determination. The exposure determination required by paragraph(c)(1) of this section shall be completed within 90 days of the effectivedate of this standard. (3) Infection Control Plan. The Infection Control Plan required by paragraph(c)(2) of this section shall be completed within 120 days of the effectivedate of this standard. (4) Paragraphs (d)(2) Engineering and Work Practice Controls, (d)(3) PersonalProtective Equipment, (d)(4) Housekeeping, (e) HIV and HBV Research Laboratoriesand Production Facilities, (f) Hepatitis B Vaccination and Post-ExposureFollow-up, (g) Communication of Hazards to Employees, and (h) Recordkeepingshall take effect 150 days after the effective date of this standard. OSHAexpects that the employer will have initiated, but perhaps not completed,the HBV vaccination series within this time period.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-12470 Filed 5-23-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>